@1
(月凪惟緒) ねぇ、ヒノりん。この画面に映ってる問題、なんか文字が多すぎてすでに脳のメモリがショートしそうなんだけど。クラウドの世界って、こんなに文字を読むのが刑罰みたいなところなの？

(月凪惟緒) Hey, Hino-rin. The problem displayed on this screen has so much text that my brain's memory is already about to short-circuit. Is the cloud world a place where reading this much text feels like a punishment?

(日乃竜胆) 愚痴を言うな、イオち。これはAWS認定DevOpsエンジニア・プロフェッショナル、いわゆるDOPの試験対策問題だ。現実逃避をしたところで、永久凍土のような君の脳ミソが温まるわけでもあるまい。しっかりと向き合うのだ。

(日乃竜胆) Do not complain, Io-chi. This is a practice question for the AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional, the so-called DOP exam. Escaping reality will not warm up your permafrost-like brain. Face it properly.

(蒞星怜空) ほう、DOPか。まあ、焦るなよイオち。クラウドの海に溺れるというのは、深海2万メートルでコンクリートブロックを抱えてタップダンスを踊るようなものだ。絶望的な水圧で眼球が飛び出る感覚を味わうがいい。

(蒞星怜空) Oh, DOP, huh? Well, don't rush, Io-chi. Drowning in the cloud ocean is like tap-dancing at the depth of 20,000 meters while hugging a concrete block. Enjoy the sensation of your eyeballs popping out from the hopeless water pressure.

(月凪惟緒) 怜空さんの例え相変わらずホラー映画の導入なんだけど……。でも、ヒノりん、そもそもこの問題が何を問おうとしているのか、前提知識がゼロすぎて、私の頭の中ではハムスターが車輪を逆回転させてるよ。教えて、ヒノりんの優しい（厳しくないとは言っていない）レクチャーをさ。

(月凪惟緒) Reika-san's analogy sounds like the intro to a horror movie as usual... But Hino-rin, I have zero background knowledge on what this question is even asking, so in my head, a hamster is running its wheel in reverse. Teach me with your gentle (though you didn't say it's not strict) lecture, Hino-rin.

(日乃竜胆) ふっ、いいだろう。ではまず、この問題の背景と前提知識から徹底的に解き明かしてやろう。今回の問題は、API GatewayとAWS Lambda、そしてAmazon CloudWatchやX-Rayなどを絡めた、サーバーレスアーキテクチャにおけるロギングやトレーシング、エラーハンドリングに関するものだ。

(日乃竜胆) Hmph, very well. Then let us thoroughly unravel the background and prerequisite knowledge of this problem first. This question concerns logging, tracing, and error handling in a serverless architecture involving API Gateway, AWS Lambda, and Amazon CloudWatch or X-Ray.

(日乃竜胆) API Gatewayとは何か、イオちわかるか？

(日乃竜胆) Do you know what API Gateway is, Io-chi?

(月凪惟緒) えーっと、なんだっけ。コンビニの自動ドアみたいなやつ？ 通り抜けようとすると「いらっしゃいませ」って言われる的な。

(月凪惟緒) Ugh, let me think. Something like an automatic door at a convenience store? Where it says "Welcome" when you try to walk through.

(蒞星怜空) 自動ドアか。まあ、間違っちゃいない。客がやってきて勝手に店内を荒らすのを防ぐために、銃口を突きつけて「身分証を見せろ、さもなくば蜂の巣だ」と検問する冷酷な検問所、それがAPI Gatewayだ。出入り口で容赦なくリクエストを裁く、首切り役人さ。

(蒞星怜空) An automatic door. Well, not entirely wrong. It's a merciless checkpoint that points a gun at customers trying to rummage through the store uninvited, demanding, "Show me your ID, or else you're getting riddled with holes"—that's API Gateway. A headsman mercilessly judging requests at the entrance.

(日乃竜胆) 怜空さんの物騒な表現は聞き流すとして、API Gatewayは、クライアントからのリクエストを受け取り、バックエンドのLambdaなどのサービスへルーティングする「玄関口」だ。そしてAWS Lambdaは、サーバーの管理をすることなく、コードを実行できる「サーバーレスの計算資源」だな。

(日乃竜胆) Ignoring Reika-san's ominous phrasing, API Gateway is the "gateway" that receives requests from clients and routes them to backend services like Lambda. And AWS Lambda is the "serverless compute resource" that executes code without managing servers.

(月凪惟緒) サーバーの管理をしなくていいってことは、メンテナンスの面倒くささから逃げ続けられるニートの味方ってことね。なるほど、少し好きになったかも。

(月凪惟緒) Not having to manage servers means it's an ally for a neet who wants to keep running away from the hassle of maintenance. I see, I might like it a little now.

(日乃竜胆) 逃げられるわけがあるまい。サーバー管理はなくとも、コードのエラーやパフォーマンスの低下を監視・追跡する義務からは逃げられん。今回の問題は、API GatewayとLambdaの連携において、エラーが発生した際にどのようにログやトレース情報を取得し、原因を特定すべきかというベストプラクティスを問うているのだ。

(日乃竜胆) There's no escaping it. Even without server management, you cannot escape the duty to monitor and trace code errors or performance degradation. This question asks for the best practices on how to acquire logs and trace information and identify causes when errors occur in the integration of API Gateway and Lambda.

---

(日乃竜胆) Let us begin the rigorous dissection of this architectural labyrinth.

(日乃竜胆) では、ここからが本番だ。選択肢の検討に入るが、基本原則として、まずは「間違いの選択肢」から順に、なぜそれが不適切であるのかを骨の髄まで理解してもらう。いいな？

(日乃竜胆) Now, this is where the real work begins. We will examine the options, but as a basic rule, we will start with the "incorrect options" and have you understand to the marrow why they are inappropriate. Understood?

(月凪惟緒) はーい。不正解の選択肢からボコボコにしていくわけね。なんだかダークサイドに落ちた気分でワクワクするよ。

(月凪惟緒) Yay. So we're going to beat up the incorrect options first. Somehow I feel like I've fallen to the dark side and it's exciting.

(蒞星怜空) ダークサイドか。いいねえ、血の雨が降る地獄絵図だ。間違った選択肢を選ぶということは、猛毒のスープを一気飲みして内臓が溶け出すようなものさ。選んだ瞬間に社会的な死が訪れる、実に美しいデバッグの儀式だな。

(蒞星怜空) The dark side, huh. Sounds nice, a hellish landscape raining blood. Choosing an incorrect option is like chugging a soup of deadly poison and having your internal organs melt away. A truly beautiful debugging ritual where social death visits the moment you choose it.

(日乃竜胆) 怜空さん、脅かすのはそれくらいにしておけ。では、最初の不正解の選択肢について解説しよう。一般的に、API GatewayとLambdaのエラー調査において、CloudWatch Logsのデフォルトのログ出力を有効にするだけでは不十分な場合がある。例えば、API Gatewayの実行ログやアクセスログ、あるいはAWS X-Rayによる分散トレーシングを適切に組み合わせなければ、どのリクエストがどの段階で破綻したのかを追跡できない。

(日乃竜胆) Reika-san, stop scaring her to that extent. Now, let me explain the first incorrect option. Generally, in error investigation for API Gateway and Lambda, merely enabling default log output in CloudWatch Logs is insufficient. For example, without appropriately combining API Gateway execution/access logs or distributed tracing via AWS X-Ray, you cannot track which request failed at which stage.

(月凪惟緒) ふむふむ。つまり、ただ「エラーが出ました」っていうぼんやりした悲鳴を聞くだけじゃなくて、「どこで」「誰が」「どうして」足を滑らせたのかを特定するための専用の道具が必要ってことね。それを怠る選択肢は、すべてゴミ箱行きってわけだ。

(月凪惟緒) Mm-hmm. In other words, rather than just hearing a vague scream of "an error occurred," we need specialized tools to pinpoint "where," "who," and "why" someone slipped. Options that neglect that are all destined for the trash can.

---

(月凪惟緒) It's just a one-way ticket to nowhere.

(日乃竜胆) 非常に的確だ、イオち。その通り、不十分なロギング設定や、X-Rayのようなトレーシングツールを有効化しない選択肢は、障害シューティングにおいて全く役に立たない。エラーの根本原因（ルートコーズ）を隠蔽するだけの有害な設定と言える。

(日乃竜胆) Highly accurate, Io-chi. Exactly, options with insufficient logging settings or failing to enable tracing tools like X-Ray are utterly useless in troubleshooting. They can be described as harmful settings that merely conceal the root cause of errors.

(月凪惟緒) なるほどねぇ。エラーが起きたときに「なぜ……？」って黄昏てる暇があったら、最初から全ギミックを解放して証拠を掴めってことだ。

(月凪惟緒) I see. If you have time to stand there wondering "Why...?" when an error occurs, you should release all the gimmicks from the beginning and gather the evidence.

(蒞星怜空) その通り。証拠隠滅を図る犯罪者のような甘い設定を選んだ瞬間、お前のシステムはインフラの墓場に直行だ。冷たい土の下で永遠にデバッグという名の拷問を受けることになる。素晴らしいスラム街のルールだな。

(蒞星怜空) Exactly. The moment you choose a naive setting like a criminal trying to destroy evidence, your system goes straight to the infrastructure graveyard. You'll be tortured under the name of debugging forever beneath the cold soil. A wonderful slum rule.

---

(蒞星怜空) Welcome to the permanent exile.

(日乃竜胆) さて、不正解の選択肢をすべて排除したところで、いよいよ「正解の選択肢」の構築手順と、なぜそれが唯一の正解であるのかを紐解こう。

(日乃竜胆) Now, having eliminated all the incorrect options, let us finally unravel the construction procedure of the "correct option" and why it is the only correct choice.

(月凪惟緒) やっと本丸の登場だね。でもヒノりん、正解ってどうやって見抜けばいいの？ 勘に頼ると大体ろくなことにならないんだけど。

(月凪惟緒) Finally, the main fortress appears. But Hino-rin, how can I spot the right answer? Relying on intuition usually turns out terribly.

(日乃竜胆) 勘に頼るなど愚の骨頂だ。AWSのプロフェッショナルが求めるのは、論理的必然性だ。今回の問題の正解は、「API Gatewayのアクセスログと実行ログを有効化し、さらにAWS X-Rayのアクティブトレーシングを有効にしてリクエストの流れを可視化すること」を推奨する構成だ。

(日乃竜胆) Relying on intuition is the height of folly. What an AWS professional seeks is logical necessity. The correct answer to this problem is the configuration that recommends **"enabling API Gateway access logs and execution logs, and further enabling AWS X-Ray active tracing to visualize the flow of requests."**

(月凪惟緒) へぇ〜、X-Rayってあれでしょ、レントゲン写真みたいにシステムの骨組みを透視しちゃうやつ。秘密にしたいバグも全部丸見えになっちゃう恥ずかしいやつ。

(月凪惟緒) Huh, X-Ray is like that, right? Something that fluoroscopes the skeleton of the system like an X-ray photograph. An embarrassing thing where even bugs you want to keep secret become completely visible.

---

(月凪惟緒) X-ray vision for your messy code.

(日乃竜胆) 恥ずかしいかどうかは知らんが、X-Rayを使うことで、API GatewayからLambda、さらにその先のデータベース呼び出しに至るまでのレイテンシー（遅延）やエラーの発生箇所をミリ秒単位で視覚化できる。プロフェッショナルにとって、これほど強力な武器はない。

(日乃竜胆) Whether it's embarrassing or not, by using X-Ray, you can visualize latency and error locations down to the millisecond, from API Gateway to Lambda and further down to database calls. For a professional, there is no weapon more powerful than this.

(蒞星怜空) まさに、暗闇の中で暴れる怪物のレントゲンを撮って、急所を正確にスナイパーライフルで撃ち抜くようなものだな。優雅で、残酷で、そして何より効率的だ。これぞプロの技と言えよう。

(蒞星怜空) Exactly like taking an X-ray of a monster rampaging in the dark and precisely sniping its vital point with a sniper rifle. Elegant, cruel, and above all, efficient. This is what you call professional craftsmanship.

(月凪惟緒) なるほどねぇ……。ただなんとなく動かすだけじゃなくて、問題が起きたときに秒で原因を暴けるように準備しておくのが、DevOpsのプロってわけか。なんだか少しだけ、クラウドのことがカッコよく見えてきたかも。

(月凪惟緒) I see... It's not just about making things run somehow, but preparing so you can expose the cause in seconds when a problem occurs—that's what a DevOps pro is. Somehow, the cloud is starting to look a little cool.

---

(月凪惟緒) The cold beauty of automation.

(日乃竜胆) ふっ、ようやく理解できたようだな、イオち。AWSの世界は冷酷だが、正しい知識と武器を持てばこれほど頼もしい相棒はない。今日の講義はここまでだ。しっかりと復習しておけよ。

(日乃竜胆) Hmph, it seems you have finally understood, Io-chi. The cloud world is ruthless, but with the right knowledge and weapons, there is no more reliable partner. Today's lecture is over. Make sure to review thoroughly.
@2
(日乃竜胆)さて、本日はAWS初学者の大いなる第一歩として、クラウドの根幹をなす設計思想と具体的なアーキテクチャの構築手法について、徹底的な講義を行う。私の説明に漏れはない。心して聞くように。

(日乃竜胆)Let us begin our comprehensive lecture on AWS architecture today. Pay close attention, as every detail matters for your foundational understanding.

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、お疲れ様。なんかもう教室の空気がキリキリしすぎてて、冷凍保存されたマグロの気持ちになっちゃうよぉ。ねえ、今日のテーマって、あの、なんだっけ、雲の上で何かをどうにかするやつ？

(月凪惟緒)Hello, Hinorin. The air in here is so sharp I feel like a frozen tuna in a supermarket display. So, what's today's theme again? Something about doing magic up in the clouds?

(日乃竜胆)雲の上ではなくクラウドコンピューティングだ、イオち。基礎から確実に積み上げねば、お前の頭の中の永久凍土は永遠に融解しないまま終わる。しっかりと問うがいい、分からないところがあればすべて私が削ぎ落としてやろう。

(日乃竜胆)It is cloud computing, not literally up in the clouds, Io. If we do not build from the absolute basics, the permafrost inside your mind will remain frozen for eternity. Ask away, and I shall carve away any confusion.

(蒞星怜空)ほう、永久凍土の融解か。それはまるで、長年放置された冷凍庫の奥底から発掘された、正体不明の化石スープをうっかりレンジで温めたときの、破滅的な惨劇を思い起こさせる素晴らしい比喩だな。ヒノりんの厳格な指導という名の高圧ガスバーナーで、イオちの脳内が綺麗に爆ぜる瞬間を特等席で見物させてもらうとしよう。

(蒞星怜空)Ah, the melting of permafrost. That reminds me of the apocalyptic disaster when someone accidentally microwaves an unidentified fossilized soup from the back of a neglected freezer. I shall take a front-row seat to watch Hinorin's high-pressure blowtorch of discipline neatly detonate Io's brain cells.

(日乃竜胆)怜空、お前はただの観覧者なのだから、余計な煽りを挟まないでいただこう。では、本題の設問に入る。今回のテーマは、AWSにおける高可用性と耐障害性を担保するための、マルチAZ構成およびロードバランシングの仕組みについてだ。まずは前提知識として、AWSの「リージョン」と「アベイラビリティーゾーン（AZ）」の概念から正確に理解せよ。

(日乃竜胆)Rin, you are merely a spectator, so refrain from unnecessary agitation. Let us move to the core question. Our theme centers on multi-AZ configurations and load balancing mechanisms to ensure high availability and fault tolerance in AWS. First, as a prerequisite, you must accurately grasp the concepts of AWS "Regions" and "Availability Zones (AZs)."

(月凪惟緒)りょーかい、ヒノりん。でさぁ、その『りーじょん』とか『えーぜっと』って、あれでしょ？ グー〇ルマップの縮尺を変えたときに出てくる、謎のピンみたいなもんなの？ それとも、ただの美味しそうな海外のビールブランド？

(月凪惟緒)Understood, Hinorin. So, those 'Regions' and 'AZs,' are they like mysterious map pins that pop up when you zoom out on Google Maps? Or are they just exotic foreign beer brands that sound delicious?

(日乃竜胆)全く違う。リージョンとはAWSのデータセンターが物理的に設置されている世界中の地理的な地域のことであり、アベイラビリティーゾーンはそのリージョン内において、独立した電源、冷却設備、ネットワークを備えた1つ以上のデータセンターの集合体だ。つまり、片方のAZが隕石の直撃を受けて消滅したとしても、もう片方のAZが稼働し続ければシステム全体は停止せずに生き残る。これが可用性の担保というものだ。

(日乃竜胆)Not even close. A Region is a geographical area where AWS physical data centers are located, and an Availability Zone is a collection of one or more discrete data centers with redundant power, networking, and connectivity within that Region. In short, even if one AZ were struck by a meteorite and obliterated, the other AZ would keep the system alive. This is how availability is guaranteed.

(蒞星怜空)隕石の直撃とはまた壮麗だな。まるで、完璧に積み上げられた高級フレンチのフルコースの真ん中に、突如としてドブ川の泥水が全否定の意志を持って降り注ぐような、圧倒的な不条理と絶望のコントラストを感じさせる。素晴らしい例えだ、ヒノりん。

(蒞星怜空)A meteorite strike is quite magnificent. It evokes the overwhelming absurdity and despair of muddy sewage pouring directly onto the center of a meticulously prepared French course with total malicious intent. A splendid analogy, Hinorin.

(日乃竜胆)お前の例えはいちいち不穏で陰惨だから黙っていてくれ、怜空。では、ここからが本題の選択肢の検討だ。設問において、トラフィックを適切に分散させ、単一障害点を排除するための構成を問われている。解説の順序に従い、まずは**間違いの選択肢**から一つずつ解体していく。

(日乃竜胆)Your analogies are invariably sinister and grim, so please be silent, Rin. Now, let us dissect the incorrect choices in order, as per protocol. We shall examine why the wrong answers fail before arriving at the truth.

(月凪惟緒)ふむふむ、間違ったやつから斬っていくのね。まるで、理不尽に怒られた日のアルバイトのシフト表をシュレッダーにかけるときの、あの無慈悲で心地よい作業みたいな感じかなぁ。で、最初のダメな選択肢ってどれなのさ？

(月凪惟緒)I see, we execute the wrong ones first. It feels a bit like running the shift schedule through a shredder on a day I was unfairly chewed out—merciless yet oddly satisfying. So, which one is the first doomed choice?

(日乃竜胆)最初の不正解の選択肢は、「単一のAZ内にすべてのリソースを配置し、ロードバランサーを介さずに直接クライアントからのリクエストを単一のEC2インスタンスにルーティングする」という構成だ。これの何が致命的であるか分かるか？イオち。

(日乃竜胆)The first incorrect choice is a configuration where all resources are placed within a single AZ, routing client requests directly to a single EC2 instance without a load balancer. Do you understand why this is fatally flawed, Io?

(月凪惟緒)えーっと、全部をひとつのカゴに盛っちゃう感じ？ それって、スーパーの特売で買った生卵を全部ひとつのエコバッグに入れて、駅の階段で盛大に転んだときの、あの世にも恐ろしい惨劇を思い出すよね……。中身が全部ドロドロの悲鳴に変わるやつ。

(月凪惟緒)Umm, putting all your eggs in one basket? That reminds me of the terrifying disaster when I shoved all my discount raw eggs into a single grocery bag and took a magnificent tumble down the station stairs... turning everything into a tragic, gooey scream.

(日乃竜胆)その例えは奇妙に生々しいが、本質を突いている。単一のAZに依存するということは、そのデータセンター自体の障害やメンテナンスが発生した瞬間に、システム全体が完全に沈黙することを意味する。ロードバランサーも存在しないため、アクセスが集中した際の負荷分散も不可能であり、耐障害性も可用性も文字通りゼロになる。これがこの選択肢が誤っている決定的な理由だ。

(日乃竜胆)That analogy is bizarrely vivid, yet it hits the core. Relying on a single AZ means the entire system falls completely silent the moment that data center experiences an outage or maintenance. Without a load balancer, load distribution under heavy traffic is impossible, leaving fault tolerance and availability at absolute zero. This is the definitive reason why this choice is incorrect.

(蒞星怜空)素晴らしい。単一障害点、通称SPOFという名の処刑台だな。それはまるで、1本の頼りない糸だけで吊るされた巨大な鉄球の下で、心地よい昼寝を貪る愚か者のようなものだ。糸が切れた瞬間、議論の余地すら残さず、すべてが音もなく押しつぶされる。実に美しい破滅の美学と言えよう。

(蒞星怜空)Splendid. A Single Point of Failure, commonly known as a guillotine. It is like taking a peaceful nap beneath a gigantic iron ball suspended by a single, fraying thread. The moment the thread snaps, everything is crushed into silence without room for argument. A truly beautiful aesthetic of ruin.

(日乃竜胆)相変わらず物騒な言動はやめたまえ。次に、二つ目の不正解の選択肢を見ていく。「複数のAZにリソースを配置しているものの、ロードバランサーを使用せず、DNSのラウンドロビンのみでトラフィックを振り分ける」という構成だ。これも明確に間違いである。

(日乃竜胆)Cease your alarming commentary, as always. Next, we examine the second incorrect choice: a configuration that spans multiple AZs but relies solely on DNS round-robin routing without a load balancer to distribute traffic. This is also definitively incorrect.

(月凪惟緒)でぃーえぬえすの、らうんどろびん……？ なんかおしゃれな回転寿司の名前みたいだけど、違うの？ お皿がクルクル回って、気づいたらお財布が空っぽになるやつ。

(月凪惟緒)DNS round-robin...? That sounds like some trendy conveyor-belt sushi joint, doesn't it? The plates go round and round until your wallet is mysteriously empty.

(日乃竜胆)寿司ではない。DNSラウンドロビンとは、ドメイン名に対するIPアドレスの問い合わせに対し、複数のIPアドレスを順番に割り当てて返す仕組みのことだ。一見すると負荷分散ができているように思えるが、これには致命的な欠陥がある。サーバーの1台が故障して停止したとしても、DNSのキャッシュが残っている間は、クライアントは死んだサーバーに対してアクセスを送り続け、エラーを引き起こし続けるのだ。さらに、リアルタイムな負荷の偏りを動的に調整する能力もない。

(日乃竜胆)It is not sushi. DNS round-robin is a mechanism that responds to domain name resolution queries by returning multiple IP addresses in a sequential rotation. At a glance, it might seem like load balancing, but it has a fatal flaw. Even if a server crashes and stops functioning, clients will continue sending requests to that dead server based on cached DNS records, resulting in persistent errors. Furthermore, it lacks the ability to dynamically adjust to real-time load imbalances.

(蒞星怜空)まさに、ブレーキの壊れたトロッコで、視界不良の霧の中を全速力で崖に向かって突き進むようなものだな。運行管理者は涼しい顔で「順番に案内しています」と言っているが、乗客は次々と深い谷底へダイブしていく。死のロードマップが綺麗に整えられた、極めて味わい深い悪夢だ。

(蒞星怜空)It is precisely like hurtling at full speed toward a cliff in a fog-bound cart with broken brakes. The dispatcher smiles and says, 'We are guiding you in order,' while passengers dive one after another into the deep abyss. A exquisitely seasoned nightmare with a neatly arranged roadmap to death.

(日乃竜胆)例えの度に場の温度が氷点下に下がるのを感じるが、言いたいことは大体合っている。DNSラウンドロビン単体では、死活監視や動的なトラフィック制御が不可能なため、本番環境の堅牢なアーキテクチャとしては全く使い物にならないということだ。

(日乃竜胆)I feel the ambient temperature drop below freezing with every analogy you make, but your point is essentially correct. Since DNS round-robin alone lacks health checks and dynamic traffic control, it is entirely useless as a robust production architecture.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ。死んだサーバーにわざわざ「お邪魔しまーす」って挨拶しに行っちゃうおバカさんを生み出し続けるシステムってわけか。そりゃダメだわ、効率悪すぎるもん。

(月凪惟緒)I see. So it's a system that keeps generating clumsy folks who insist on visiting a dead server just to say 'excuse me.' That's a no-go; it's way too inefficient.

(日乃竜胆)そうだ。そしていよいよ、最後に残った**正解の選択肢**の解説に移る。正解は、「複数のアベイラビリティーゾーンにまたがってElastic Load Balancing（ELB）を配置し、その配下に複数のEC2インスタンスをスケーラブルに配置する」という構成だ。これこそがAWSにおける高可用性アーキテクチャの黄金律である。

(日乃竜胆)Precisely. And now, we finally move to the explanation of the remaining correct choice. The correct answer is a configuration where Elastic Load Balancing (ELB) spans multiple Availability Zones, with multiple EC2 instances placed scalably beneath it. This is the golden rule of high-availability architecture in AWS.

(月凪惟緒)えりすとっく・ろーど・ばらんしんぐ……またもや呪文みたいな名前が出てきたけれど、これって要するに、優秀な案内係のお姉さんが入口に立っていて、混んでるレジを避けて空いてるレジにスイスイ誘導してくれる、みたいな感じの理解でいいの？

(月凪惟緒)Elastic Load Balancing... another spell-like name. So, basically, it's like having an exceptionally competent receptionist standing at the entrance, smoothly guiding people away from crowded registers and into open ones, right?

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だな、イオち。その認識で完全に正しい。ELBは入ってくるリクエストを受け止め、複数のAZに分散しているインスタンスに対して均等に、かつ健康なサーバーを選別しながら振り分ける。もし特定のAZやインスタンスに障害が発生しても、ELBのヘルスチェック機能がそれを瞬時に検知し、生きている健全なリソースへと自動的にトラフィックをバイパスする。これにより、システム全体としての停止時間を限りなくゼロに近づけることができるのだ。

(日乃竜胆)Astute observation, Io. That understanding is entirely correct. ELB absorbs incoming requests and distributes them evenly across instances spread across multiple AZs while filtering out unhealthy servers. If a failure occurs in a specific AZ or instance, ELB's health check mechanism instantly detects it and automatically bypasses traffic to healthy, living resources. This minimizes system downtime to near zero.

(蒞星怜空)完璧なリスクヘッジだな。それはまるで、百戦錬磨の曲芸師が、無数のナイフが飛び交うステージの上で、観客一人ひとりの安全を微塵の狂いもなく守り抜くような、冷徹で美しい統制の極みだ。混沌とした現実に秩序という名の冷たい鉄槌を下す、実に洗練された仕組みと言える。

(蒞星怜空)A flawless risk hedge. It is like a seasoned acrobat maintaining absolute, ruthless control, protecting the safety of every single spectator without a fraction of a error on a stage bristling with flying knives. A truly refined mechanism that brings the cold hammer of order down upon a chaotic reality.

(日乃竜胆)ふう、ようやく怜空のまともな解説が聞けた気がする。このように、AWSでは単一障害点を排除し、負荷を分散し、動的な死活監視を行うために、マルチAZとELBを組み合わせた冗長化構成が必須となる。初学者のうちはこの基本構造を頭に叩き込むことが何よりも重要だ。今日の講義はここまでとする。よく復習しておきなさい。

(日乃竜胆)Phew, I feel like I finally heard a sensible explanation from you, Rin. As demonstrated, AWS requires a redundant configuration combining multi-AZ and ELB to eliminate single points of failure, distribute load, and perform dynamic health checks. For beginners, hammering this basic structure into your mind is paramount. Today's lecture concludes here. Review thoroughly.
@3
(月凪惟緒)えーと、ヒノりん。なんか画面にすごく細かい文字がいっぱい並んでるんだけど、これを見ながら勉強するの？ 私、もうお布団に戻りたいな……頭の中が永久凍土みたいに冷え切って真っ白なんだけど。

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io) Well, Hinorin. There are so many tiny letters lined up on the screen, are we really going to study this? I kind of want to crawl back into my futon... My brain is frozen solid like permafrost and totally blank.

(日乃竜胆)甘ったれるな、イオち。今日開いているこのウェブページ、そこにある設問こそが、お前のその停滞しきった脳味噌を強制的に叩き起こすための最初の関門だ。AWS認定プロフェッショナル、その深淵を覗くぞ。逃げ道など最初から用意していない。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Don't be soft, Io-chi. The question open on this webpage right here is the very first barrier meant to forcibly kickstart your completely stagnant brain. We are going to peer into the abyss of AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional. There is no escape route prepared for you from the beginning.

(蒞星怜空)おや、ヒノりん相変わらず血気盛んだねぇ。いいんじゃない、どうせこの世のすべてはいずれ灰燼に帰し、インフラの構築も崩壊も、路傍の石ころが風化するのと大差ないただのエントロピーの増大にすぎないというのに。せいぜい、滅びゆくシステムの中でジタバタあがく人間サマの滑稽な見世物を楽しませてもらうとしようか。

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea) Oh, Hinorin is as full of fighting spirit as ever. Well, that's fine, since everything in this world will eventually return to ashes, and whether we build or collapse infrastructure is no different from a roadside pebble weathering away—just a mere increase in entropy. At most, let me enjoy the comical spectacle of human beings squirming and struggling within a dying system.

(日乃竜胆)怜空さん、相変わらず景気の悪い前置きだな。だが、お前のその歪んだ世界観の解説もたまには役に立つ。心して聞け、イオち。今回の設問は、AWS環境におけるアプリケーションの可用性とスケーラビリティ、そしてデプロイメントに関する極めて実践的な問題だ。まずは問題文の状況を整理するぞ。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Rea-san, that's as gloomy a preamble as ever. But your twisted worldview commentary is sometimes useful. Listen closely, Io-chi. The question this time is an extremely practical one regarding application availability, scalability, and deployment in an AWS environment. Let's first organize the situation described in the question.

(月凪惟緒)はーい……。で、その、何とかって言うクラウドのすごいやつは、私のこの重たいまぶたをどうにかしてくれるわけ？

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io) Yes, ma'am... So, like, can this amazing cloud thing do something about my heavy eyelids?

(日乃竜胆)冗談を言っている場合か。画面の設問を確認するぞ。Auto ScalingグループとApplication Load Balancerを利用したWebアプリケーション環境において、新しいバージョンのコードをデプロイする際の手法についての問いだ。まずは、選択肢の一つ一つを検証していくぞ。原則として、誤っている選択肢から順に紐解いていくのが鉄則だ。心してかかれ。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Is this a time for jokes? Let's check the question on the screen. It's a query about the method for deploying a new version of code in a web application environment using an Auto Scaling group and an Application Load Balancer. First, we will examine each of the options. As a rule, the ironclad rule is to unravel the incorrect options in order first. Brace yourself.

(月凪惟緒)えーと、間違ってるやつから？ なんでわざわざ不正解のゴミを漁るみたいなことしなきゃいけないのさ。なんかこう、一足飛びに正解だけ教えてもらったほうが効率よくない？

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io) Um, starting from the wrong ones? Why do we have to go out of our way to rummage through incorrect trash? Wouldn't it be more efficient if you just taught me the correct answer in one giant leap?

(日乃竜胆)愚問だな。誤りである理由を正確に理解していなければ、少し設定を変えられただけでお前はまた同じ穴に落ちる。というわけで、まずは最初の不正解の選択肢から徹底的に解剖する。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) What a foolish question. If you don't accurately understand why something is wrong, you'll fall into the exact same trap the moment a setting is slightly tweaked. Therefore, we will thoroughly dissect the first incorrect option.

(蒞星怜空)ふふ、基礎をすっ飛ばして正解だけを求める姿勢、嫌いじゃないよ。まるで、毒を盛られたグラスを一気に飲み干して、致死量に怯えながら即効性の快楽を求めるジャンキーのようだねぇ。間違った選択肢を愛でるというのは、いわば他人の盛大な自損事故を特等席で観賞するようなものさ。これほど香ばしいエンターテインメントが他にあるかい？

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea) Heh, I don't dislike the attitude of skipping the fundamentals and just wanting the correct answer. It's like a junkie gulping down a poisoned glass, seeking instant pleasure while cowering in fear of a lethal dose. Cherishing the wrong options is, so to speak, like watching someone else's grand self-inflicted accident from a front-row seat. Is there any entertainment more savory than this?

(日乃竜胆)怜空さん、例えが相変わらず物騒すぎる。心臓の弱い人間なら一発で精神が崩壊するぞ。だが、本質を突いているのも事実だ。では、一つ目の誤った選択肢の解説に入る。この選択肢では、インスタンスの更新に際して、単に手動で古いインスタンスを一台ずつ終了させて新しいAMIから再起動させる手法が挙げられている。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Rea-san, your analogies are too menacing as usual. Anyone with a weak heart would have their psyche shattered instantly. But it is also true that you hit the core. Now, let's move on to the explanation of the first incorrect option. This option mentions a method where, upon updating instances, you simply manually terminate old instances one by one and reboot them from a new AMI.

(月凪惟緒)手動で一台ずつ……？ それって、夜中に起きてポチポチボタンを押しまくるってこと？ 考えただけで私のCPUとメモリが焼き切れそうなんだけど。そんなの絶対面倒くさいし、社畜の残業地獄の匂いがプンプンするよ。

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io) Manually, one by one...? Does that mean waking up in the middle of the night and clicking buttons over and over? Just thinking about it makes my CPU and memory feel like they're burning out. That sounds totally annoying, and it reeks of a corporate slave's overtime hell.

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だな、イオち。その通り、この手法は運用管理上の悪夢であり、AWSが提供する自動化のメリットを完全にドブに捨てている。手動操作が介在する以上、ヒューマンエラーの確率は跳ね上がり、デプロイにかかる時間も予測不可能性も増大する。さらに、Auto Scalingのライフサイクル管理とも完全に矛盾しているのだ。これが不正解である決定的理由だ。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Astute observation, Io-chi. Exactly. This method is an operational nightmare, completely throwing the automation benefits provided by AWS down the drain. As long as manual operation is involved, the probability of human error skyrockets, and the time and unpredictability required for deployment increase. Furthermore, it completely contradicts the lifecycle management of Auto Scaling. This is the decisive reason why it is incorrect.

(蒞星怜空)人間が手でポチポチとサーバーをいじる姿というのは、さしずめ、狂気が支配する病院のベッドの上で、患者が自分の点滴のチューブをハサミでチョキチョキ切り刻みながら「おや、赤いお水が出てきたよ」と無邪気に微笑んでいるようなものだねぇ。美しく構築された自動化の神殿を、自らの怠惰と無知という名のハンマーで粉々に粉砕する、最高にアヴァンギャルドな自滅行為といえよう。

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea) A human tinkering with servers by hand is, so to speak, like a patient on a hospital bed governed by madness, snipping away at their own IV tube with a pair of scissors while smiling innocently, "Oh, look, red water is coming out." It could be said to be a supremely avant-garde act of self-destruction, smashing a beautifully constructed temple of automation to pieces with hammers named one's own laziness and ignorance.

(日乃竜胆)比喩が相変わらずグロテスクだが、要するに自動化の文脈において手動介入は悪ということだ。次に、二つ目の誤った選択肢に移る。ここでは、既存のAuto Scalingグループの起動設定や起動テンプレートを更新した後、すぐに何もせずに放置するか、あるいはロードバランサーのルーティングだけを切り替えるような記述がなされている。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) The metaphor is grotesque as usual, but in short, manual intervention is evil in the context of automation. Next, let's move on to the second incorrect option. Here, after updating the launch configuration or launch template of an existing Auto Scaling group, it describes leaving things as they are without doing anything immediately, or just switching the routing of the load balancer.

(月凪惟緒)えっと、それの何がいけないの？ 設定を変えたんだから、あとは勝手にいい感じに世界がアップデートされていくんじゃないの？ 世の中、寝て待てって言うしさ。

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io) Um, what's wrong with that? Since we changed the settings, won't the world update itself nicely after that? They say "wait and sleep" for a reason, you know.

(日乃竜胆)甘いな、イオち。Auto Scalingグループは、一度起動された既存のインスタンスに対して、起動テンプレートや起動設定の変更を自動的には適用しない。つまり、設定を変えただけでは、現在稼働しているのは古いバージョンのコードを載せた古いインスタンスのままだ。新しいインスタンスが新AMIで立ち上がるのは、スケールアウトが発生するか、あるいは明示的にインスタンスをリフレッシュしたときだけなのだよ。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Too naive, Io-chi. An Auto Scaling group does not automatically apply changes in launch templates or launch configurations to existing instances that have already been launched. In other words, just changing the settings leaves the currently running instances as the old ones running the old version of code. New instances will only launch with the new AMI when a scale-out event occurs or when instances are explicitly refreshed.

(蒞星怜空)ほう、これはなかなかに味わい深い勘違いだねぇ。まるで、恋人に「愛しているよ」と誓ったその日の夜から一切連絡を絶ち、数十年後に「なぜ私たちは赤の他人のまま老いぼれてしまったのかしら」と道端で一人涙を流すロマンチストのようだ。システムは勝手に気を利かせて察してくれたりはしない。冷徹なまでの設定の不作為は、そのままシステムの陳腐化という名の緩慢な死へと直結するのさ。

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea) Ho, this is quite a tasteful misunderstanding. It's like a romantic who cuts off all contact the very night they swear "I love you" to their lover, and decades later weeps alone on the street, wondering, "Why did we grow old as complete strangers?" Systems don't read between the lines and guess what you want. Cold, unyielding inaction in configuration directly leads to a slow death called the obsolescence of the system.

(日乃竜胆)その通りだな。設定を変更しただけでは、既存のトラフィックを処理している古いインスタンス群は古いまま放置され、バージョンアップの目的が全く達成されない。これが二つ目の選択肢が不正解である理由だ。さて、ここまでで誤った選択肢の罠を二つ暴いた。次はいよいよ、本丸である正解の選択肢の検証に入るぞ。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Exactly. Just changing the settings leaves the old instances processing existing traffic untouched, completely failing to achieve the purpose of the version upgrade. This is why the second option is incorrect. Now, we have exposed the traps of two incorrect options so far. Next, we finally move on to verifying the core correct option.

(月凪惟緒)ふぁあ……やっと正解の話？ 長かったような、宇宙の歴史の終わりを見届けたような気分だよ。で、結局どうするのが正解なの？ 一言でまとめてよ、ヒノりん。

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io) Yawn... Finally talking about the correct answer? It feels like it's been so long, like I've witnessed the end of the history of the universe. So, what's the right thing to do in the end? Sum it up in a word, Hinorin.

(日乃竜胆)一言で片付けられるか。だが要点を絞って示そう。正解の選択肢では、Auto Scalingグループのインスタンスリフレッシュ（Instance Refresh）機能、あるいはこれに準ずるローリングアップデートのメカニズムを適切に使用し、古いインスタンスを順次、新しいAMIを持つ新しいインスタンスに置き換えていく手順が選ばれている。これこそが、可用性を落とさず、手動介入のミスも排除した完璧なデプロイ手法だ。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) As if it can be summed up in a word. But I will present it by narrowing down the main points. In the correct option, the **Instance Refresh** feature of the Auto Scaling group, or a rolling update mechanism conforming to it, is appropriately used to sequentially replace old instances with new instances having the new AMI. This is the flawless deployment method that does not drop availability and eliminates the errors of manual intervention.

(蒞星怜空)素晴らしいねぇ。古いものから順に静かに、しかし確実に粛清され、新しい世代へとバトンが渡されていく。それはまるで、古い体制の腐敗した為政者たちが次々と断頭台の露と消え、代わりに若々しい狂信者たちが新たなパラダイスを築き上げるかのごとき、血沸き肉踊る世代交代の儀式だよ。美しく、システマチックで、そして少しばかり冷酷な、AWSの真骨頂といったところさ。

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea) Wonderful. Old things are quietly yet surely purged in order, passing the baton to the new generation. It's like a blood-pumping rite of generational transition where corrupt politicians of the old regime vanish onto the scaffold one after another, and in their place, youthful fanatics build a new paradise. Beautiful, systematic, and a little bit ruthless—the true essence of AWS.

(月凪惟緒)うわぁ……なんか生々しい例えが出てきたけど、要するに、Auto Scalingくんに「新しい子に入れ替えてね」って命令すると、お利口さんに一気にあとは自動でやってくれるってことね。それなら、私のこの眠気も少しは癒やされるかも。ボタン一つで全部やってくれるなら大歓迎だわ。

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io) Whoa... That's a vivid analogy, but in short, if we just command the Auto Scaling-kun, "Please swap them out for the new kids," it will smartly do everything automatically from there. If so, maybe this sleepiness of mine will be cured a little bit. If it does everything with a single button, I'm all for it.

(日乃竜胆)その通りだ、イオち。よくぞたどり着いた。Auto Scalingのインスタンスリフレッシュ機能を利用すれば、最小台数（Minimum Healthy Percentage）を維持しながら、安全かつ自動的に古いインスタンスを終了し、新しいAMIに基づいたインスタンスへと置き換えることができる。サービスの停止時間を最小限に、あるいはゼロに抑えつつ、確実なアップデートを完遂できるのだ。これこそが、プロフェッショナルに求められる正しいアーキテクチャの知識である。

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo) Exactly, Io-chi. Well done reaching this conclusion. By using the Auto Scaling instance refresh feature, you can safely and automatically terminate old instances and replace them with instances based on the new AMI while maintaining the minimum healthy percentage. You can complete a secure update while minimizing or eliminating service downtime. This is precisely the correct architecture knowledge required of a professional.
@4
(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、なんか画面に文字がいっぱい並んでるんだけど。これ、永久凍土の底に眠る古代文字より読めない気がするの。ねえ、AWSって何なの？ 食べられるの？

(月凪惟緒)Hinorin, there's a bunch of text on the screen. It feels less readable than ancient scripts sleeping at the bottom of permafrost. Hey, what even is AWS? Is it edible?

(日乃竜胆)食べるものなどではない、月凪。これはAWS、Amazon Web Servicesの資格試験の過去問だ。初心者のそなたにも理解できるよう、本日は私が一から叩き込んでやろう。心して聞くがいい。

(日乃竜胆)It is nothing to be eaten, Tsukinagi. This is a past exam question for AWS, Amazon Web Services. Today, I shall drill it into you from scratch so that even a beginner like you can understand. Prepare yourself and listen well.

(蒞星怜空)AWSか。まあ、無限に広がる虚無のクラウド空間に、自らの財布の寿命を捧げる壮大な儀式のようなものだな。間違えれば毎月自宅に届く恐怖の請求書が、そなたの背筋を凍らせるエンターテインメントだ。

(蒞星怜空)AWS, huh. Well, it is like a grand ritual where you sacrifice the lifespan of your wallet to the infinitely expanding void of cloud space. Make a mistake, and the terrifying bill arriving at your home every month becomes entertainment that freezes your spine.

(日乃竜胆)怜空、不穏な例えで初学者の脳を曇らせるな。……気を取り直すぞ。今回の設問は**AWS Organizations**の**CloudFormation StackSets**に関するものだ。まずは問題文を読む。

『AWS Organizations を使用してマルチアカウント環境を管理している。管理アカウントから複数のメンバーアカウントの特定のリリージョンにリソースをデプロイしたい。最も運用負荷が最も少ない運用の仕組み、かつ最もセキュアな仕組みを選ぶべきだ。』

これに対する選択肢を見ていくぞ。まずは間違いの選択肢からつぶしていくのが定石だ。

(日乃竜胆)Ria, do not cloud a beginner's brain with ominous analogies. ...Let us get back on track. This question is about **CloudFormation StackSets** in **AWS Organizations**. First, let us read the question statement.

(日乃竜胆)"You are managing a multi-account environment using AWS Organizations. You want to deploy resources to specific regions across multiple member accounts from the management account. You should choose the mechanism with the lowest operational overhead and the highest security."

We will look at the choices for this. As a rule of thumb, we start by crushing the incorrect options.

(月凪惟緒)マルチアカウントとかマネジメントアカウントとか、もう呪文にしか聞こえないんだけど、ヒノりん、優しく包み込んで教えて。あと、スタックなんちゃらって何？ 積み木？

(月凪惟緒)Multi-account, management account... it just sounds like spells to me, Hinorin. Wrap me in your gentle embrace and explain. Also, what is this stack-thing? Building blocks?

(日乃竜胆)積み木とは遠からずだがな……。では最初の誤った選択肢、各メンバーアカウントで個別にAWS CloudFormationテンプレートを手動で実行する方法についてだ。これはなぜ不正解なのだと思う、月凪？

(日乃竜胆)It is not far from building blocks, but... Then, regarding the first incorrect option: the method of manually executing AWS CloudFormation templates individually in each member account. Why do you think this is incorrect, Tsukinagi?

(月凪惟緒)えーと、めんどくさいから？ 毎日手動でポチポチするなんて、布団から出るよりつらい労働じゃん。そんなの絶対やだ。

(月凪惟緒)Umm, because it's a hassle? Clicking manually every day sounds like labor more painful than getting out of bed. I definitely hate that.

(日乃竜胆)至極真っ当な怠惰だが、理由はそれだけではない。各アカウントに手動でログインしてデプロイを行うということは、アカウントの数が増えるほど運用負荷が爆発的に増大する。さらに、人為的ミスによる設定漏れや、権限管理の不備が生じるリスクも高まるため、設問が求める「最も運用負荷が少なく、最もセキュアな仕組み」という要件に真っ向から反するのだ。

(日乃竜胆)That is a thoroughly valid laziness, but that is not the only reason. Logging into each account manually to deploy means that as the number of accounts increases, the operational overhead explodes exponentially. Furthermore, the risk of configuration omissions and inadequate permission management due to human error increases, directly contradicting the requirement of "lowest operational overhead and highest security" demanded by the question.

(蒞星怜空)手動でのデプロイか。それはまるで、錆びついた手押し車で地雷原を全速力で駆け抜けるようなものだな。一歩間違えば組織全体が炎の海に包まれ、管理者の精神が崩壊する美しいスペクタクルを楽しめるぞ。

(蒞星怜空)Manual deployment, eh? That is like sprinting through a minefield at full speed with a rusted handcart. Make one misstep, and the entire organization is enveloped in a sea of flames, allowing you to enjoy a beautiful spectacle where the administrator's sanity collapses.

(月凪惟緒)怜空さん、例えが相変わらずホラーなんだけど。聞いてるだけで胃が痛くなってきた。

(月凪惟緒)Ria-san, your analogy is horror-themed as usual. Just listening to it makes my stomach hurt.

(日乃竜胆)怯えるな、月凪。次に行くぞ。二つ目の誤った選択肢は、各メンバーアカウントのIAMロールを管理アカウントから個別に引き受けてスクリプトで一斉実行する方法だ。

(日乃竜胆)Do not be frightened, Tsukinagi. Let us move on. The second incorrect option is the method of individually assuming IAM roles of each member account from the management account and executing them simultaneously via a script.

(月凪惟緒)IAMロール……？ アイアム・レディ的な何か？ 私、準備できてないけど。

(月凪惟緒)IAM role...? Something like "I am ready"? But I'm not ready.

(日乃竜胆)IAMとは Identity and Access Management の略称だ。AWSのリソースに誰がアクセスできるかを制御する仕組みだな。管理アカウントからスクリプトを組んで各アカウントを操作するのは一見効率的に見えるが、スクリプトの保守運用や、各アカウントへのクロスアカウントアクセス権限の複雑な管理がすべて自前になる。これも運用負荷が高く、大規模な環境では破綻するため不正解だ。

(日乃竜胆)IAM stands for Identity and Access Management. It is a mechanism that controls who can access AWS resources. Building a script from the management account to operate each account might look efficient at first glance, but script maintenance and the complex management of cross-account access permissions to each account all become your own burden. This also has high operational overhead and collapses in large-scale environments, making it incorrect.

(蒞星怜空)自作のスクリプトでマルチアカウントを管理か。それは、ガソリンをかぶった状態で野外フェスに参加し、誰かが投げたマッチ一本で神羅万象と一体化するような、極めてスリリングな自滅行為に他ならない。

(蒞星怜空)Managing multi-accounts with custom scripts? That is nothing other than an extremely thrilling act of self-destruction, akin to participating in an outdoor music festival covered in gasoline, becoming one with the universe from a single match thrown by someone else.

(月凪惟緒)文字通り灰になりそうだから絶対にやらないでおくね……。じゃあ、正解は何なの？ 早く教えて、ヒノりん。

(月凪惟緒)It literally sounds like I'll turn to ash, so I'll definitely never do that... So what is the correct answer? Tell me quickly, Hinorin.

(日乃竜胆)ふっ、焦るな。正解の選択肢は、**AWS CloudFormation StackSets** を使用する方法だ。AWS Organizations と統合することで、管理アカウントから一元的に、指定した組織単位（OU）やメンバーアカウント、リジョンに対して自動でCloudFormationテンプレートをデプロイできる。

(日乃竜胆)Hmph, do not be impatient. The correct option is the method using **AWS CloudFormation StackSets**. By integrating with AWS Organizations, you can automatically deploy CloudFormation templates from the management account centrally to specified organizational units (OUs), member accounts, and regions.

(月凪惟緒)スタックセッツ……？ なんかかっこいい響きだけど、具体的にどうすごいわけ？

(月凪惟緒)StackSets...? It sounds kind of cool, but how is it amazing specifically?

(日乃竜胆)よく聞け、月凪。CloudFormation StackSets を使えば、マルチアカウント環境におけるインフラストラクチャのデプロイが完全に自動化される。管理アカウント（またはデプロイ用のアカウント）から一回指示を出すだけで、組織内の複数のアカウントとリージョンへ同時に、かつ安全にリソースを展開できるのだ。運用負荷は最小限に抑えられ、AWS Organizations とのネイティブな統合によりセキュリティも担保される。これこそが、求められていた最適解だ。

(日乃竜胆)Listen well, Tsukinagi. With CloudFormation StackSets, infrastructure deployment in a multi-account environment is completely automated. By giving instructions just once from the management account (or a deployment account), you can deploy resources simultaneously and securely to multiple accounts and regions within the organization. Operational overhead is kept to a minimum, and security is guaranteed through native integration with AWS Organizations. This is the optimal solution that was required.

(蒞星怜空)CloudFormation StackSets。それは、絶対的な王のひと声で、数千の王国を一瞬にして完璧に構築し、そしてまた一瞬にして更地に変えることのできる、冷酷かつ美しい絶対的支配のシステムだな。

(蒞星怜空)CloudFormation StackSets. That is a ruthless and beautiful system of absolute dominion, where a single word from the absolute king can instantly build thousands of kingdoms to perfection, and instantly turn them back into vacant land.

(月凪惟緒)王のひと声って……なんだかスケールが大きすぎて眠くなってきたけど、要するに「一発で全部いい感じにやってくれる魔法のボタン」ってことね。納得したかも。

(蒞星怜空)A king's single word... The scale is so huge I'm getting sleepy, but in short, it means a "magic button that does everything nicely in one shot." I think I get it.

(日乃竜胆)魔法ではなく、洗練されたクラウドアーキテクチャの技術だ。だが、その理解で今回は良しとしよう。本日の講義はここまでだ。しっかり復習をしておくように。

(日乃竜胆)It is not magic, but sophisticated cloud architecture technology. However, I will accept that understanding for today. Today's lecture ends here. Make sure you review thoroughly.
@5
(日乃竜胆)さて、それでは今日のAWS講座を始めようか。目の前にある設問は、AWSのデベロッパー向け資格（DOP）に関連する重要な問題だ。基礎から徹底的に紐解いていく。

(日乃竜胆)Now, let us begin today's AWS lecture. The question before us is an important one related to the AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional exam. We shall unravel it thoroughly, starting from the very basics.

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、お疲れー。なんか今日の空気、マイナス50度くらい凍てついてない？ 私、脳みそが永久凍土だから、溶かすのにちょっとカフェラテ飲んでいい？

(月凪惟緒)Hello there, Hinorin. The air today feels frozen at around minus 50 degrees. Since my brain is permafrost, can I drink some caffe latte to thaw it out a bit?

(蒞星怜空)ほう、永久凍土か。それはちょうどいい。全人類の記憶と社会的な信用が氷の底に閉じ込められていくような、美しくも残酷な絶望の風景が目に浮かぶようだねえ。存分に凍てつくがいいさ。

(蒞星怜空)Ho, permafrost, you say? That is quite fitting. It brings to mind a scenery of beautiful yet cruel despair, much like the memories and social credibility of all humanity being locked away at the bottom of the ice. Freeze to your heart's content.

(日乃竜胆)怜空さん、初っ端から不穏な空気を醸すのはやめるんだ。イオち、カフェラテは後だ。まずは問題文を読むぞ。今回の設問は、AWS環境におけるデプロイメント戦略、あるいはCI/CDパイプラインに関するものだな。

(日乃竜胆)Rea-san, stop creating an ominous atmosphere right from the start. Io-chi, the caffe latte comes later. First, we read the question. Today's question concerns deployment strategies or CI/CD pipelines in an AWS environment.

(月凪惟緒)で、出たよデプロイなんちゃら。それってさぁ、要するにネットの向こうの小人に新しいお洋服を着せるみたいなもんなの？

(月凪惟緒)And here comes that deployment thingy. So basically, is that like dressing up a little goblin on the other side of the internet in a new outfit?

(日乃竜胆)小人などいない。デプロイとは、開発したアプリケーションやシステムをサーバー上で実行可能な状態にし、利用できるように配置することだ。そして今回の問題は、複数の選択肢から最も適切なアーキテクチャや手順を選ぶ形式になっている。まずは誤っている選択肢から順に、なぜそれが間違いなのかを解剖してゆこう。

(日乃竜胆)There are no goblins. Deployment means placing developed applications or systems in a state where they can run on servers and be made available for use. This question asks us to choose the most appropriate architecture and steps from multiple options. First, let us dissect the incorrect options in order and explain why they are wrong.

(蒞星怜空)ふふ、間違った選択肢の解体か。それはまるで、盛大に祝うはずの結婚式の直前に、新郎の過去の全ロマンスがスクリーンに大映しになり、参列者が一斉に目を背けるような、香ばしい破滅のドラマを見ているようで胸が躍るねえ。

(蒞星怜空)Fufu, dismantling the wrong options, are we? It is rather like watching a fragrant drama of ruin, akin to all of the groom's past romances being projected on a big screen right before a grand wedding, causing all the attendees to turn away in unison. My heart dances.
@6
(日乃竜胆)それでは、AWS認定DevOpsエンジニアプロフェッショナル（DOP-C01）の模擬試験問題について講義を始める。心して聞くがいい。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Now, I shall begin the lecture on the AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional (DOP-C01) practice exam questions. Listen closely and prepare your minds.

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、お疲れ様。なんかもう教室の空気が冷凍庫みたいにキンキンに冷えてるんだけど、あたし、今から冬眠して春になったら起きてもいい？

(Tsukinagi Io) Heya, Hinorin. The air in this room feels colder than a chest freezer. Can I just hibernate now and wake up when spring arrives?

(蒞星怜空)冬眠などと言っていられるのは今のうちだけだ、イオち。知識なき者に訪れるのは、春ではなく、深夜のコンテナ置き場で凍死する野良猫のような絶望的な静寂なのだからな。

(Rize Rea) You can only talk about hibernation for now, Io-chi. What awaits the ignorant is not spring, but the desperate silence of a stray cat freezing to death in a midnight container yard.

(日乃竜胆)二人ともそこまでにしておけ。今回の問題は、AWS環境におけるデプロイ戦略、特に「AWS Elastic Beanstalk」を用いたアプリケーションのバージョン更新とローリングアップデートに関するものだ。まずは設問を確認するぞ。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Cut it out, both of you. Today's question is about deployment strategies in the AWS environment, specifically concerning application version updates and rolling updates using AWS Elastic Beanstalk. Let us first review the question itself.

(月凪惟緒)え〜と、なんか横文字がいっぱいで頭がフリーズしそうなんだけど……「AWS Elastic Beanstalk」ってなんなの？ 食べ物？ 美味しそうだけど。

(Tsukinagi Io) Um, there are too many katakana words and my brain is freezing... What even is "AWS Elastic Beanstalk"? Is it food? Sounds delicious though.

(日乃竜胆)食べ物ではない。Elastic Beanstalkとは、インフラの管理を意識することなく、アプリケーションのデプロイやスケーリングを迅速に行うためのプラットフォーム・即ちPaaSのことだ。プログラミング言語のコードを放り込むだけで、裏側で勝手にサーバーやロードバランサーを構築してくれる便利な代物なのだ。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) It is not food. Elastic Beanstalk is a platform—namely a PaaS—that allows you to rapidly deploy and scale applications without needing to worry about underlying infrastructure management. It is a convenient apparatus that automatically constructs servers and load balancers behind the scenes simply by tossing your programming code into it.

(蒞星怜空)ほう、コードを投げ込むだけでサーバーが建つか。それはまるで、アマゾンの奥地で呪文を唱えたら、一晩で自分のサイズにぴったりの拷問部屋が組み上がるようなものだな。便利すぎて背筋が凍るわ。

(Rize Rea) Oh? Servers are built just by throwing in code? That is rather like chanting a spell deep in the Amazon rainforest and having a torture chamber tailored to your exact size assemble overnight. It is so convenient it makes your spine freeze.

(月凪惟緒)ひえ……拷問部屋はちょっといらないかな。で、その便利なビーンストークくんを使って、新しいバージョンにアップデートするときのお話ってこと？

(Tsukinagi Io) Eek... I don't really need a torture room. So this is a story about updating to a new version using that convenient Beanstalk-kun?

(日乃竜胆)その通りだ、イオち。問題では、「Elastic Beanstalk環境で新しいアプリケーションバージョンのデプロイを行う際、既存のインスタンスを一度にすべて置き換えるのではなく、一部ずつ順次置き換えていきたい。可用性を維持しつつ、デプロイ中もリクエストを処理し続けたい場合、どのようなデプロイポリシーを選択すべきか」という状況が問われている。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Precisely, Io-chi. The question asks about a scenario where you deploy a new application version in an Elastic Beanstalk environment, but instead of replacing all existing instances at once, you want to replace them incrementally. If you want to maintain availability and continue processing requests during deployment, what deployment policy should you choose?

(月凪惟緒)一気に変えると危ないから、少しずつ安全に変えたいってことね。ゲームのアップデートで、いきなりサーバーが全部落ちて阿鼻叫喚になるの、よくあるもんね。

(Tsukinagi Io) Changing everything at once is risky, so you want to change it little by little safely. It's just like game updates where all servers suddenly crash and everyone screams in agony—happens all the time.

(蒞星怜空)阿鼻叫喚か。いい響きだ。メンテナンス明けのログイン戦争で、ユーザーが群がる様子はまさに餓鬼の群れだな。で、今回の選択肢には何が並んでいるんだ？

(Rize Rea) Screaming in agony. A wonderful ring to it. The mob of users scrambling during the post-maintenance login war is truly a pack of hungry ghosts. So, what lines up in the choices this time?

(日乃竜胆)選択肢の解説は常に間違いの選択肢から見ていくぞ。まずは「All at Once（一括）」方式だ。これは、環境内のすべてのインスタンスを同時に停止し、新しいバージョンのアプリケーションをデプロイする手法だな。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) We shall always look at the incorrect choices first when explaining the options. First is the "All at Once" method. This is a technique where all instances in the environment are stopped simultaneously, and the new version of the application is deployed.

(月凪惟緒)全部同時に止めちゃうんだ？ それって、一瞬でお店を閉めて、シャッターを下ろした隙に中の内装を全部ガラリと変えちゃうみたいな感じ？

(Tsukinagi Io) You stop everything at the same time? Is that like abruptly closing a shop and remodeling the entire interior while the shutters are down?

(日乃竜胆)そうだ。分かりやすいな、イオち。だが、この方式の致命的な欠点は、デプロイの最中にサービスが完全に停止することだ。可用性を維持するという要件に真っ向から反するため、本番環境でこれをやれば大惨事を引き起こす。当然、不正解だ。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Indeed. Well grasped, Io-chi. However, the fatal flaw of this method is that the service completely stops during the deployment. It directly contradicts the requirement of maintaining availability, so doing this in a production environment will cause a catastrophe. Naturally, it is incorrect.

(蒞星怜空)一斉停止とは潔いな。まるで、旅客機が飛行中に「ちょっとエンジンの形を最新式に変えますね」と、乗客を乗せたまま両方のエンジンを同時に外の空気に放り出すようなものだ。乗客の断末魔が目に浮かぶようだな。

(Rize Rea) Simultaneous shutdown, how resolute. It is rather like an airliner shouting mid-flight, "We're going to update the engine design to the latest model!" and tossing both engines out into the open air while passengers are still inside. The death rattles of the passengers come vividly to mind.

(日乃竜胆)例えが生々しすぎて誰も笑えんぞ、怜空。次、「Immutable（イミュータブル）」デプロイについてだ。これは、既存のインスタンスとは別に、新しいバージョンのインスタンスを裏側で新しく立ち上げ、通信の切り替えが確認できたら古いインスタンスを破棄するという手法だな。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Your analogy is too graphic for anyone to laugh, Rea. Next, let us discuss "Immutable" deployment. This is a method where a new version of instances is launched separately behind the scenes from the existing instances, and once the traffic switch is verified, the old instances are discarded.

(月凪惟緒)新旧のインスタンスを二重に作っちゃうやつね。安全そうだけど、これじゃダメなの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Making both old and new instances simultaneously. Sounds safe, but why isn't this the right one?

(日乃竜胆)Immutableデプロイは確かに非常に安全だが、新しい環境を丸ごと作り直すため、コストと時間が余分にかかる。今回の設問が求めている、インスタンスを一定のバッチサイズで順次置き換えていくという軽量かつシンプルな「ローリング」の要件とは微妙にズレる場合があるのだ。今回の正解の文脈においては適切ではない。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Immutable deployment is certainly very safe, but because it rebuilds an entirely new environment from scratch, it incurs extra cost and time. It sometimes subtly deviates from the lightweight and simple "rolling" requirement requested by this question, which is to replace instances incrementally with a fixed batch size. It is not appropriate in the context of this correct answer.

(蒞星怜空)すべてを捨てて新しく生まれ変わる、か。まるで、過去の黒歴史をすべて忘れるために、戸籍を捨てて南の島で別人に成り済ますようなものだな。だが、リソースの無駄遣いという名の現実が重くのしかかるわけだ。

(Rize Rea) Throwing everything away to be reborn anew, hmm? It is much like discarding your family register and posing as someone else on a southern island just to forget all your past dark history. Yet, the reality named resource waste weighs heavily upon you.

(日乃竜胆)そして次に「Rolling with Additional Batch（追加バッチ付きローリング）」方式だ。これは、ローリングアップデートを行う際に、一時的に新しいインスタンスを追加で起動し、キャパシティを落とさずに順次置き換えていく手法だ。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) And next is the "Rolling with Additional Batch" method. This is a technique where, when performing a rolling update, new instances are temporarily launched in addition, and replacement proceeds incrementally without dropping capacity.

(月凪惟緒)お、追加でバッチってことは、人数を減らさずに交代していく感じ？

(Tsukinagi Io) Oh, "additional batch" means we're swapping out while keeping the headcount constant?

(日乃竜胆)そうだ。だが、今回の設問の要求事項では、追加のインスタンスを余分に用意するコストをかけず、既存のインスタンスの数（キャパシティ）の範囲内で順次置き換えていくことが求められている。追加バッチを使うと余分なリソース消費が発生するため、これも不正解となる。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Exactly. However, the requirements of this question demand replacing instances incrementally within the existing number of instances (capacity) without incurring the cost of preparing extra instances. Using an additional batch incurs extra resource consumption, making this incorrect as well.

(蒞星怜空)余分な人員を確保してから古い奴をクビにする、か。優しさのようでいて、会社の経費を圧迫する無慈悲なリストラ劇の縮図だな。

(Rize Rea) Securing extra personnel before firing the old guys, hmm? It looks like kindness, yet it is a miniature of a merciless restructuring drama that strains company expenses.

(日乃竜胆)そして最後に、正解となる「Rolling（ローリング）」方式についてだ。これは、環境内の既存のインスタンスを一定のバッチサイズ（例えば数台ずつ）に分割し、古いインスタンスを順次停止しながら新しいバージョンのインスタンスに置き換えていく手法だ。これであれば、最小限のリソースで可用性を維持したままデプロイを完了できる。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) And finally, regarding the correct "Rolling" method. This is a technique where existing instances in the environment are divided into fixed batch sizes (for example, a few at a time), and old instances are sequentially stopped while being replaced with new version instances. With this, the deployment can be completed while maintaining availability with minimal resources.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ。少しずつ、今いる人数の中で交代していくから、お金も余分にかからないし、お店も閉めないですむってわけだ。完璧じゃん。

(Tsukinagi Io) I see. You swap them out little by little within the current headcount, so it doesn't cost extra money and you don't have to close the shop. Perfect.

(蒞星怜空)全員を一網打尽にするのではなく、一匹ずつ確実に処理していく。まるで、静寂の夜に忍び寄る暗殺者のような、無駄のないスマートな手際だな。

(Rize Rea) Rather than wiping everyone out in one fell swoop, you dispatch them reliably one by one. It is as neat and seamless as an assassin creeping up in the silent night.

(日乃竜胆)例えがいちいち物騒だが、核心を突いている。AWSのデプロイ戦略の本質を理解できたな。この調子で次の問題も叩き込むぞ、心してかかれ。

(Hinotsuru Rindo) Your analogies are violently unsettling every single time, but you hit the core. You have understood the essence of AWS deployment strategies. We shall drill the next question into you with this same momentum, so brace yourselves.
@7
(日乃竜胆)それでは、本日のAWS講義を始める。今日の主題はAWS CodeBuildを用いたビルドプロセス、とりわけビルド環境のカスタムイメージやプライベートリポジトリからの依存関係取得に関わる挙動の検証だ。心して聞くように。

(Hino Rindo) Now, let us begin today's AWS lecture. Our main topic is the build process using AWS CodeBuild, specifically verifying behaviors related to custom build images and fetching dependencies from private repositories. Pay close attention.

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、おはよ〜。なんか今日も空気がキリッとしてて、冷凍庫のなかに頭突っ込んだみたいな清々しさだね。でも、AWSとかコードビルドとか言われると、脳みそが液状化して流れ出しそうなんですけど。

(Tsukina Io) Morning, Hino-rin. The air feels crisp today, like stuffing my head straight into a freezer. But hearing words like AWS or CodeBuild makes my brain liquefy and start leaking out.

(蒞星怜空)脳が液状化するだけで済むなら安上がりだな、イオち。現実はもっと残酷だ。手塩にかけて育てたコードが、一寸先の闇へと消え去り、暗黒のビルドエラーという名の巨人が毎夜ベッドの足元に立ち塞がるような、そんな絶望的かつ美しい崩壊の予感がすでに漂っているぞ。

(Rize Rea) Consider yourself lucky if it's just liquefying, Io-chi. Reality is far more brutal. The code you lovingly nurtured vanishes into the pitch-black abyss, leaving you with the desperate and beautiful premonition of a giant named "dark build error" standing at the foot of your bed every night.

(日乃竜胆)不穏な比喩で初学者を怯えさせるな、怜空。まあいい、まずは今回の設問を確認するぞ。画面の通り、AWS CodeBuildでカスタムDockerイメージやプライベートサブネット、外部リポジトリのクレデンシャルをどう扱うかという極めて実践的で重要な問題だ。イオち、まずは問題文を読んで、どこがチンプンカンプンか正直に吐き出しなさい。

(Hino Rindo) Do not terrify the beginner with ominous metaphors, Rea. Very well, let us first examine the question. As shown on the screen, this is a highly practical and crucial problem regarding how AWS CodeBuild handles custom Docker images, private subnets, and credentials for external repositories. Io-chi, read the question first and confess honestly what part looks like total gibberish to you.

(月凪惟緒)えっとね、問題文には「AWS CodeBuildのビルドプロジェクトを作成しており、カスタムDockerイメージを指定して……」って書いてある。そもそも「ビルドプロジェクト」とか「カスタムDockerイメージ」の時点で、私のなかの辞書には載ってない単語のオンパレードなんだけど。

(Tsukina Io) Um, the question says, "You are creating an AWS CodeBuild build project and specifying a custom Docker image..." Right off the bat, "build project" and "custom Docker image" are a parade of words that don't exist anywhere in my internal dictionary.

(日乃竜胆)ほう、基礎の基礎からだな。耳の穴をかっぽじってよく聞きなさい。「AWS CodeBuild」とは、ソースコードをコンパイルし、テストを実行し、デプロイ可能なパッケージを作成する、いわゆるフルマネージドなビルドサービスだ。自分でビルド用のサーバーを立てて管理する必要がなく、AWSが勝手に裏で用意してくれる。そして「カスタムDockerイメージ」とは、そのビルドを実行するための環境――つまりOSや必要なツールが最初から詰め込まれた特製の玉手箱のようなものだ。標準で用意されているイメージではなく、自分好みにカスタマイズした環境を使いたい場合に指定する。

(Hino Rindo) Ho, starting right from the fundamentals, are we? Clean out your ears and listen carefully. "AWS CodeBuild" is a fully managed build service that compiles source code, runs tests, and produces deployable packages. You do not need to provision or manage your own build servers; AWS handles it behind the scenes. And a "custom Docker image" is a special treasure box pre-packed with the OS and necessary tools needed to execute that build. You specify it when you want an environment tailored to your liking rather than using the standard provided images.

(日乃竜胆)
Let me spell it out. AWS CodeBuild is your digital assembly line, and a custom Docker image is the custom-built uniform your workers wear.

(月凪惟緒)へぇ〜、ビルド専用の使い捨てロボット工場みたいな感じ？ で、そのカスタムイメージを使うときに、なんか面倒なトラブルが起きるわけだ。

(Tsukina Io) Hmm, so it's like a disposable robot factory just for building stuff? And I guess some annoying trouble happens when using that custom image.

(蒞星怜空)おや、イオちにしては冴えているな。その通り、便利なカスタムイメージには、地獄への片道切符が同封されているものだ。プライベートリポジトリから依存関係を引っ張ってこようとした瞬間、セキュリティという名の厳重なガードマンに阻まれ、ビルドが虚空へと消え去る。まさに阿鼻叫叫の地獄絵図だな。

(Rize Rea) Oh, quite sharp of you today, Io-chi. Exactly, convenient custom images often come with a one-way ticket to hell. The moment you try pulling dependencies from a private repository, strict security guards block your path, and your build vanishes into the void. Truly a scene from the Buddhist realms of suffering.

(日乃竜胆)怜空の不吉な語りは無視しなさい。だが、事象の核心を突いてはいる。今回の設問では、カスタムDockerイメージを使用してプライベートなGitHubリポジトリや外部サービスから依存関係をダウンロードする際、どの設定や前提を見落とすとエラーになるのかが問われている。まずは、不正解の選択肢から順に、なぜそれが間違いなのかを徹底的に解剖してやろう。

(Hino Rindo) Ignore Rea's ominous narration. However, she hits the core of the phenomenon. This question asks what settings or prerequisites are overlooked, causing errors when using a custom Docker image to download dependencies from a private GitHub repository or external service. First, let us thoroughly dissect the incorrect choices one by one to understand why they are wrong.

(月凪惟緒)間違った選択肢からいくんだね。了解。じゃあ、まずは一つ目のハズレ選択肢から教えて、ひのりん。

(Tsukina Io) We're starting with the wrong choices. Understood. So, hit me with the first incorrect choice, Hino-rin.

(日乃竜胆)よし。一つ目の不正解の選択肢について解説する。よくある誤解として、「カスタムDockerイメージを利用する場合、CodeBuildのプロジェクト設定でVPCの外部へのアクセスを禁止するパブリックサブネットではなく、プライベートサブネットに配置し、かつNATゲートウェイを経由させれば、外部のプライベートリポジトリへの認証情報が自動的に解決される」というものがあるが、これは間違いだ。

(Hino Rindo) Very well. I shall explain the first incorrect choice. A common misconception is that when using a custom Docker image, placing the CodeBuild project in a private subnet (rather than a public one restricting outbound access) and routing it through a NAT gateway will automatically resolve credentials for external private repositories. But this is incorrect.

(日乃竜胆)
A common fallacy: assuming network routing solves authentication. It does not.

(月凪惟緒)えっと、VPCとかサブネットってなに、それ美味しいの？ あと、プライベートリポジトリの認証情報って自動じゃダメなの？

(Tsukina Io) Um, what even is a VPC or a subnet? Are they edible? And why can't credentials for a private repository be automatic?

(蒞星怜空)美味しいわけがないだろう、イオち。VPCとは、AWSという巨大迷宮の中に自分だけのプライベートな隔離病棟を作るようなものだ。外の世界と遮断されたその空間から、どうやって外の金庫の鍵を手に入れるか――ネットワークの道が通っていようが、鍵を持っていなければ警備員に射殺されるだけだ。

(Rize Rea) They are certainly not edible, Io-chi. A VPC is like building your own private isolation ward inside the giant labyrinth of AWS. Even if the network path is open from that isolated space, if you don't hold the key to the outside safe, the guards will simply shoot you on sight.

(日乃竜胆)怜空の例えは相変わらず物騒だが、言いたいことは正しい。VPCやサブネットはネットワークの「道」を整えるにすぎない。プライベートリポジトリにアクセスするための「鍵」、すなわちSSHキーやアクセストークンといった認証情報は、ネットワークが繋がっているだけでは勝手に補完されない。これがこの選択肢が不正解である理由だ。ネットワーク経路の確保と、認証情報の管理は全く別の次元の課題なのだ。

(Hino Rindo) Rea's analogy is threatening as usual, but her point is correct. VPCs and subnets merely set up the network "roads." The "keys" to access a private repository—such as SSH keys or access tokens—are not magically supplied just because the network is connected. This is why this choice is incorrect. Securing the network path and managing credentials are entirely different dimensions of problems.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ。道が通ってても、通行手形を持ってなきゃ門前払いされるってことね。じゃあ、次のハズレ選択肢はどうなの？

(Tsukina Io) I see. Even if the road is open, you get turned away at the gate without a travel permit. So, what about the next wrong choice?

(日乃竜胆)次に、二つ目の不正解の選択肢だ。「CodeBuildのサービスロールに、AWS Systems Manager Parameter StoreやSecrets Managerへのアクセス権限を付与し忘れていても、ビルドスペック（buildspec.yml）内で環境変数に直接平文のパスワードを書き込んでおけば、カスタムイメージのビルドは安全に成功する」というものだが、これも明確に間違いだ。

(Hino Rindo) Next, the second incorrect choice. It claims that "even if you forget to grant permissions to AWS Systems Manager Parameter Store or Secrets Manager in the CodeBuild service role, as long as you hardcode plaintext passwords directly into environment variables within the buildspec.yml, the custom image build will safely succeed." This is also blatantly wrong.

(日乃竜胆)
Hardcoding secrets in buildspec is an open invitation to digital robbery.

(月凪惟緒)え、パスワードを直接コードに書いちゃダメなの？ 私、パスワード全部「1234」とかにしてるけど……って、そういう問題じゃないか。なんでダメなの？

(Tsukina Io) Huh, you're not allowed to write passwords directly in the code? I make all my passwords "1234"... though that's probably not the point here. Why is it bad?

(蒞星怜空)「1234」とはまた、全米を震え上がらせるほどの凄まじい絶望的セキュリティセンスだな、イオち。ソースコードや設定ファイルに平文のパスワードを刻むということは、自宅の玄関の鍵をドブ川に投げ捨てて「どうぞご自由に泥棒してください」と全裸で街頭に立つようなものだ。ビルドログやリポジトリの履歴から秒で露見し、全世界にあなたのプライベートが全裸で晒されることになる。

(Rize Rea) "1234"—what an astonishingly despair-inducing security sense that makes the entire nation shudder, Io-chi. Carving plaintext passwords into source code or configuration files is like throwing your front door key into a drainage ditch and standing naked on the street shouting, "Please feel free to rob me!" It gets exposed from build logs or repository history in seconds, stripping your privacy bare for the whole world to see.

(日乃竜胆)怜空の言う通りだ。セキュリティの観点から平文の機密情報は厳禁であることは言うまでもないが、それ以前に、CodeBuildでは機密情報を安全に扱うためにSecrets ManagerやParameter Store、あるいはCodeBuildの暗号化環境変数を利用する仕組みが用意されている。それらを適切に設定せず、単に平文を書けばいいというものではない。これが第二の不正解の理由だ。

(Hino Rindo) Exactly as Rea says. It goes without saying that plaintext secrets are strictly prohibited from a security standpoint, but even before that, CodeBuild provides mechanisms like Secrets Manager, Parameter Store, or encrypted environment variables in CodeBuild to handle sensitive data securely. Simply writing them in plaintext without proper configuration does not solve the problem. This is the reason for the second incorrect choice.

(月凪惟緒)ひえ〜、恐ろしい世の中だねぇ。自分のパスワードが全世界に打ち上げ花火みたいに打ち上げられるのだけは勘弁だな。じゃあ、最後のハズレ選択肢は？

(Tsukina Io) Yikes, what a terrifying world. Having my password shot up into the sky like fireworks is something I'd definitely like to avoid. So, what's the last wrong choice?

(日乃竜胆)三つ目の不正解の選択肢だ。「カスタムDockerイメージを使用する場合、CodeBuildは自動的にホスト側のDockerデーモンにあるキャッシュや認証情報をコンテナ内に引き継ぐため、明示的なログイン処理やクレデンシャルの設定を行う必要はない」というものだ。これも大いなる勘違いだな。

(Hino Rindo) The third incorrect choice. It claims that "when using a custom Docker image, CodeBuild automatically inherits caches and credentials from the host Docker daemon into the container, so there is no need to perform explicit login processing or credential configuration." This is also a major misconception.

(日乃竜胆)
Assumptions are the mother of all build failures. The container lives in its own insulated reality.

(月凪惟緒)コンテナってなに？ お弁当のプラスチック容器みたいなやつ？

(Tsukina Io) What's a container? Like a plastic bento box?

(蒞星怜空)あながち遠くはないぞ、イオち。お弁当の容器ならまだ美味そうな匂いがするが、Dockerのコンテナとは、外界から完璧に隔離された冷徹なガラスの小箱のようなものだ。外の世界の温もりや親切心など一切届かない。自分で中に必要な道具と鍵を持ち込まなければ、箱の中で餓死する運命にある。

(Rize Rea) Not far off, Io-chi. A bento box at least smells appetizing, but a Docker container is like a cold, glass box perfectly isolated from the outside world. The warmth and kindness of the outside universe never reach it. If you don't bring your own necessary tools and keys inside, you are doomed to starve to death within that box.

(日乃竜胆)怜空の詩的な絶望表現はさておき、Dockerコンテナは独立した環境として動作するため、ホスト側の認証情報やセッションが勝手にコンテナ内に共有されることはない。プライベートリポジトリからクローン等を行うためには、コンテナのビルドプロセス内で明示的に認証を行い、クレデンシャルを渡す必要がある。これが第三の不正解の理由だ。

(Hino Rindo) Setting aside Rea's poetic despair, Docker containers operate as independent environments, meaning host-side credentials and sessions are never automatically shared inside the container. To clone from a private repository, you must explicitly authenticate and pass credentials within the container's build process. This is the reason for the third incorrect choice.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ。コンテナの中の人は外の世界から完全ぼっち状態だから、自分でパスワードとか用意してあげないと何もできないわけだ。

(Tsukina Io) I see. The person inside the container is completely isolated from the outside world, so unless you provide them with passwords and stuff, they can't do anything.

(日乃竜胆)その通りだ。よく理解できたな。そして、これらすべての間違いをクリアし、カスタムDockerイメージ環境下でプライベートリポジトリから安全に依存関係を取得するための正解が導き出される。

(Hino Rindo) Precisely. You grasped that well. And by clearing all these misconceptions, we arrive at the correct answer for securely fetching dependencies from a private repository under a custom Docker image environment.

(日乃竜胆)
Correct configuration bridges the chasm between isolated execution and external dependency retrieval.

(月凪惟緒)じゃあ、いよいよ正解の選択肢の番だね。どうすればいいの、ひのりん？

(Tsukina Io) So, it's finally time for the correct choice. What do we need to do, Hino-rin?

(日乃竜胆)正解の選択肢は、「CodeBuildのプロジェクト設定やビルドスペック（buildspec.yml）において、AWS Secrets ManagerやParameter Storeに安全に保管されたプライベートリポジトリ用のアクセス認証情報（SSHキーやアクセストークン等）を参照するように構成し、ビルドの初期段階（installフェーズなど）でそれらを取得して適切に認証・設定を行うこと」だ。これにより、セキュリティを担保しながら、プライベートリポジトリからの依存関係の取得が正常に完了する。

(Hino Rindo) The correct choice is: "Configure the CodeBuild project settings or buildspec (buildspec.yml) to reference access credentials (such as SSH keys or access tokens) for the private repository securely stored in AWS Secrets Manager or Parameter Store, and fetch them during the initial stages of the build (such as the install phase) to properly authenticate and configure." This ensures security while successfully completing the retrieval of dependencies from the private repository.

(月凪惟緒)へぇ〜！ 安全な金庫（Secrets Manager）から鍵をこっそり借りてきて、ビルの最初にちゃんとガチャって鍵を開けてから中に入る、ってわけだ。なんか、スパイ映画みたいでかっこいいじゃん。

(Tsukina Io) Wow! So it borrows a key stealthily from a secure safe (Secrets Manager), unlocks the door properly at the very beginning of the build, and steps inside. Sounds kind of cool, like a spy movie.

(蒞星怜空)スパイ映画というよりは、厳重な要塞に忍び込んで一歩間違えれば処刑されるスリリングな潜入劇だな。だが、その仕組みを理解した瞬間、混沌としたエラーの霧は晴れ、完璧なアーキテクチャの光景が目の前に広がる。まあ、次の瞬間には別のバグという名の怪物が這い出してくるのだがな。

(Rize Rea) Rather than a spy movie, it's a thrilling infiltration drama where one misstep gets you executed inside a heavily guarded fortress. But the moment you understand that mechanism, the fog of chaotic errors clears, and the glorious architecture spreads before your eyes. Well, the next second, another monster called a bug will crawl out anyway.

(日乃竜胆)不吉な予言で締めるな、怜空。だが、イオちの理解で概ね正しい。CodeBuildにおけるカスタムイメージ利用時の認証情報管理は、セキュリティと利便性のバランスを取る上で極めて重要なポイントだ。これにて今回の問題のレクチャーとディスカッションを終了する。二人とも、しっかりと頭に叩き込んでおくように。

(Hino Rindo) Do not close with ominous prophecies, Rea. Still, Io-chi's understanding is largely correct. Managing credentials when using custom images in CodeBuild is a crucial point for balancing security and convenience. With this, our lecture and discussion on this question conclude. Both of you, make sure to hammer this firmly into your brains.
@8
(日乃竜胆)それでは、本日はAWSのプロフェッショナル DevOpsエンジニア（DOP）試験の演習問題について、徹底的な講義を行おう。心して聞くことだな。本日の題材はDOP-1001の問1010だ。クラウドの深淵を覗く覚悟はいいか？

(Hino Rindo) Now, today I shall deliver a thorough lecture on the practice questions for the AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional (DOP) exam. Prepare yourselves. Today's subject is Question 1010 from DOP-1001. Are you ready to peer into the abyss of the cloud?

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、おはよ〜。なんか今日も空気が氷点下って感じでチルいね。てか、AWSってあれでしょ？ 空に浮かぶ雲をモコモコいじるお仕事？ 私、眠くなってきたから、横でダンゴムシみたいに丸まってていい？

(Tsukinagi Io) Morning, Hino-rin. Somehow the air feels below freezing today, totally chill. Wait, AWS is like, that job where you poke fluffy clouds in the sky, right? I'm getting sleepy, so can I just curl up like a roly-poly bug over here?

(蒞星怜空)ほう、永久凍土から這い出してきた原始生命体がまた何か戯言をほざいているな。雲をいじるどころか、現代のITインフラという名の巨大な屠殺場で、無数のサーバーという名の家畜が断末魔の悲鳴を上げながら自動デプロイの処刑台に送られる、実に血沸き肉躍る地獄絵図だというのに。まあ、せいぜい冷えた頭で高見の見物としゃれ込むとしようか。

(Rize Rea) Oh, look, a primitive life form crawling out of the permafrost is muttering nonsense again. Far from poking clouds, it's a thrilling panorama of a modern IT infrastructure slaughterhouse where countless server livestock scream their dying gasps as they are marched to the automated deployment guillotine. Well, I suppose I'll sit back and enjoy the spectacle with a chilled head.

(日乃竜胆)ふっ、相変わらず不穏で救いのない例えだな、怜空さんは。だが、あながち間違いではない。今回の問題は、AWS環境におけるアプリケーションのデプロイ自動化と、その裏側で蠢くセキュリティや権限管理の機微を問う極めて実戦的な良問だ。イオち、少しは目を覚ますのだ。まずは問題の前提知識から叩き込んでやろう。

(Hino Rindo) Hmph, as ominous and hopeless an analogy as ever, Rea-san. But you're not entirely wrong. This question is an exceptionally practical, fine problem that tests the automation of application deployments in an AWS environment and the subtleties of security and permission management writhing beneath the surface. Io-chi, wake up a little. First, I'm going to hammer the prerequisite knowledge into you.

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)は〜い、ひのりんの厳しいお説教タイムが始まっちゃったよぉ。ねえ、そもそも「デプロイ」って何だっけ？ 美味しいデパ地下のスイーツのこと？

(Tsukinagi Io) Yay, Hino-rin's harsh lecture time has begun. Hey, what even is "deploy" again? Is it some delicious basement department store sweets?

(日乃竜胆)全く、脳みそまで永久凍土に侵されているのか？ デプロイとは、開発したプログラムやシステムをサーバーなどの本番環境に配置し、実際に稼働可能な状態にすることを指す。AWSでは、これを自動化するために「AWS CodeDeploy」というサービスや、構成管理ツールである「AWS Systems Manager（SSM）」などが用いられるのだ。

(Hino Rindo) Good grief, has your brain been invaded by permafrost too? Deployment refers to placing developed programs or systems into a production environment like servers and making them actually operational. In AWS, services like "AWS CodeDeploy" and configuration management tools like "AWS Systems Manager (SSM)" are used to automate this.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(蒞星怜空)自動化ねえ……。人間が手動でやればヒューマンエラーという名の愛すべき神聖な狂気が生まれるものを、冷徹なスクリプトが寸分の狂いもなく破滅への道を爆走していく様は、まさにシベリア送りになった政治犯の列を眺めているような圧倒的な虚無感を感じさせて悪くない。だが、今回の問題の肝はそこではない。鍵を握るのは「IAMロール」と「カスタマーマネージドキー」の権限の迷宮だ。

(Rize Rea) Automation, huh... When humans do things manually, that lovable, sacred madness called human error is born, but watching a cold script sprint toward ruin without an inch of deviation gives an overwhelming sense of nihilism reminiscent of a line of political prisoners sent to Siberia, which isn't half bad. However, that's not the crux of this problem. The keys that hold the power are the labyrinth of permissions for "IAM roles" and "customer-managed keys."

(月凪惟緒)あいあんろーる？ かすたーまーまねーじどきー？ なんか呪文みたいで頭がキーンってきた。かき氷の食べ過ぎみたいな頭痛がするよぉ。

(Tsukinagi Io) IAM role? Customer-managed key? It sounds like a spell and my head is throbbing. I've got a headache like I ate too much shaved ice.

(日乃竜胆)我慢するのだ、イオち。一つずつ紐解いていく。まず「IAM（AWS Identity and Access Management）」とは、AWSのリソースへのアクセスを安全に管理するための仕組みだ。そして「IAMロール」とは、AWSリソースに一時的な権限を付与するための身分証のようなものだな。次に「KMS（AWS Key Management Service）」における「カスタマーマネージドキー（CMK）」とは、データの暗号化・復号を行う鍵であり、ユーザー自身が作成し、ローテーションやアクセス権限を完全にコントロールできる特別な鍵のことだ。

(Hino Rindo) Bear with it, Io-chi. We will untangle them one by one. First, "IAM (AWS Identity and Access Management)" is a mechanism for securely managing access to AWS resources. And an "IAM role" is like an ID card used to grant temporary permissions to AWS resources. Next, a "Customer-Managed Key (CMK)" in "KMS (AWS Key Management Service)" is a key used for data encryption and decryption, a special key that you create yourself and whose rotation and access permissions you can completely control.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(蒞星怜空)ほう、鍵の管理か。他人に預けた合鍵で夜な夜な自分の部屋が荒らされるような、底知れぬ恐怖と背徳感を伴うガバナンスの象徴だな。暗号化の鍵を制する者はクラウドを制し、そして鍵の権限設定を誤った者は、自ら掘った底なし沼の底で静かに窒息死する。実に素晴らしいスリルだ。

(Rize Rea) Oh, key management, you say? It's the symbol of governance accompanied by a fathomless terror and背徳感 (sense of forbidden pleasure), like having your room ransacked night after night with a spare key you lent to someone else. He who controls the encryption keys controls the cloud, and he who misconfigures the key permissions quietly suffocates at the bottom of a bottomless pit he dug himself. Truly a magnificent thrill.

(日乃竜胆)不吉な例えはやめるのだ、怜空さん。初心者が怯えるだろうが。さて、今回の設問では、CodeDeployやSystems Managerを使ってアプリケーションをデプロイする際、暗号化された秘匿情報（シークレットなど）を安全に復号して処理するための権限設定が問われている。ここで重要なのは、どのサービスが、どのIAMロールを使い、どのKMSキーに対してどのような権限（許可）を持っていなければならないかという点だ。

(Hino Rindo) Stop with the ominous analogies, Rea-san. You'll frighten the beginner. Now, in this question, when deploying applications using CodeDeploy or Systems Manager, it asks about the permission settings required to securely decrypt and process encrypted confidential information (like secrets). What is important here is which service uses which IAM role, and what permissions (allowances) it must have regarding which KMS key.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)えっと、要するに、お宝の入った宝箱（暗号化データ）を開けるためには、ちゃんとした合鍵（KMSキー）と、開けていいよっていう通行手形（IAMロールの権限）の両方が揃ってないと、宝箱が爆発しちゃうってこと？

(Tsukinagi Io) Um, so basically, to open the treasure chest containing the loot (encrypted data), if you don't have both the proper spare key (KMS key) and a safe-conduct pass saying it's okay to open it (IAM role permission), the treasure chest will explode?

(日乃竜胆)……例えのセンスはともかく、本質を捉えているな、イオち。流石は私の幼馴染だ。その通り、デプロイメントの過程でシークレットを復号する主体（CodeDeployのエージェントやSSM Run Commandなど）が、KMSキーに対する復号（Decrypt）権限を持っていなければ、処理は容赦なく失敗するのだ。

(Hino Rindo) ...... Putting aside the taste of your analogy, you've grasped the essence, Io-chi. As expected of my childhood friend. Exactly, if the entity decrypting the secret during the deployment process (such as the CodeDeploy agent or SSM Run Command) does not have decryption (Decrypt) permissions for the KMS key, the process will fail mercilessly.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(蒞星怜空)そうだ。そして悲劇なのは、ログには冷酷に「AccessDenied」という文字だけが吐き出され、開発者は深夜の冷たいオフィスで絶望のあまり頭を抱え、やがて精神のバランスを崩して社内ニートへと変貌を遂げていく。システムエラーが織りなす人間模様メンヘラ化のコンチェルト、実に美しい崩壊劇だといえよう。

(Rize Rea) Indeed. And the tragedy is that the log coldly spits out only the word "AccessDenied," and the developer clutches their head in despair in a cold office late at night, eventually losing mental balance and transforming into an in-house corporate neet. The concerto of mental instability woven by system errors—one might call it a truly beautiful spectacle of collapse.

(日乃竜胆)だから不穏な空気を作るなと言っているだろう！ いいか、ここからが本題だ。選択肢の検証に入るぞ。問題の指示通り、まずは「間違った選択肢」から順に徹底的に解剖してやる。心して聞くことだな。

(Hino Rindo) I told you not to create an ominous atmosphere! Listen, this is where the real work begins. We are entering the verification of the options. As instructed, we will thoroughly dissect **the "incorrect options" in order**. Prepare yourselves to listen closely.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)うわぁ、容赦ない解剖ショーの始まりだぁ。私、血を見るのは苦手だけど、ひのりんの冷たい視線ならちょっとゾクゾクするかも。

(Tsukinagi Io) Wow, the merciless dissection show is starting. I'm not good with the sight of blood, but Hino-rin's cold gaze gives me a bit of a thrill.

(日乃竜胆)ふざけていないで聞くのだ。間違った選択肢では、しばしば「IAMロールのプリンシパル（実行主体）ではなく、KMSキーのキーポリシー側にのみ権限を記述すれば足りる」といった誤った前提や、サービス固有のロールに必要なアクション（`kms:Decrypt`など）が欠落しているものが提示される。これらはなぜ間違いなのか、構造から叩き込んでやる。

(Hino Rindo) Stop joking and listen. The incorrect options often present false premises, such as "it is sufficient to write permissions only on the key policy side of the KMS key, not on the principal (execution entity) side of the IAM role," or they lack necessary actions (such as `kms:Decrypt`) in the service-specific role. I will hammer into you from a structural standpoint why these are wrong.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(蒞星怜空)片側の門戸だけを開いて、もう片方の門戸を固く閉ざす……それはまるで、招かれざる客を待ちわびるあまり、玄関の鍵を全開にしたまま窓に鉄格子を嵌めて自ら室内に閉じこもる狂人の振る舞いだな。AWSの権限管理において、IAM側とKMSキー側の両方（双方向）で許可が明示されていなければ、セキュリティの女神は冷酷に微笑みながらアクセスを拒絶する。片方だけを信じる者は、砂上の楼閣を建てるより滑稽だ。

(Rize Rea) Opening only one gate while keeping the other tightly shut... That is like the behavior of a madman who, eagerly awaiting an uninvited guest, leaves the front door wide open while putting iron bars on the windows and locking himself inside. In AWS permission management, unless permission is explicitly granted on both the IAM side and the KMS key side (two-way), the goddess of security will coldly smile and reject access. Those who believe in only one side are more foolish than those who build castles on sand.

(日乃竜胆)流石は師匠、一刀両断だな。その通りだ。KMSキーを使用した暗号化・復号において、AWSでは「IAMポリシーによる許可」と「KMSキーポリシーによる許可」の**両方**が必須となる。片方が欠けている選択肢は、例外なく不正解、つまりゴミ屑同然のダミー選択肢なのだ。

(Hino Rindo) As expected of my master, a clean cut. Exactly. In encryption and decryption using KMS keys, AWS requires **both** "permission by IAM policy" and "permission by KMS key policy." Options missing either one are without exception incorrect—meaning they are trash-tier dummy choices.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)へぇ〜、両思いじゃないとダメってことね。片思いだけじゃアクセスしてもらえないなんて、なんだか切ない恋の物語みたい。AWSって案外ロマンチストなんだね。

(Tsukinagi Io) Huh, so it has to be mutual love, right? Not getting access with just a one-sided crush sounds kind of like a bittersweet love story. AWS is surprisingly romantic.

(日乃竜胆)ロマンチストではなく厳格なセキュリティの原則だ。セキュリティの文脈に甘ったれた感傷を持ち込むな、イオち。不正解の選択肢に仕込まれた、もう一つのよくある罠は「不適切な権限のスコープ（過剰な権限付与）」や「存在しないアクション名」の指定だ。例えば、すべてのリソースに対して全権限を与えるようなワイルドカード（`*`）を安易に使っている選択肢や、CodeDeployのエージェントではなく無関係な別のサービスロールに暗号化解除の権限を与えているようなものは、原則としてすべて不正解となる。

(Hino Rindo) It's not romantic; it's a strict principle of security. Do not bring sweet sentimentality into the context of security, Io-chi. Another common trap hidden in incorrect options is the specification of "inappropriate permission scopes (over-permission)" or "non-existent action names." For example, options that carelessly use wildcards (`*`) to grant all permissions to all resources, or those that grant decryption permissions to an unrelated service role instead of the CodeDeploy agent, are all fundamentally incorrect.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(蒞星怜空)全てを許す優しさは、セキュリティの世界では最も邪悪な毒薬に等しい。全権限を与える`*`の記述を見た瞬間、監査法人の鬼のような形相をした男たちが地平線の彼方から血走った目を輝かせて押し寄せてくる足音が聞こえるようだ。不要な権限の開放は、自らの首に絞首刑のロープをかけ、自分で踏み台を蹴り飛ばすようなものだな。

(Rize Rea) Kindness that forgives everything is equivalent to the most wicked poison in the world of security. The moment I see the wildcard `*` granting all permissions, I can hear the approaching footsteps of men with demonic expressions from auditing firms surging from beyond the horizon with bloodshot eyes. Opening unnecessary permissions is like putting a hangman's noose around your own neck and kicking away the stool yourself.

(日乃竜胆)例えがいちいち物騒で過激すぎるのだ、怜空さんは。だが、言わんとすることは正しい。最小権限の原則（Least Privilege）に反する選択肢、あるいは主客が転導した権限設定を行っている選択肢は、すべてバッサリと切り捨てるべきだ。

(Hino Rindo) Your analogies are too menacing and radical every single time, Rea-san. But what you're trying to say is correct. Options that violate the Principle of Least Privilege, or those that have inverted subject-object permission settings, should all be slashed away without hesitation.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ……。間違った選択肢たちは、いわば「鍵穴の形が全然違うのに、力任せに突っ込んで壊しちゃった人たち」みたいなもんか。で、最後に残ったお利口さんな選択肢が正解になる、と。

(Tsukinagi Io) I see... The incorrect options are like "people who aggressively jammed the wrong key into a keyhole and broke it." And the smart option left at the end becomes the correct answer.

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だな、イオち。その通りだ。すべての不正解の選択肢をこのように消去法および構造的欠陥の指摘によって排除していった結果、唯一残るのが「正解の選択肢」となる。正解の選択肢では、IAMロールに適切なKMS復号権限（`kms:Decrypt`など）が最小限のスコープで付与されており、かつKMSのキーポリシー側でもそのIAMロールからのアクセスがしっかりと許可されている。双方向の信頼関係が完璧に構築されているわけだ。

(Hino Rindo) Astute, Io-chi. Exactly. As a result of eliminating all incorrect options through this elimination method and pointing out structural defects, the only one that remains is the "correct answer." In the correct answer, the IAM role is granted appropriate KMS decryption permissions (such as `kms:Decrypt`) with a minimum scope, and the KMS key policy also firmly permits access from that IAM role. A bidirectional trust relationship is perfectly established.

(Hino Rindo)
(Hino Rindo)

(蒞星怜空)お互いを疑い合い、幾重もの契約と証明書という名の冷たい鎖で縛り合って初めて成り立つ信頼関係……まるで冷戦時代のスパイ組織のようだ。だが、クラウドという名の不確実な虚空においては、その冷徹なまでの猜疑心こそがシステムを破滅から救う唯一の防壁となる。美しい、実に美しく歪んだ最適解だな。

(Rize Rea) A relationship of trust that can only be established by suspecting each other and binding each other with cold chains called layers of contracts and certificates... It's just like a spy organization during the Cold War. But in the uncertain void called the cloud, that cold suspicion is the only barrier that saves the system from ruin. Beautiful, a truly beautifully distorted optimal solution.

(日乃竜胆)ふう、これで今回の設問の背景、前提知識、そして不正解と正解の選択肢の構造的な違いについての解説は完了だ。イオち、少しは頭の永久凍土も溶けたか？

(Hino Rindo) Phew, this completes the explanation of the background, prerequisite knowledge, and structural differences between incorrect and correct options for this question. Io-chi, has the permafrost in your brain melted even a little bit?

(月凪惟緒)うーん、頭は相変わらずチルいままだけど、AWSの世界がなんだか人間関係みたいにドロドロしてて面白いってことは分かったよ。ひのりん、今日も熱い講義お疲れ様。今度ご褒美にデパ地下のスイーツ奢ってね。

(Tsukinagi Io) Hmm, my head is still as chill as ever, but I understand that the world of AWS is kind of muddy and messy like human relationships, which is interesting. Hino-rin, thanks for the passionate lecture today. Next time, treat me to department store sweets as a reward.

(日乃竜胆)やれやれ、最後まで調子の狂うやつだ。だが、お前が少しでも理解できたなら、この講義を行った甲斐もあったというものだな。それでは本日のセッションはこれにて終了とする。解散！

(Hino Rindo) Good grief, always throwing off my rhythm to the very end. But if you understood even a little, it was worth holding this lecture. Well then, today's session is concluded. Dismissed!
@9
(日乃竜胆) 良いか、イオち、そして師匠。本日はAWSの認定試験、DOP（DevOps Engineer - Professional）の問1001から問1010の中から、特に初学者が躓きやすいアーキテクチャの核心について徹底的に解き明かしていく。心して聞くがいい。

(Hinata Rindo) Listen carefully, Io-chi, and Master. Today, we are going to thoroughly unravel the core of the cloud architectures that beginners easily stumble upon, selected from questions 1001 to 1010 of the AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional exam. Be prepared.

(月凪惟緒) ひのりん、お疲れ様。なんかもう部屋の空気が重すぎて、私の永遠の眠りを邪魔されてる気分なんだけど……。でも、クラウドとかよくわかんないから、適当に聞き流していい？

(Tsukina Io) Good work, Hino-rin. Somehow the air in this room is so heavy, I feel like my eternal sleep is being disturbed... But since I don't really get cloud stuff, can I just zone out?

(蒞星怜空) 永遠の眠りとは芳醇な響きだな。だが、お前のその脳内のお花畑は、これから私が投下する容赦なきコンテナ群とサーバーレスの猛火によって、綺麗に焼き尽くされる運命にある。せいぜいあがくがいい。

(Rize Rea) Eternal sleep has a rich ring to it. But that flower garden inside your brain is destined to be cleanly scorched away by the merciless swarm of containers and serverless raging fires I'm about to drop. Struggle all you want.

---

(日乃竜胆) まずは基本の前提知識だ。AWSにおけるセキュリティや自動化の仕組みを理解するためには、IAM、Lambda、Config、そしてGuardDutyといったサービス群がどのように連携するかを知らねばならん。問1001から順に見ていこう。

(Hinata Rindo) First is the foundational prerequisite knowledge. To understand security and automation mechanisms in AWS, one must know how services like IAM, Lambda, AWS Config, and Amazon GuardDuty cooperate. Let's look at them starting from question 1001.

(月凪惟緒) あいむ、らんぶだ、がん、だてぃ……？ なんか呪文みたいな名前ばっかりで、私の頭の中の消しゴムがフル稼働しそうなんだけど。これ、全部覚えないとダメなやつ？

(Tsukina Io) IAM, Lambda, Config, GuardDuty...? It's all sounding like spell incantations, and the eraser in my head is about to work overtime. Do I have to memorize all of this?

(蒞星怜空) 覚える必要などない。すべては形骸化した虚構であり、最終的には熱力学的エントロピーの増大に伴い、すべてのログはブラックホールへと収束するのだからな。安心するといい。

(Rize Rea) There is no need to memorize anything. All of it is a reified fiction, and eventually, accompanied by the increase in thermodynamic entropy, all logs will converge into a black hole. Rest assured.

---

(日乃竜胆) 師匠、不穏な例えで初学者を恐怖のドン底に突き落とすのはやめろ。いいか、イオち。難しく考える必要はない。例えば、AWS Configというのは、いわば社内の「風紀委員」のようなものだ。リソースの設定がルールに違反していないかを常に監視している。

(Hinata Rindo) Master, stop plunging the beginner into the depths of terror with ominous analogies. Listen, Io-chi. You don't need to overthink it. For instance, AWS Config is essentially the "disciplinary committee" inside the company. It constantly monitors whether resource configurations violate the rules.

(月凪惟緒) ふーん、風紀委員ねぇ。私、学生時代は風紀委員にめっちゃ怒られてた気がする。スカートの丈が短いって。つまり、AWSの世界でも「お前の設定、長すぎ！」とか怒られちゃうわけ？

(Tsukina Io) Hmm, a disciplinary committee, huh. I feel like I was constantly yelled at by them back in school for my skirt being too short. So in the AWS world, it yells at you saying "Your configuration is too short!" or something?

(日乃竜胆) 概ね間違いではない。ルールに違反した設定が検出された際、自動で修復を行うためにAWS Systems Manager AutomationやAWS Lambdaが呼び出される。ここで不正解の選択肢から順に見ていくぞ。なぜそれが間違いなのかを理解することが、合格への最短距離だ。

(Hinata Rindo) That's roughly not wrong. When a configuration violating the rules is detected, AWS Systems Manager Automation or AWS Lambda is invoked to automatically remediate it. Let's look at the incorrect choices in order. Understanding why they are wrong is the shortest path to passing.

(蒞星怜空) 間違った選択肢を選ぶということは、すなわち自ら進んで冷たい泥沼の底に沈み、二度と浮上しないタイタニック号の乗客になるようなものだ。選んだ瞬間に社会的な死が訪れると言っても過言ではない。

(Rize Rea) Choosing an incorrect choice is essentially walking willingly to the bottom of a cold mud pit and becoming a passenger on the Titanic who never surfaces again. It is no exaggeration to say that social death visits the moment you choose it.

---

(日乃竜胆) まず、不正解となる選択肢の一つ目、単にCloudWatch Events（現EventBridge）のみで修復を完結させようとするアプローチだな。これはなぜ不適切か分かるか？

(Hinata Rindo) First, the first incorrect choice: the approach that attempts to complete remediation solely with CloudWatch Events (now EventBridge). Do you know why this is inappropriate?

(月凪惟緒) えーっと、イベントが起きたら「わっ！」って驚くだけで、実際にお片付けをする腕がないから、とか？

(Tsukina Io) Uh, because it just goes "Whoa!" when an event happens, but doesn't actually have the hands to clean up, or something?

(日乃竜胆) 慧眼だな、イオち。的を射ている。CloudWatch Eventsは単なる「検知と通知のトリガー」に過ぎず、複雑な修復ロジックやパラメータの動的処理を安全に実行するための十分な権限管理や多段階のステップを持つことができない。そのため、LambdaやSystems Managerを組み合わせる必要があるのだ。

(Hinata Rindo) Astute observation, Io-chi. You hit the mark. CloudWatch Events is merely a "trigger for detection and notification," and it lacks sufficient permission management or multi-step execution to safely run complex remediation logic or dynamic parameter processing. Therefore, combining it with Lambda or Systems Manager is necessary.

(Hinata Rindo) CloudWatch Events is merely a trigger and lacks the capability for complex remediation logic.
@10
(日乃竜胆)ふむ、それでは今日のAWS学習を始めるぞ。目の前にある設問はAWSの認定試験対策における重要な一幕だ。まずは問題文の構造からしっかりと紐解いていく必要がある。

(Hinowa Rindo) Well then, let's begin today's AWS study session. The question before us is a crucial episode in AWS certification exam preparation. First, we must thoroughly untangle the structure of the question text.

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、お疲れ様。なんかね、画面の文字が小さすぎて、私の永久凍土みたいな脳ミソじゃ一瞬で霜が降りそうなんだけど。クラウドって、つまりは雲の上でゴロゴロお昼寝するような感じなわけ？

(Tsukinagi Io) Hinorin, good work. Like, you know, the text on the screen is so tiny that my permafrost-like brain feels like frost is forming in a second. Is "cloud" basically like taking a nice nap on top of a cloud, or something?

(蒞星怜空)クラウドの上か。いいや、現実はもっと香ばしいぞ。無限に拡張する無機質なコンクリートの地下牢で、見知らぬ誰かのPythonスクリプトが断末魔を上げながら無限ループに陥っている、そんな地獄の釜の底のような光景だな。AWSを学ぶというのは、その底なし沼に自らダイブして、泥水をすすりながら自分のクレジットカードの引き落とし恐怖に震える高尚な儀式にほかならない。

(Rize Rea) On top of a cloud? No, reality is much more pungent. It's like the bottom of a hellish cauldron where someone's unknown Python script is screaming in its death throes and falling into an infinite loop inside an infinitely expanding, inorganic concrete dungeon. Learning AWS is nothing less than a noble ritual of diving headfirst into that bottomless swamp, slurping muddy water, and trembling in terror at your own credit card charges.

(日乃竜胆)怜空さん、初学者であるイオちに対して最初から不穏な終末論を垂れ流すのはやめるんだ。だが、大枠の方向性としては間違っていない。今回の設問はAWSの権限管理やセキュリティ、あるいはリソースの自動化に関する非常に実践的な内容だ。まずはどのようなシチュエーションが描かれているのか、基本から確認するぞ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Rea-san, stop spilling ominous eschatology from the very beginning to Io-chi, who is a beginner. However, the general direction is not wrong. This question is highly practical content regarding AWS permission management, security, or resource automation. First, let's check from the basics what kind of situation is being depicted.

(月凪惟緒)へぇ、セキュリティねぇ。なんかこう、パスワードを「1234」にして怒られる未来しか見えないけど、ヒノりん、そもそもこの問題は何を聞こうとしているの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Huh, security, huh. I can only foresee a future where I set my password to "1234" and get yelled at, but Hinorin, what on earth is this question trying to ask?

(日乃竜胆)イオち、そう焦るな。問題文を詳細に見ていくぞ。ここでは特定のAWSサービス間連携、例えばIAMロールやLambda、あるいはOrganizationsといった構成において、どのような権限委譲やセキュリティ境界の設定が適切であるかが問われている。これを理解するためには、まず「IAM（Identity and Access Management）」という概念の底を割る必要がある。

(Hinowa Rindo) Io-chi, don't rush so much. Let's look closely at the question text. Here, it asks about appropriate permission delegation and security boundary configurations in specific AWS service integrations, such as IAM roles, Lambda, or Organizations. To understand this, we first need to break open the bedrock concept called "IAM (Identity and Access Management)."

(蒞星怜空)IAMか。それはまるで、広大な刑務所の独房の扉に、それぞれ違う色のガムテープをペタペタ貼り付けて「誰がどの看守の持ち物を盗んでいいか」を細かく決める、終わりのない事務作業のようなものだな。間違えた瞬間に全受刑者が暴動を起こして、管理者の首が中空を舞うという極めてスリリングなエンターテインメントだ。

(Rize Rea) IAM, huh? It's like sticking different colored duct tape onto the cell doors of a vast prison, meticulously deciding "who is allowed to steal which guard's belongings"—an endless administrative chore. The moment you make a mistake, all the inmates riot, and the administrator's head dances through the air—an extremely thrilling form of entertainment.

(日乃竜胆)比喩がいちいち物騒すぎるんだよ、怜空さんは。だが、権限管理の厳密さを説く上ではあながち的外れでもない。IAMとは、AWSのリソースに対して「誰が（Principal）」「何を（Action）」「どこで（Resource）」実行することを許可するかを定義する仕組みだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Your metaphors are too violent every single time, Rea-san. But it's not entirely off the mark when explaining the strictness of permission management. IAM is a mechanism that defines "who (Principal)," "what (Action)," and "where (Resource)" are permitted to execute against AWS resources.

(月凪惟緒)ふんふん、つまり「お前はここに進入していいけど、そこのプリンは食べちゃダメ」っていう、お母さんからの小言みたいなルールをクラウド全体でやるってことね。

(Tsukinagi Io) Uh-huh, meaning it's like nagging rules from your mom applied across the entire cloud, like "You're allowed to enter here, but you're not allowed to eat that pudding over there."

(日乃竜胆)概ねその理解で差し支えない、慧眼だなイオち。さて、それを踏まえた上で、まずはこの設問における**間違った選択肢**から順に解体していこう。なぜそれらが不正解なのか、その理由を徹底的に叩き込む。

(Hinowa Rindo) That understanding is mostly fine, insightful as expected, Io-chi. Now, based on that, let's first dismantle the **incorrect choices** in this question in order. I will thoroughly hammer into you why they are incorrect.

---

(日乃竜胆)まずは不正解の選択肢の一つ目だ。これらは一見するともっともらしい機能や設定に見えるが、アーキテクチャの原則や権限のスコープにおいて致命的な矛盾を抱えている。

(Hinowa Rindo) First is the first incorrect choice. At a glance, these might look like plausible features or settings, but they harbor fatal contradictions in architectural principles and permission scopes.

(月凪惟緒)うわ、なんか文字の羅列を見ただけで、脳のキャパシティを超えてエーテルが蒸発しそう。ねぇ、これの何がダメなの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Whoa, just looking at the string of characters makes my brain capacity overflow and my ether evaporate. Hey, what's so bad about this?

(蒞星怜空)何がダメって、それはもう「目隠しをした状態でチェーンソーを振り回しながら、友人の頭の上に乗ったリンゴを正確に切り落とそうとする」ようなものさ。根本的な前提が狂っているから、結果として爆発四散する運命しかない。

(Rize Rea) What's so bad about it? It's like "blindfolding yourself while swinging a chainsaw and trying to accurately slice an apple sitting on your friend's head." The fundamental premise is deranged, so the only destiny is an explosive scattering.

(日乃竜胆)怜空さんの言う通りだ。この不正解の選択肢が示す設定では、権限の範囲（スコープ）が広すぎて、最小権限の原則（Principle of Least Privilege）に違反する。あるいは、対象となるサービス間の信頼関係（Trust Relationship）が正しく結ばれていないため、AWSのセキュリティ境界を越えてアクセスすることが技術的に不可能なのだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Just as Rea-san says. The settings indicated by this incorrect choice have a permission scope that is far too wide, violating the Principle of Least Privilege. Or, because the trust relationship between the target services is not correctly established, it is technically impossible to access across AWS security boundaries.

(月凪惟緒)最小権限の原則ねぇ……要するに「お小遣いは必要最低限の100円しか渡さない、だって全額ゲームセンターのクレーンゲームに溶かすから」っていう、我が家の鉄の掟みたいなもの？

(Tsukinagi Io) The principle of least privilege, huh... In other words, is it like the ironclad rule in my house where "I'm only giving you the absolute minimum allowance of 100 yen, because you'll blow the whole amount on arcade crane games"?

(日乃竜胆)非常に俗っぽい表現だが、本質を突いている。AWSにおいても、エンティティには必要最低限の権限のみを付与し、万が一クレデンシャルが漏洩した際の被害を最小限に抑え込む必要がある。この選択肢はその原則を無視して過剰な権限を許可しているため、不正解となる。

(Hinowa Rindo) A very colloquial expression, but it hits the essence. In AWS as well, entities must be granted only the minimum necessary permissions to minimize damage in the unlikely event that credentials are leaked. This choice ignores that principle and permits excessive permissions, making it incorrect.

---

(日乃竜胆)次に、二つ目の不正解の選択肢についてだ。こちらも試験でよく狙われる引っかけポイントだな。

(Hinowa Rindo) Next, regarding the second incorrect choice. This is also a typical trick point frequently targeted in exams.

(月凪惟緒)また引っかけなの？ AWSって、人間を陥れることしか考えてない意地悪なパズルゲームみたい。

(Tsukinagi Io) Another trick? AWS is like a mean puzzle game designed solely to trap humans.

(蒞星怜空)そうだ、これはまさに「深い海の底で沈没船の金庫を開けようとしたら、中身が全部海水だった」ような絶望感を味あわせてくれる。APIの仕様やリージョンの制約を無視した、美しくも儚い誤答にすぎない。

(Rize Rea) Exactly, this gives you the kind of despairing feeling like "trying to open a safe in a sunken ship at the bottom of the deep sea, only to find the contents are entirely seawater." It's nothing more than a beautiful yet ephemeral wrong answer that ignores API specifications and regional constraints.

(日乃竜胆)怜空さんのシュールな例えは置いておくとして、技術的な理由はこうだ。この選択肢では、指定されているリソースのARN（Amazon Resource Name）やアクションの組み合わせが、対象のサービス仕様と一致していない。例えば、クロスアカウントアクセスを行う際に必要な外部ID（External ID）や信頼ポリシーの記述が欠落している場合などがこれに該当する。

(Hinowa Rindo) Leaving aside Rea-san's surreal metaphors, the technical reason is this. In this choice, the specified resource ARN (Amazon Resource Name) and action combination do not match the target service specifications. For example, descriptions of the External ID or trust policy required when performing cross-account access being missing correspond to this.

(月凪惟緒)えーと、ARNってなに？ 新種の恐竜の名前？

(Tsukinagi Io) Uh, what's an ARN? Is it the name of a new species of dinosaur?

(日乃竜胆)恐竜ではない。ARNとは「Amazon Resource Name」の略称で、AWS内のあらゆるリソースを一意に特定するための住所のようなものだ。例えば、人間で言う戸籍番号やマイナンバーのようなものだな。これが正確でなければ、AWSはどのリソースを指しているのか迷子になってしまう。

(Hinowa Rindo) Not a dinosaur. ARN stands for "Amazon Resource Name," and it's like an address to uniquely identify every single resource within AWS. For example, it's like a family registry number or social security number for humans. If this isn't accurate, AWS gets lost wondering which resource is being pointed to.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ、クラウド界の住民票みたいなものか。住所不定無職だと、そりゃアクセスも拒否されるわけだわ。

(Tsukinagi Io) I see, so it's like a resident certificate in the cloud world. If you're of no fixed address and unemployed, of course access gets rejected.

---

(日乃竜胆)そして、いよいよ本丸、**正解の選択肢**の解説に入るぞ。これまでの不正解の理由をすべてクリアしたものが、この正解にたどり着く。

(Hinowa Rindo) And now, finally, we enter the explanation of the main stronghold: the **correct choice**. Anything that clears all the reasons for the previous incorrect choices arrives at this correct answer.

(月凪惟緒)待ちに待った正解タイム。ねぇヒノりん、どうしてこれが正解なのか、私の脳ミソが完全にフリーズする前に、優しく、かつ厳しく教えてよ。

(Tsukinagi Io) The long-awaited correct answer time. Hey Hinorin, tell me gently yet strictly why this is the correct answer, before my brain completely freezes.

(蒞星怜空)正解への道とは、いわば「業火に焼かれた荒野を裸足で歩き続け、最後にたどり着いた一筋の泉」のようなものだ。その選択肢を選ぶことで初めて、システム全体が調和し、エラーの呪縛から解放される。

(Rize Rea) The path to the correct answer is, so to speak, like "a single spring you finally reach after walking barefoot through a wilderness scorched by hellfire." Only by choosing that option does the entire system harmonize and get released from the curse of errors.

(日乃竜胆)大体合っているが、表現をもう少しアカデミックに戻すぞ。この正解の選択肢が選ばれる理由は、セキュリティ、権限のスコープ、およびサービス間の統合要件のすべてを完璧に満たしているからだ。具体的には、IAMロールに適切な信頼ポリシー（Trust Policy）がアタッチされており、指定されたサービスまたはアカウントからの「AssumeRole（役割の引き受け）」が正しく許可されている。

(Hinowa Rindo) That's mostly correct, but let's return the expression to something more academic. The reason this correct choice is selected is that it perfectly satisfies all security, permission scope, and service integration requirements. Specifically, an appropriate trust policy is attached to the IAM role, and "AssumeRole" (assuming a role) from the specified service or account is correctly permitted.

(月凪惟緒)アシュームロール……またかっこいい横文字が出てきたけど、要するに「一時的に別の人の権限を借りてお仕事する変身ベルト」みたいなもの？

(Tsukinagi Io) AssumeRole... Another cool foreign term popped up, but is it basically like a "transformation belt where you temporarily borrow someone else's authority to do work"?

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だなイオち。まさにその通りだ。AWSでは、常に強力な権限を保持し続けるのではなく、必要な時、必要な場所でのみ、一時的なセキュリティクレデンシャル（アクセスキー、シークレットキー、セッションToken）を発行して処理を行う。この「一時的な権限委譲の仕組み」こそが、AWSのセキュリティを保つための最大の肝なのだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Insightful, Io-chi. Exactly as you say. In AWS, rather than continuously holding powerful permissions all the time, temporary security credentials (access keys, secret keys, session tokens) are issued and processed only when needed, where needed. This "temporary permission delegation mechanism" is the absolute core for maintaining security in AWS.

(蒞星怜空)一時的といえば聞こえはいいが、それはまるで「期間限定の特赦で釈放されたものの、24時間後に再び暗黒の監獄へ引き戻される囚人の悲哀」に似ているな。自由とはかくも儚く、権限の期限切れとは残酷なものだ。

(Rize Rea) Temporary sounds nice, but it's akin to "the sorrow of a prisoner released under a limited-time amnesty, only to be dragged back into the dark prison 24 hours later." Freedom is so ephemeral, and the expiration of permissions is so cruel.

(日乃竜胆)例えがいちいち不穏すぎるが、仕組みの儚さと厳密さを理解するには十分だな。このように、正解の選択肢では「どのサービスが」「どの条件で」「どのような一時権限を使って」処理を完結させるべきかが、AWSのベストプラクティスに則って正確に記述されている。だからこそ、これが唯一の正解となるわけだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) The metaphors are too ominous every time, but it's sufficient to understand the ephemerality and strictness of the mechanism. Thus, in the correct choice, how "which service," under "what conditions," and using "what kind of temporary permissions" should complete the process is accurately described in accordance with AWS best practices. That is precisely why this is the only correct answer.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ……。つまりAWSを制する者は、一時的な変身ベルトの扱いと、住所不定にならないためのARN管理を制する、ってことかぁ。なんだか少しだけ、クラウドの雲の上の景色が見えてきた気がするよ。

(Tsukinagi Io) I see... In other words, he who conquers AWS conquers the handling of temporary transformation belts and ARN management to avoid having an indeterminate address. Somehow, I feel like I've started to catch a glimpse of the scenery above the clouds.

(日乃竜胆)うむ、よく理解できたな。今日のレクチャーはここまでだ。しっかりと復習しておくように。

(Hinowa Rindo) Yes, you've understood well. Today's lecture ends here. Make sure to review thoroughly.
@11
(日乃竜胆)さて、いよいよAWSの深淵へと足を踏み入れる時間だ。今回の設問はDOP（DevOps Engineer - Professional）の領域、すなわちシステム運用の極北を示すものだ。心して聞くがいい。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Now, it is time to step into the abyss of AWS. The question this time is in the realm of DOP (DevOps Engineer - Professional), which represents the extreme north of system operations. Listen carefully and be prepared.

(月凪惟緒)え〜、ヒノりん、なんか朝から空気が重いよぉ……。私、あったかいココア飲んで布団にくるまってたいんだけど。クラウドの深淵とか言われても、私の脳内は常に永久凍土でフリーズしてるからね。

(Tsukinagi Io) Geez, Hinorin, the air feels so heavy since this morning... I'd rather drink hot cocoa and wrap myself in a futon. Even if you talk about the abyss of the cloud, my brain is always frozen in permafrost, you know.

(蒞星怜空)フリーズしているくらいが丁度いいのさ。熱暴走したサーバーなんて、真夏のコンクリートの上に放置された生肉みたいなものだからね。腐臭を放つ前に、その無駄に柔らかい頭をAWSの冷たい鉄格子の間に挟んでやろうか、イオち。

(Rize Rea) Being frozen is just about right. A thermally runaway server is like raw meat left out on concrete in midsummer. Shall I wedge that unnecessarily soft head of yours between the cold iron bars of AWS before it emits a foul odor, Io-chi?

(月凪惟緒)うわ、怜空さん怖すぎ……。そんなこと言わずに、今日の問題ってそもそもどんなお話なの？ 画面にはなんか色々英語が書いてあるけど、私の目にはただの呪文書にしか見えないよ。

(Tsukinagi Io) Whoa, Rea-san is way too scary... Don't say things like that, and tell me what on earth today's question is about anyway. There's all sorts of English written on the screen, but to my eyes, it just looks like a spellbook.

(日乃竜胆)ほう、愚痴をこぼすのはそこまでだ。では問題の前提から紐解こう。今回の設問は、AWS環境におけるデプロイメントの自動化と、そこでのセキュリティおよび権限管理に関するものだ。具体的には、AWS CodePipelineやAWS CodeDeploy、そしてIAMロールの振る舞いについて問われている。まずは問題文の意図を正確に把握するのだ。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Hmph, enough with the complaining. Then let's unravel the premise of the question. This question is about automated deployment in an AWS environment, specifically concerning security and permission management there. To be specific, it asks about the behavior of AWS CodePipeline, AWS CodeDeploy, and IAM roles. First, grasp the exact intent of the question text.

(月凪惟緒)コードパイプライン？ コードデプロイ？ なんか名前からしてカッコいいけど、私の部屋の散らかったコード類とは大違いで、ちゃんとお仕事してくれそうな響きがするね。これって一体なにをしてるものなの？

(Tsukinagi Io) CodePipeline? CodeDeploy? They sound cool just from the names, but unlike the tangled cords in my room, they sound like they actually do their jobs properly. What on earth are these things doing?

(日乃竜胆)愚問だな、だが初心者が最初に躓くポイントでもある。AWS CodePipelineとは、ソフトウェアの変更を迅速かつ信頼性の高いものにするため、ビルド、テスト、デプロイのプロセスを自動化するサービスの事だ。そしてAWS CodeDeployは、そのパイプラインの指示に従い、実際にAmazon EC2インスタンスやAWS Lambdaなどにアプリケーションのコードをデプロイ、つまり配置して実行可能な状態にするサービスを指す。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) A foolish question, but it is also a point where beginners stumble first. AWS CodePipeline is a service that automates build, test, and deployment processes to make software changes rapid and reliable. And AWS CodeDeploy refers to a service that, following the pipeline's instructions, actually deploys—meaning places and makes ready for execution—application code onto Amazon EC2 instances, AWS Lambda, and so on.

(蒞星怜空)ふふ、まるでブラック企業の上司が部下に深夜の資料作成を自動で割り振るようなシステムだね。逆らえばIAMロールという名の絶対的な奴隷契約書によって、一歩も外に出られない監獄行きさ。自由意志なんてものは、クラウドの冷徹なログの前には塵芥のように消え去るのさ。

(Rize Rea) Heh, it's like a system where a black company's boss automatically assigns midnight document creation to subordinates. If you disobey, you're heading to a prison from which you can never escape, bound by an absolute slave contract called an IAM role. Free will vanishes like dust before the cold logs of the cloud.

(月凪惟緒)ひえっ……奴隷契約書とか怖いこと言わないでよ怜空さん。私、社畜じゃなくて万年床の住人だから、そういうプレッシャーにはめっぽう弱いの。で、そのIAMロールってなに？ 美味しいものじゃないよね？

(Tsukinagi Io) Eek... don't say scary things like slave contracts, Rea-san. I'm a resident of a permanent futon, not a corporate drone, so I'm terribly weak to that kind of pressure. So, what is that IAM role? It's not something edible, is it?

(日乃竜胆)食べ物ではない。IAM、すなわちIdentity and Access Managementは、AWSリソースへのアクセスを安全に管理するための機能だ。その中の「IAMロール」とは、特定の権限を持った「身分証明書」のようなものだな。AWSのサービスやユーザーにこのロールを割り当てることで、「このサービスにはこの操作をする権利を与える」と定義できる。だが、権限の付与を誤れば、システム全体が崩壊への道をたどることになる。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) It is not food. IAM, which is Identity and Access Management, is a feature to securely manage access to AWS resources. An "IAM role" among them is like an "identification card" with specific privileges. By assigning this role to an AWS service or user, you can define, "This service is granted the right to perform this operation." However, if you err in granting permissions, the entire system will walk the path toward collapse.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ……。身分証がないとコンビニの裏口にも入れないのと同じ感じかぁ。じゃあ、今回の設問ではそのIAMロールの権限設定で一体どんなトラブルが起きてるわけ？

(Tsukinagi Io) I see... It's kind of like how you can't enter the back door of a convenience store without an ID. So, what kind of trouble is happening with the permission settings of that IAM role in this question?

(日乃竜胆)よくぞ聞いた。今回の設問では、CodePipelineからCodeDeployを呼び出してデプロイを実行する際、権限不足や不適切な設定に起因するエラーをどのように解消すべきかが問われている。まずは、試験でよくある間違いの選択肢から順を追って徹底的に論破し、真実を明らかにしていこう。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Well asked. In this question, it asks how to resolve errors caused by insufficient permissions or improper settings when calling CodeDeploy from CodePipeline to execute a deployment. First, let's thoroughly refute the incorrect choices commonly found in exams one by one in order, and bring the truth to light.

(蒞星怜空)おや、不正解の選択肢から叩くのかい？ まるで無能な働き者を公開処刑する古代ローマの円形闘技場を見ているようで、実に香ばしい趣向だね。間違った選択肢を選んだ瞬間に、あなたのキャリアという名の砂上の楼閣が音を立てて崩れ去る、あの絶望のハーモニーを楽しませてもらうとしようか。

(Rize Rea) Oh, beating up the incorrect choices first? It's truly a fragrant motif, like watching an ancient Roman amphitheater publicly executing incompetent workers. Let's enjoy that harmony of despair where the castle of sand called your career collapses with a loud crash the moment you choose an incorrect option.

(月凪惟緒)怜空さん、例えが生々しすぎてお腹痛くなってきた……。でも、ヒノりんの言う通り、なんでそれが間違いなのかちゃんと聞いておかないと、いつか私も砂上の楼閣の下敷きになっちゃいそうだし、教えてヒノりん。

(Tsukinagi Io) Rea-san, your analogies are too vivid and my stomach is starting to hurt... But as Hinorin says, if I don't listen carefully to why it's wrong, I feel like I'll end up crushed under a castle of sand someday too, so tell me, Hinorin.

(日乃竜胆)案ずるな、私が基礎の土台から徹底的に叩き込んでやる。では、まず最初の不正解の選択肢について解説する。よくある誤ったアプローチとして、「Amazon EC2インスタンスにアタッチされているIAMインスタンスプロファイルのみを変更し、CodePipelineやCodeDeployサービスのサービスロールを放置する」というものがある。これがなぜ間違いなのか、分かるか？

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Do not fret, I will thoroughly hammer it in from the foundation. Now, let me explain the first incorrect choice. A common erroneous approach is "changing only the IAM instance profile attached to the Amazon EC2 instances, and leaving the service roles for CodePipeline and CodeDeploy services as they are." Do you understand why this is wrong?

(月凪惟緒)えぇっと……インスタンスプロファイル？ また新しい呪文が出てきたよ。それってEC2くんが着てるお洋服みたいなものなの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Uh... an instance profile? Another new spell has appeared. Is that like an outfit that EC2-kun is wearing?

(日乃竜胆)比喩としては悪くない。IAMインスタンスプロファイルとは、EC2インスタンス上で動作するアプリケーションがAWSの他のリソース（例えばS3バケットなど）にアクセスするための権限を内包したコンテナのようなものだ。だが、今回の問題の本質は「EC2がS3からデータを読み込む権限」ではなく、「CodePipelineがCodeDeployを呼び出し、CodeDeployがEC2に対してデプロイを指示する」という、サービス間の権限委任にある。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Not a bad analogy. An IAM instance profile is like a container enclosing permissions for applications running on an EC2 instance to access other AWS resources (such as an S3 bucket). However, the essence of this problem is not "EC2's permission to read data from S3," but rather the delegation of permissions between services: "CodePipeline calls CodeDeploy, and CodeDeploy instructs EC2 to deploy."

(蒞星怜空)つまり、お山の大将であるEC2だけに着飾った高価なドレスを着せても、肝心の司令塔であるパイプラインやデプロイサービス側が「お前にはそんな権限を与えていない」と冷たく門前払いするなら、システム全体はただの不毛な引きこもりニート状態に陥るわけさ。権限のパスが途中で断絶しているのに、末端だけをいじっても無駄な足掻きにすぎないのさね。

(Rize Rea) In other words, even if you dress up only EC2, the lord of the mountain, in an expensive dress, if the pipeline and deployment services, which are the core command towers, coldly turn them away at the door saying "We haven't granted you such authority," the entire system falls into a barren, shut-in NEET state. Even if you fiddle only with the extremities when the permission path is severed in the middle, it's nothing more than a futile struggle.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ……。司令官が「行け！」って言ってないのに、兵隊だけが「私、行く気満々です！」って言ってても、門が開かないから一歩も進めないってことかぁ。すごくよく分かったよ。

(Tsukinagi Io) I see... It's like the soldiers saying "I'm totally ready to go!" even though the commander hasn't said "Go!", but since the gate won't open, they can't take a single step forward. I understand very well.

(日乃竜胆)その通りだ、慧眼だな、イオち。サービス間連携においては、それぞれのサービスが適切なアクションを実行するための「サービスロール」や「サービスリンクロール」の権限が不可欠となる。EC2のプロファイルだけを変更しても、パイプラインの実行権限エラーは微動だにしない。これが一つ目の間違いの選択肢の正体だ。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Exactly, a keen insight, Io-chi. In service-to-service integration, the permissions of "service roles" or "service-linked roles" for each service to execute appropriate actions are indispensable. Changing only the EC2 profile will not budge a pipeline execution permission error. This is the true nature of the first incorrect choice.

(月凪惟緒)ふむふむ。じゃあ、次の間違いの選択肢はどんなものなの？ ヒノりん、容赦なくバッサリいっちゃって。

(Tsukinagi Io) Hmm. So, what is the next incorrect choice? Hinorin, go ahead and slash it mercilessly.

(日乃竜胆)承知した。二つ目のよくある間違いの選択肢は、「Amazon S3バケットポリシーのみを修正し、パブリックアクセスを許可するように設定を変更する」というものだ。これも致命的な誤りだな。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Understood. The second common incorrect choice is "modifying only the Amazon S3 bucket policy to allow public access." This is also a fatal error.

(月凪惟緒)えっ、S3バケットって、確かデータをポイポイ放り込んでおく物置みたいなところだよね？ そこをパブリックにしちゃいけないなんて、セキュリティの教科書の最初のページに血文字で書いてありそうだけど……。

(Tsukinagi Io) Eh, an S3 bucket is basically like a storage shed where you toss data around, right? Writing in blood on the first page of a security textbook that you shouldn't make that public sounds about right, but...

(蒞星怜空)おや、イオちの割にまともな危機感を持っているじゃないか。S3をパブリックにするということは、自宅の玄関のドアを綺麗に取り外し、通りすがりの野良犬から見知らぬ怪異まで、どうぞご自由に家財道具を持ち去ってくださいと全裸で街頭に立つようなものさ。セキュリティ監査官の血走った目が光った瞬間、インフラ担当者の首がゴロンと転がる美しい地獄絵図が見られるね。

(Rize Rea) Oh, you have a decent sense of crisis for Io-chi. Making S3 public is like neatly removing the front door of your house and standing in the street completely naked, inviting stray dogs and unknown apparitions passing by to please help themselves to your household goods as they please. The moment the bloodshot eyes of the security auditor light up, you can see a beautiful hellscape where the head of the infrastructure person rolls off.

(月凪惟緒)うわぁ、想像しただけで背筋が凍るね……。永久凍土の私でも汗が出そう。なんでそんな危険なことを選択肢に入れちゃうわけ？

(Tsukinagi Io) Uwah, just imagining it makes my spine freeze... Even I, made of permafrost, am about to sweat. Why would they put such a dangerous thing in the choices?

(日乃竜胆)AWSの試験問題というものは、受験者がパニックに陥った際に「とりあえずアクセス権を全部オープンにすれば動くのではないか」という悪魔の誘惑に屈するかどうかを試しているのだ。だが、今回のエラーの本質は「S3にデータがないこと」や「一般人がアクセスできないこと」ではなく、「CodePipelineなどのサービスが暗号化されたアーティファクトを復号するためのKMSキー権限や、CodeDeployを呼び出すためのIAM権限が不足していること」にある。S3をパブリックにしても、権限の不整合は何一つ解決しない。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) AWS exam questions test whether candidates, when falling into a panic, will yield to the devilish temptation of "won't it work if we just open all access permissions?" But the essence of this error is not "that there is no data in S3" or "that the general public cannot access it," but rather "that there is a lack of KMS key permissions for services like CodePipeline to decrypt encrypted artifacts, or IAM permissions to call CodeDeploy." Even if you make S3 public, not a single permission mismatch is resolved.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ……。鍵が壊れて開かない部屋なのに、家の外壁を全部ガラス張りにしちゃうようなものか。泥棒に入り放題になるだけで、肝心の部屋の中には入れないもんね。

(Tsukinagi Io) I see... It's like replacing all the exterior walls of a house with glass when the door key is broken and won't open. It just makes it an open house for burglars, and you still can't get into the room itself.

(日乃竜胆)まさにその通りだ。的確な比喩だな。セキュリティの原則を無視した場当たり的な対処は、システムを危険に晒すだけで一文の得にもならない。これが二つ目の間違いの選択肢の罠だ。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Exactly as you say. An accurate analogy. Ad-hoc measures that ignore security principles only endanger the system and are worth less than a penny. This is the trap of the second incorrect choice.

(月凪惟緒)ふぅ、恐ろしい世の中だねぇ。じゃあ、いよいよ本命の正解の選択肢にたどり着くわけ？ なんでそれが正解なのか、ヒノりんの美しいメスで綺麗に解剖してよ。

(Tsukinagi Io) Whew, what a scary world. So, are we finally arriving at the correct choice? Why is that the correct choice? Dissect it neatly with Hinorin's beautiful scalpel.

(日乃竜胆)いいだろう。正解の選択肢、すなわち「AWS CodePipelineのサービスロールに対して、CodeDeployの実行権限および関連するAmazon S3、AWS KMSへのアクセス・復号権限を正しく付与し、さらにCodeDeploy側でも適切なIAMロールと信頼関係（タスト・プレシデンス）を設定する」というアプローチがなぜ正しいのかを解説する。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Very well. I will explain why the correct choice—namely, "correctly granting CodeDeploy execution permissions and related Amazon S3 and AWS KMS access/decryption permissions to the AWS CodePipeline service role, and further configuring appropriate IAM roles and trust relationships on the CodeDeploy side as well"—is correct.

(月凪惟緒)うわぁ、また文字がいっぱい出てきた……。サービスロールに、S3に、KMS？ 信頼関係って、人間関係よりもめんどくさそうじゃない？

(Tsukinagi Io) Uwah, a lot of text appeared again... Service role, S3, KMS? Trust relationships sound even more troublesome than human relationships, don't they?

(蒞星怜空)人間関係なんてものは一晩の酒と気まぐれで崩壊するが、AWSの信頼関係（Trust Policy）は裏切ったら最後、APIコールがすべて「AccessDenied」という名の冷酷な断頭台送りになるからね。人間よりもはるかに律儀で逃げ場がない分、美しくさえあるのさ。要するに、「誰がどのサービスに対して何をする権利を持っているか」の身元保証を厳密にチェーンで繋いでいく作業にほかならない。

(Rize Rea) Human relationships collapse over a night's drinks and a whim, but once you betray an AWS trust relationship (Trust Policy), every single API call is sent to a ruthless guillotine named "AccessDenied." Because it's far more rigorous and inescapable than humans, it's almost beautiful. In short, it is nothing more than the task of strictly chaining together background checks for "who has the right to do what to which service."

(日乃竜胆)怜空の言う通りだ。CodePipelineが正しく機能するためには、自分自身のサービスロール（IAMロール）を通じて、パイプラインのアーティファクトが格納されているS3バケットへの読み書き権限、およびそのバケットが暗号化されている場合に用いられるAWS KMS（Key Management Service）の暗号化・復号キーへのアクセス権がなければならない。さらに、そこから呼び出されるCodeDeployに対しても、デプロイを実行するための適切なアクション（codedeploy:CreateDeploymentなど）が許可されていなければならないのだ。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Just as Rea says. For CodePipeline to function properly, through its own service role (IAM role), it must have read/write permissions to the S3 bucket where the pipeline artifacts are stored, and access permissions to the AWS KMS (Key Management Service) encryption/decryption keys used when that bucket is encrypted. Furthermore, it must also be granted appropriate actions (such as codedeploy:CreateDeployment) to execute deployments against CodeDeploy called from there.

(月凪惟緒)つまりさ、パイプラインくんが「おい、デプロイしてくれよ！」ってCodeDeployくんに頼むときに、「ほら、ちゃんとした身分証と、お部屋を開けるための鍵を持ってるでしょ？」って証明できないと、警備員さんにポイってつまみ出されちゃうから、その身分証のセットを完璧に整えてあげるのがこの正解の選択肢ってわけだね。

(Tsukinagi Io) In other words, when Pipeline-kun asks CodeDeploy-kun, "Hey, deploy this for me!", if he can't prove, "Look, I have the proper ID and the key to open the room, right?", he'll get tossed out by the security guard, so this correct choice is about perfectly preparing that set of IDs.

(日乃竜胆)その通りだ、イオち。君にしては非常に鮮やかな理解だと言わざるを得ない。アーキテクチャ全体における「権限の委任（Delegation）」と「信頼ポリシー（Trust Policy）」の構造を正確に理解していれば、この手の権限エラー系トラブルは恐るるに足りない。AWSの自動化・CI/CDパイプライン設計において、IAMロールのスコープを最小限かつ必要十分な形で定義することは、プロフェッショナルにとっての絶対の鉄則なのだ。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Exactly, Io-chi. I must say that is a remarkably vivid understanding for you. If you accurately understand the structure of "delegation of permissions" and "trust policies" in the overall architecture, permission error-related troubles of this sort are nothing to fear. In AWS automation and CI/CD pipeline design, defining the scope of IAM roles in a minimal and necessary/sufficient form is an absolute iron rule for a professional.

(蒞星怜空)ふふ、お見事だねヒノりん。きれいな理論武装で初心者の脳内を強制的に更地にしたところで、今回の講義はこれでおしまいというわけかい。まあ、次にこのエラーを踏んだときは、生暖かい涙を流しながらIAMコンソールを彷徨うことになるとは思うけれどね。

(Rize Rea) Heh, well done, Hinorin. Having forcibly cleared out the beginner's brain with neat theoretical armor, is this lecture over for now? Well, I suppose the next time you encounter this error, you'll be wandering the IAM console while shedding lukewarm tears.

(月凪惟緒)うぅ、そんな不吉なこと言わないでよ怜空さん……。でも、ヒノりんのおかげで、なんだかクラウドの冷たい鉄格子の中にも、少しだけ温もり（？）みたいなものが感じられた気がするよ。お疲れ様、ヒノりん。

(Tsukinagi Io) Ugh, don't say such ominous things, Rea-san... But thanks to Hinorin, I feel like I could sense a little bit of warmth (?) even inside the cold iron bars of the cloud. Good job, Hinorin.

(日乃竜胆)ふっ、温もりなど求めてどうする。だが、お前が理解できたというのであれば、この講義の労も報われるというものだ。これにて本日のAWS深淵講座を終了する。各自、復習を怠るではないぞ。

(Hinotsukasa Rindou) Hmph, what use is warmth? But if you say you were able to understand, the effort of this lecture is rewarded. With this, today's AWS Abyss Lecture is concluded. Everyone, do not neglect your review.
@12
(月凪惟緒)え〜、ヒノりん。なんか画面に映ってるの、クラウドじゃなくて「会計・財務」って書いてある気がするんだけど……私の目の錯覚かな。永久凍土で冷やしすぎた脳ミソがバグっちゃった？

(Moon-frozen eyes, staring blankly at the screen with absolute zero chill.)

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io)

(月凪惟緒)
It feels like my brain is frozen in permafrost, seeing accounting terms instead of cloud architecture.

(月凪惟緒)
Its looks like accounting stuff, not AWS.

(日乃竜胆)ふん、目をこすったところで現実が変わるわけではまい。今回の設問はこれだ。「日本基準で営業利益の計算式はどれか。」……基礎の基礎から叩き込んでやろう、覚悟するのだな。

(With the piercing gaze of a kendo practitioner holding a sharpened blade, standing tall and resolute.)

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(日乃竜胆)
Do not rub your eyes; reality remains unchanged. The question is before us. Prepare yourself, for I shall drill the foundations into you.

(日乃竜胆)
Reality doesn't change just because you blink. Let's tackle the fundamentals.

(蒞星怜空)ほう、AWSのクラウドの海を泳ぐはずが、いきなり現世の泥臭いマネーゲームの荒波に放り出されたか。企業の利益とは、まるで底の抜けたバケツで黄金をすくうようなものだ。垂れ流されるコストと、かろうじて残る小銭の切なさを味わうがいい。

(A lazy, heavy gaze from eyes with reddish tints, dropping a chilling and chaotic metaphor into the quiet room.)

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea)

(蒞星怜空)
Swallowed by the earthly money game instead of the cloud ocean. Corporate profit is like trying to scoop gold with a bucket full of holes. Enjoy the pathos of leaking costs.

(蒞星怜空)
Diving straight into the mud of corporate finance instead of the cloud. Profit is just gold in a leaky bucket.

(月凪惟緒)へぇ……なんだかお金の話って聞くだけで眠くなるよね。でも、営業利益ってなに？ お店で営業トークを頑張ったらもらえるご褒美のこと？

(A hazy, drifting expression, tilting her head with absolute nonchalance.)

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io)

(月凪惟緒)
Money talk makes me sleepy. But what is operating profit? Is it a reward for doing a good sales pitch?

(月凪惟緒)
Does operating profit mean a bonus for a good sales talk?

(日乃竜胆)違う。全く見当違いだ、イオち。営業利益とは、企業が本業の商売でどれだけ稼いだかを示すものだ。売上高から、売上原価と販売費及び一般管理費を引いて求める。まずは、この選択肢のアから順に潰していくぞ。最初は間違いの選択肢、アの「売上高 - 売上原価」だ。

(Striking the desk with an unyielding, sharp tone of absolute authority.)

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(日乃竜胆)
Wrong. Completely off the mark, Io. Operating profit shows how much a company earned through its core business. Let us dismantle option A first.

(日乃竜胆)
Incorrect. Option A is "Sales minus Cost of Sales." Let's break it down.

(月凪惟緒)ふーん……。売上高から売上原価を引く、か。これって、ポテトチップスを100円で仕入れて200円で売ったら、もうけが100円になる、みたいな感じ？

(Blinking lazily, floating in her own world.)

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io)

(月凪惟緒)
Hmm... Selling potato chips bought for 100 yen at 200 yen makes 100 yen profit? Is that it?

(月凪惟緒)
Buying chips for 100 yen and selling for 200 yen leaves a 100 yen margin, right?

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だな、イオち。その通りだ。だが、それは「営業利益」ではない。「売上総利益」、いわゆる「粗利」と呼ばれるものだ。仕入れた原価を引いただけでは、家賃や従業員の給料、電気代などはまだ引かれておらんのだよ。

(Nodding slightly with a strict yet acknowledging expression.)

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(日乃竜胆)
Astute, Io. Exactly. But that is not operating profit. That is "Gross Profit." Rent, salaries, and electricity are not yet subtracted.

(日乃竜胆)
Spot on, Io. But that's just Gross Profit, before overhead costs.

(蒞星怜空)ふふ、粗利だけで生きられる世界ならどれほど楽か。現実は、電気代という名の吸血鬼が夜な夜なサーバールームで血をすすり、家賃という名の重圧が背骨を粉砕しにやってくる。売上総利益など、ただの幻影にすぎんよ。

(A dark, heavy smile spreading across her face, freezing the atmosphere completely.)

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea)

(蒞星怜空)
If we could live on gross profit alone! In reality, electricity vampires drain servers nightly, and rent crushes spines. Gross profit is a mere illusion.

(蒞星怜空)
Living on gross profit is a dream. Reality brings electricity vampires and rent crushers.

(月凪惟緒)うわぁ、怖……。会社って生き残るだけでホラー映画じゃん。じゃあ次はウの「売上高 - 売上原価 - (販売費及び一般管理費) ＋ 営業外損益」にいこっか。

(Shivering slightly with a completely detached, deadpan voice.)

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io)

(月凪惟緒)
Scary... Companies are just survival horror movies. Let's move on to option C: "Sales minus Cost of Sales minus SGA plus Non-Operating Profit/Loss."

(月凪惟緒)
Terrifying. Companies are survival horror. Next is option C.

(日乃竜胆)よくぞ進んだ、イオち。このウの選択肢はだな、営業利益に「営業外損益」を加減算している。営業外損益というのは、本業以外の活動で発生する収益や費用のことだ。例えば、銀行からの借入に対する利息の支払いなどがこれにあたる。本業の利益にこれらを足し引きして求められるのは、「経常利益」だ。ゆえに、ウは間違いということになる。

(Straightening her posture, delivering the explanation with sharp, clinical precision.)

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(日乃竜胆)
Well navigated, Io. Option C adds or subtracts non-operating profit and loss. These are gains or losses from non-core activities, like bank loan interest. Adding this gives "Ordinary Profit." Thus, C is incorrect.

(日乃竜胆)
Option C factors in non-core activities like loan interest, yielding "Ordinary Profit," making it wrong here.

(月凪惟緒)本業以外でお金が出入りするんだ……。なんか、本業で頑張ってる横で、勝手に株のギャンブルで大損こいてるおじさんみたいな感じ？

(Tilting her head with a sluggish, poetic vagueness.)

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io)

(月凪惟緒)
Money moving outside the core business... Like an uncle losing money on stocks while working hard at his day job?

(月凪惟緒)
Like an uncle gambling on stocks while working his day job?

(蒞星怜空)ふっ、まさに地獄絵図だな。本業の汗と涙の結晶が、片手間でした投資の失敗によって一瞬で灰燼に帰す。経営とは、常に破滅と隣り合わせのロシアンルーレットなのだよ。

(A sharp, bleak chuckle echoing through the room.)

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea)

(蒞星怜空)
A hellscape indeed. Sweat and tears instantly reduced to ashes by a side investment blunder. Management is Russian roulette with ruin.

(蒞星怜空)
A total disaster. Sweat turning to ashes from a side-investment blunder.

(日乃竜胆)不吉な例えはやめるのだ、怜空さん。だが、本質を突いているのは確かだな。では次にエの選択肢、「売上高 - 売上原価 - (販売費及び一般管理費) ＋ 営業外損益 ＋ 特別損益」を見ていくぞ。

(Sighing softly before returning to her uncompromising stance.)

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(日乃竜胆)
Cease the ominous examples, Rea. Though it hits the core. Let us look at option D: adding extraordinary profit and loss as well.

(日乃竜胆)
Cut the grim examples, Rea. Let's examine option D, which adds extraordinary gains and losses.

(月凪惟緒)うわ、なんかすごそうだね、「特別損益」って。特別ってつくだけで、なんかご褒美感あるじゃん。ボーナスステージみたいな？

(Eyes twinkling with a lazy, misguided sense of excitement.)

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io)

(月凪惟緒)
"Extraordinary profit and loss" sounds impressive. "Extraordinary" feels like a reward, like a bonus stage?

(月凪惟緒)
"Extraordinary" sounds like a bonus stage.

(日乃竜胆)全く違う、イオち。ボーナスステージどころか、企業の歴史においてそう何度も起きないような、臨時的かつ巨額の損益のことだ。例えば、保有しているビルが火事で全焼したとか、工場が怪獣に踏み潰されたといった災害による損失、あるいは土地の売却益などがこれにあたる。経常利益にこの特別損益を加減したものは「税引き前当期純利益」と呼ばれる。したがって、エも間違いだ。

(Glares with intense, unyielding strictness, driving the point home.)

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(日乃竜胆)
Far from it, Io. It refers to rare, massive gains or losses, like a building burning down or land sales. Adding this to ordinary profit gives "Net Income Before Taxes." Thus, D is also incorrect.

(日乃竜胆)
Far from it. It means rare, massive events like disasters or asset sales, yielding "Pre-tax Income." D is wrong.

(蒞星怜空)火事や怪獣か。保険金でウハウハかと思いきや、結局は焼け野原にただ佇む社畜の群れが残されるだけだな。人生のバッドエンドを凝縮したような美しい響きだ。

(A dark, haunting grin, relishing the bleakness of the scenario.)

(蒞星怜空)
(Rize Rea)

(蒞星怜空)
Fires or monsters. Just a herd of corporate slaves standing in a burnt wasteland. A beautiful resonance condensing life's bad ending.

(蒞星怜空)
Disasters and ruins. Just corporate slaves standing in a wasteland.

(日乃竜胆)……話を戻すぞ。間違った選択肢をすべて検討したな。アは売上総利益、ウは経常利益、エは税引き前当期純利益を求める式だ。そして最後に残った、イの「売上高 - 売上原価 - (販売費及び一般管理費)」こそが、企業が本業で稼ぎ出した利益、すなわち「営業利益」を求める正しい計算式となる。よく理解できたか、イオち？

(Standing straight, her voice carrying the full weight of absolute authority.)

(日乃竜胆)
(Hino Rindo)

(日乃竜胆)
Let us return. We have reviewed all incorrect options: A is Gross Profit, C is Ordinary Profit, D is Pre-tax Income. Thus, option B is the correct formula for Operating Profit. Understood, Io?

(日乃竜胆)
We've reviewed the wrongs. B is the correct formula for Operating Profit. Clear, Io?

(月凪惟緒)あぁ、なるほどねぇ……。つまり、本業で稼いだ基本の儲けを知るためには、まず仕入れ値を引いて、さらに会社を維持するための日々のランニングコストまでしっかり引き算しなきゃいけないってことか。やっと頭の氷が少し溶けたかも。

(Nodding slowly with a hazy, detached expression of enlightenment.)

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukina Io)

(月凪惟緒)
Ah, I see... To find the core earnings from the main business, we subtract the cost and daily running costs to keep the company alive. My brain ice is finally melting.

(月凪惟緒)
Ah, I see. To find core earnings, we must subtract both costs and daily running expenses. My brain is thawing.
@13
(日乃竜胆)それでは、AWSの深淵へ足を踏み入れるとしようか。本日の設問はAWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional (DOP)の模擬試験より、構成管理や自動化に関する非常に示唆に富む問題だ。準備はいいか、イオち、怜空さん。

(Hinowa Rindo) Now, let us step into the abyss of AWS. Today's question is a highly suggestive one regarding configuration management and automation from a DOP practice exam. Are you ready, Io-chi, Reia-san?

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、お疲れ様ぁ。なんかもう教室の空気が冷たくて、永久凍土の下で冷凍マグロになった気分だよぉ。とりあえずAWSって、美味しいの？

(Tsukina Io) Evening, Hinorin. Somehow the classroom air is so cold I feel like a frozen tuna under the permafrost. Anyway, is AWS tasty?

(蒞星怜空)美味いわけなかろう。あれは人間の脳味噌をじっくりとフライパンで炒めて、冷酷な自動化という名のソースで食べるような、極上の絶望の味だ。まあ、せいぜい頑張るがいいさ。

(Rize Reia) As if it's tasty. That is the ultimate taste of despair, like frying a human brain thoroughly in a frying pan and eating it with a sauce called ruthless automation. Well, do your best, if you can.

(日乃竜胆)相変わらず物騒な例えをするな、怜空さんは。では設問に入る。問題文はこうだ。『企業がAWSリソースの変更管理プロセスを自動化しようとしている。AWS Configを使用してリソースの非準拠を検知した際、AWS Systems Manager Automationを使用して修復を実行するアーキテクチャを構築する場合、最も適切な組み合わせの選定あるいはフローはどれか。』――さあ、イオち、まずはこの問題文に並ぶ言葉の意味から解き明かしていこうか。どこが引っかかる？

(Hinowa Rindo) You always make such dangerous analogies, Reia-san. Then let us enter the question. The prompt is: 'An enterprise is trying to automate the change management process for AWS resources. When AWS Config is used to detect non-compliance in resources, what is the most appropriate combination or flow to execute remediation using AWS Systems Manager Automation?'—Now, Io-chi, let us first unravel the meanings of the words lined up in this prompt. Where are you stuck?

(月凪惟緒)えっとねぇ、「AWS Config」とか「Systems Manager Automation」とか、名前が長くて呪文みたい。あと「非準拠」ってなに？ なんか悪いことして法律違反で逮捕されちゃう感じ？

(Tsukina Io) Um, "AWS Config" and "Systems Manager Automation," their names are long like spells. And what is "non-compliance"? Does it feel like doing something bad and getting arrested for breaking the law?

(日乃竜胆)ふっ、あながち間違いではないな。法や規則ではなく、企業が定めたセキュリティポリシーや設定のルールから外れている状態を「非準拠」と呼ぶ。AWS Configは、まさにその「お上の定めたルールに背いている不届き者」がいないか、AWSリソースの設定を監視し続ける見張り番のようなものだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Heh, that is not entirely wrong. A state of deviating from security policies or configuration rules set by a company, rather than laws and regulations, is called "non-compliance." AWS Config is precisely like a watchman who continuously monitors the configurations of AWS resources to see if there are any "miscreants rebelling against the rules set by the authorities."

(蒞星怜空)監視カメラの網の目をかいくぐろうとして、冷酷なコンプライアンスの処刑人に背中を撃ち抜かれる哀れなサーバーたちの断末魔のフェスティバル、というわけだな。素晴らしい地獄絵図だ。

(Rize Reia) A festival of death screams of pitiful servers trying to slip through the meshes of surveillance cameras and getting their backs shot through by the ruthless executioner of compliance, so to speak. A wonderful picture of hell.

(月凪惟緒)ひえぇ……怜空さんの例え、怖すぎて真夏の冷凍庫にいるみたいに背筋が凍るよぉ……。でさ、その見張り番が見つけたら、次は「Systems Manager Automation」がどうにかしてくれるわけ？

(Tsukina Io) Eep... Reia-san's analogy is too scary, my spine freezes like being in a midsummer freezer... And so, once that watchman finds them, "Systems Manager Automation" does something about it?

(日乃竜胆)然り。AWS Configが非準拠を検知した瞬間、EventBridgeなどを経由して、あるいは直接Systems Manager Automationのランブックをトリガーし、自動で正しい状態に修正――すなわち「修復」を行うのだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Exactly. The moment AWS Config detects non-compliance, it triggers the Systems Manager Automation runbook—either via EventBridge or directly—and automatically corrects it to the proper state, namely performing "remediation."

---

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ。じゃあ、ここから選択肢の検討に入るわけだけど、まずは間違った選択肢からじっくりネチネチと潰していくんだよね、ひのりん？

(Tsukina Io) I see. Well then, from here we enter the examination of the options, but first we crush the incorrect options thoroughly and persistently, right Hinorin?

(日乃竜胆)その通りだ、イオち。例外なく、不正解の選択肢がなぜ牙を抜かれた蛇のように無力なのかを詳らかにしよう。まずは選択肢AやB、あるいは誤った構成要素についてだ。例えば、AWS Configの修復機能において、Lambdaを介さずに直接Systems Managerのドキュメントを実行できるケースがあるが、不適切なアクセス権限や未対応のイベントソースを指定している選択肢は、権限エラーの泥沼に沈むことになる。

(Hinowa Rindo) That is correct, Io-chi. Without exception, let us clarify why the incorrect options are as powerless as a defanged snake. First, regarding option A or B, or incorrect components. For instance, while there are cases where AWS Config's remediation feature can execute Systems Manager documents directly without Lambda, options specifying inappropriate access permissions or unsupported event sources will sink into the mire of permission errors.

(蒞星怜空)権限エラーか。それはまるで、高級ホテルの扉を全裸でこじ開けようとして、屈強な警備員に秒速で地面に叩きつけられ、二度と光を見ることのない地下牢へ放り込まれるようなものだな。美しき絶望のミステリーだ。

(Rize Reia) A permission error. That is much like trying to force open the doors of a luxury hotel completely naked, getting slammed onto the ground in seconds by muscular guards, and being thrown into a dungeon that will never see the light again. A beautiful mystery of despair.

(月凪惟緒)うわぁ、想像しただけで今日の夕飯のプリンがまずくなりそう……。つまり、間違った選択肢は、必要な権限（IAMロール）の指定が抜けていたり、そもそもAWS ConfigからSystems Manager Automationを正しく呼び出せない仕組みになっていたりするからダメってことね。

(Tsukina Io) Uwaa, just imagining that makes today's pudding for dinner taste bad... In other words, incorrect options are no good because they lack the designation of necessary permissions (IAM roles) or fail to correctly invoke Systems Manager Automation from AWS Config in the first place.

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だな、イオち。その通り、IAMロール（権限の身分証明書のようなものだ）のスコープが不適切であったり、ターゲットとなるリソースの指定が曖昧な選択肢は、すべて自動化の女神に見放されたガラクタにすぎない。不正解の選択肢群は、実行権限の欠如や、イベントのルーティング経路の勘違いという初歩的かつ致命的な罠を仕掛けているのだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Astute, Io-chi. Indeed, options where the scope of IAM roles (which are like identification papers for permissions) is inappropriate or where the target resource designation is ambiguous are mere junk abandoned by the goddess of automation. The group of incorrect options sets rudimentary and fatal traps such as a lack of execution permissions or a misunderstanding of event routing paths.

---

(月凪惟緒)ふむふむ……。じゃあ、いよいよ本命の「正解の選択肢」はどうしてそれが選ばれるのか、隅々まで教えてよ、ひのりん。

(Tsukina Io) Hmm-hmm... Well then, finally tell me every nook and cranny of why the favored "correct option" is chosen, Hinorin.

(日乃竜胆)耳をかっぽじってよく聞くがいい。正解の選択肢では、AWS Configのマネージドルールまたはカスタムルールが非準拠を検知した際、AWS Configの修復機能（Remediation）から直接、あるいはAmazon EventBridgeとAWS Systems Manager Automationを連携させて、あらかじめ定義されたSSMドキュメント（Automationランブック）を正確に実行するフローが組まれている。これにより、人間の手を入れることなく、秒単位でセキュアな状態へリソースが強制送還されるというわけだ。

(Hinowa Rindo) Listen well with your ears wide open. In the correct option, when an AWS Config managed rule or custom rule detects non-compliance, a predefined SSM document (Automation runbook) is accurately executed—either directly from AWS Config's remediation feature or by coordinating Amazon EventBridge with AWS Systems Manager Automation. By this, resources are forcibly repatriated to a secure state in a matter of seconds, without any human intervention.

(蒞星怜空)人間の介在という名の「バグの温床」を完全に排除し、冷徹なコードの意思だけで全てを自動処刑する。まさに、狂気と効率が手を取り合って踊る、現代クラウド社会のダンスホールそのものだな。

(Rize Reia) Completely eliminating the "hotbed of bugs" known as human intervention and automatically executing everything solely by the will of cold code. Truly, it is the dance hall of modern cloud society where madness and efficiency hand-in-hand dance together.

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ……。人間がサボるために、機械が代わりに必死で働かされる世界線ってことね。なんか、機械のほうがよっぽど社畜っぽくて、少し同情しちゃうかも。

(Tsukina Io) I see... So it's a timeline where machines are forced to work desperately instead, so humans can slack off. Somehow, the machines look much more like corporate slaves, I might feel a bit of sympathy.

(日乃竜胆)機械に同情している暇があるなら、IAMロールの信頼ポリシーとアクションの構文を脳裏に焼き付けることだ。AWS Configの修復アクションにおける正しいパラメータの渡し方、そしてSystems Manager Automationが受け取るべきペイロードの構造――これらを完璧に理解して初めて、プロフェッショナルとしての第一歩を踏み出したと言えよう。本日の講義はここまでだ。しっかりと復習しておくことだな。

(Hinowa Rindo) If you have time to sympathize with machines, you should burn the trust policies of IAM roles and the syntax of actions into your brain. How to pass correct parameters in AWS Config remediation actions, and the structure of the payload that Systems Manager Automation should receive—only when you perfectly understand these can you be said to have taken your first step as a professional. Today's lecture ends here. Make sure to review thoroughly.
@14
(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、なんか画面にめっちゃ文字と図が並んでるんだけど。これ、見ただけで睡眠薬代わりになりそう。クラウドって雲の上のお話だから、もっとこうふわふわしてるのかと思ってた。

(月凪惟緒)Hinorin, there’s a whole bunch of text and diagrams on the screen. Just looking at this feels like a sleeping pill. I thought "cloud" meant up in the fluffy skies, so I figured it’d be a bit more dreamy.

(日乃竜胆)寝言を言うな、イオち。雲の上どころか、現実の厳冬期に放り出された遭難者のような顔をするな。いいか、本日はAWSのデベロッパー向け試験、いわゆるDOPの模試から一問を厳選し、その深淵を解き明かす。まずは問題の文面を直視するのだ。

(日乃竜胆)Stop talking in your sleep, Io-chi. Don't make a face like a survivor cast out into a harsh winter blizzard, let alone above the clouds. Listen, today we are going to pick a single question from the AWS developer certification mock exams—the so-called DOP—and fathom its depths. First, face the wording of the question directly.

(蒞星怜空)ほう、DOPね。地獄の釜の蓋が開く音がする。まあ、あれだ、システムが炎上して夜中に社畜たちが血眼でキーボードを叩くカチャカチャという音が、遠くの波の音のように心地よく響く季節になってきたということだな。

(蒞星怜空)Hoh, DOP, you say. I hear the lid of hell's cauldron opening. Well, you know, it's that time of year when the sound of systems going up in smoke and corporate slaves clacking away at their keyboards with bloodshot eyes in the dead of night echoes as pleasantly as the distant sound of waves.

(日乃竜胆)不吉な比喩を挟むな、怜空さん。だが、問題の核心に入る前に、基礎の構築が先決だ。イオち、まずは画面の設問を私が読み上げる。耳の穴をかっぽじって聞くがいい。

(日乃竜胆)Don't insert ominous metaphors, Rhea-san. But before diving into the core of the problem, building the foundation takes precedence. Io-chi, I will read the question on the screen aloud first. Open your ears wide and listen.

(日乃竜胆)「AWS Lambda関数がAmazon SQSキューからメッセージをポーリングして処理している。このアーキテクチャにおいて、メッセージ処理の信頼性と耐障害性を高め、処理に失敗したメッセージが無限にループしてシステムを蝕むポイズンピル問題に対処するため、どのような設計上のパターンを導入すべきか？」――これが今回の命題だ。

(日乃竜胆)"An AWS Lambda function is polling and processing messages from an Amazon SQS queue. In this architecture, what design pattern should be introduced to increase the reliability and fault tolerance of message processing, and to deal with the poison pill problem where messages that fail processing loop infinitely and eat away at the system?" -- This is our proposition today.

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、いきなり呪文が長すぎ。Lambdaってあれでしょ、ギリシャ文字のやつ？ SQSは……きゅうり？ ポイズンピルって、なんかすごい名前の毒薬っぽいお菓子？

(月凪惟緒)Hinorin, that incantation was way too long right off the bat. Lambda is that Greek letter thing, right? SQS is... a cucumber? And a poison pill sounds like some kind of snack named after a terrifying poison.

(日乃竜胆)Lambdaはギリシャ文字だがここではAWSのサーバーレスコンピューティングサービスだ。そしてSQSはSimple Queue Serviceの略、キューイングサービスだな。ポイズンピルは毒薬の錠剤、転じてシステムを内側から崩壊させる不良メッセージのことだ。笑い事ではないぞ。

(日乃竜胆)Lambda is a Greek letter, but here it's AWS's serverless computing service. And SQS stands for Simple Queue Service, a queuing service. A poison pill refers to a literal poison pill, and by extension, a defective message that collapses a system from the inside. This is no laughing matter.

(蒞星怜空)毒薬の錠剤か。甘い香りをまとわせて口に入れた瞬間、内臓の組織という組織が溶け出してドロドロのスープと化すような、実にロマンチックな不具合だな。システム全体が静かに息を引き取る様は、まさに芸術的といえよう。

(蒞星怜空)A poison pill, huh. The moment you put it in your mouth disguised by a sweet fragrance, tissue after tissue of your internal organs melts down into a gooey soup—truly a romantic bug. The spectacle of the entire system quietly drawing its last breath can only be called artistic.

(日乃竜胆)怜空さん、初心者を引き連れているのだから、胃液が逆流するような生々しいホラー描写は慎め。いいか、イオち、順を追って解説する。まずは不正解の選択肢からつぶしていくぞ。試験の作法としても、誤りを知ることは正解に至る最短の道だ。

(蒞星怜空)English line placeholder for pacing and vibe check. (Wait, let's keep the strict alternate format).

(日乃竜胆)Rhea-san, since we have a beginner in tow, refrain from vivid horror descriptions that make gastric juices flow backward. Listen, Io-chi, I will explain step by step. First, we'll crush the incorrect choices. As an exam technique, knowing what is wrong is the shortest path to the correct answer.

(月凪惟緒)はーい、ひのりん教官。間違った選択肢たちの、切なくも儚い散りざまを見届けるね。

(月凪惟緒)Okay-y, Instructor Hinorin. I'll bear witness to the sorrowful yet fleeting demise of the incorrect choices.

(日乃竜胆)では、最初の不正解の選択肢からいくぞ。「選択肢A：Lambda関数のタイムアウト値を極端に短くし、処理に時間がかかるメッセージを強制的に即座に切り捨てる」。これの何が致命的か分かるか？

(日乃竜胆)Now, let's start with the first incorrect choice. "Option A: Extremely shorten the timeout value of the Lambda function and forcibly and immediately discard messages that take time to process." Do you know what is fatal about this?

(月凪惟緒)えーっと、タイムアウトが短いと、がんばって働いてる途中で「時間切れー！」って強制終了されちゃうから、中途半端な状態で仕事が投げ出されちゃう？

(月凪惟緒)Uhm, if the timeout is short, it gets forcibly terminated with "Time's up!" right in the middle of working hard, so the job gets abandoned halfway through?

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だな、イオち。その通りだ。タイムアウトを短くしすぎると、本来正常に処理できるはずの負荷の高いメッセージまで途中で打ち切られ、何度もリトライの嵐を引き起こす。結果として、キューの中身が処理されないままゴミの山と化すのだ。

(日乃竜胆)Keen insight, Io-chi. Exactly that. If you make the timeout too short, even high-load messages that could normally be processed successfully are cut off midway, triggering a storm of retries over and over. As a result, the contents of the queue turn into a mountain of garbage without ever being processed.

(蒞星怜空)まるで、期限が来たら問答無用で首を刎ねられる社内プロジェクトのようだな。成果物のクオリティなど知ったことかと言い放つ、狂気に満ちたスケジュール管理そのものだ。

(蒞星怜空)It's just like an in-house project where heads are lopped off without question when the deadline hits. It is none other than mad schedule management that proclaims, "Who cares about the quality of the deliverables?"

(日乃竜胆)例えがいちいち物騒だな……。次だ。「選択肢B：Amazon SQSのメッセージの可視性タイムアウト（Visibility Timeout）をゼロに設定し、すべてのワーカーが同時に同じメッセージを奪い合うようにする」。これも大間違いだ。

(日乃竜胆)Your metaphors are menacing every single time... Next. "Option B: Set the message visibility timeout of Amazon SQS to zero, and have all workers scramble for the same message simultaneously." This is also a huge mistake.

(月凪惟緒)可視性タイムアウト……？ 見えたり見えなかったりする幽霊みたいな時間のこと？

(月凪惟緒)Visibility timeout...? Is that like a ghost-like time where things are visible and invisible?

(日乃竜胆)惜しいが違う。SQSでは、あるコンシューマーがメッセージを取得すると、他の人に見えないように「見えなくする時間（可視性タイムアウト）」を設定し、二重処理を防ぐのだ。ここをゼロにしたらどうなるか？ 取得した瞬間に他のコンシューマーからも見えてしまい、同じメッセージの争奪戦、すなわち重複処理の地獄絵図が展開される。

(日乃竜胆)Close, but no. In SQS, when a consumer fetches a message, it sets a "visibility timeout" so others can't see it, preventing duplicate processing. What happens if you set this to zero? The moment it's fetched, it becomes visible to other consumers as well, unleashing a hellish landscape of duplicate processing battles for the exact same message.

(蒞星怜空)全員が一つのパイを奪い合って互いの足を引っ張り合い、最終的に誰も口にできず泥まみれになって倒れる、飢餓状態の動物園の檻のような光景だな。非常に美しい混沌だ。

(蒞星怜空)It’s like the cage of a starving zoo where everyone fights over a single pie, pulls each other's legs, and ultimately collapses covered in mud without anyone getting a bite. A truly beautiful chaos.

(日乃竜胆)美しくない、迷惑なだけだ。さて、不正解の選択肢の最後だ。「選択肢C：エラーが発生したメッセージをそのまま元のキューの先頭に無限にプッシュバックし続ける」。これがまさに、先ほど話題に出たポイズンピルを放置する最悪のアンチパターンだ。

(日乃竜胆)It's not beautiful, it's just a nuisance. Now, for the last of the incorrect choices. "Option C: Continuously push back error-causing messages to the front of the original queue indefinitely." This is precisely the worst anti-pattern of leaving the poison pill we mentioned earlier unattended.

(月凪惟緒)エラーになった子を、何のお仕置きもせずに「はい一番前ねー」って何度も並び直させるのって、無限ループの刑に処してるみたいでちょっとかわいそう。

(月凪惟緒)Sending the child who made an error right back to the front of the line without any punishment with a "Yes, you're first in line again" is like sentencing them to an infinite loop, kind of pitiful.

(日乃竜胆)かわいそうどころか、システム全体がその処理にリソースを食い潰され、他の正常なメッセージが一切処理できなくなる。これがポイズンピル問題の正体だ。

(日乃竜胆)Far from pitiful, the entire system's resources get eaten up by that processing, rendering it incapable of processing any other normal messages whatsoever. This is the true nature of the poison pill problem.

(蒞星怜空)終わりなき賽の河原の石積みだな。何度積み上げても鬼が金棒で叩き壊すように、無意味なリトライがCPUの熱と電気代を湯水のように浪費し続け、やがて会社組織そのものを経済的破滅へと導く。素晴らしい終末論的ディストピアだ。

(蒞星怜空)It's the endless stone stacking of Sai no Kawara. No matter how many times you pile them up, an ogre smashes them down with an iron club, and pointless retries continue to waste CPU heat and electricity like water, eventually leading the corporate entity itself to economic ruin. A wonderful eschatological dystopia.

(日乃竜胆)経済的破滅とか言うな。だが、その通り、これを防ぐ仕組みが必要なのだ。そこでようやく正解の登場となる。

(日乃竜胆)Don't talk about economic ruin... But precisely, we need a mechanism to prevent this. That is where the correct answer finally comes in.

(日乃竜胆)正解の選択肢：「Amazon SQSのデッドレターキュー（DLQ：Dead Letter Queue）を設定し、指定した回数を超えて処理に失敗したメッセージを自動的に隔離する。さらに、AWS Lambdaのイベントソースマッピングで最大受信試行回数（Maximum Receive Count）を適切に構成する」。これが真の解決策だ。

(日乃竜胆)Correct choice: "Configure an Amazon SQS Dead Letter Queue (DLQ) to automatically isolate messages that fail processing beyond a specified number of times. Furthermore, properly configure the Maximum Receive Count in the AWS Lambda event source mapping." This is the true solution.

(月凪惟緒)でっどれたーきゅー……？ なんかゾンビ映画に出てきそうな物騒な名前だけど、隔離病棟みたいなものってこと？

(月凪惟緒)Dead letter queue...? Sounds like a menacing name straight out of a zombie movie, but does that mean it's like an isolation ward?

(日乃竜胆)慧眼だな、イオち。まさにその通りだ。何度やってもエラーを起こす「問題児」のメッセージを、通常のキューから切り離して別の隔離用キュー（DLQ）に退避させる。これにより、正常なメッセージの処理フローを守りつつ、エラー品を後から静かに検体調査できるようになるのだ。

(日乃竜胆)Keen insight, Io-chi. Exactly right. The "problem child" messages that throw errors no matter how many times you try are detached from the regular queue and evacuated to a separate quarantine queue (DLQ). This protects the processing flow of normal messages while allowing the defective items to be quietly inspected later.

(蒞星怜空)伝染病患者を街の外壁の向こうに放り出し、跳ね橋を上げて焼き払うような、中世ヨーロッパの潔い防疫体制だな。美しき断絶、これぞアーキテクチャの醍醐味といえよう。

(蒞星怜空)It's like a medieval European quarantine system where infectious patients are thrown beyond the city's outer wall, the drawbridge is raised, and it's burned down. A beautiful severance—this is truly the real thrill of architecture.

(日乃竜胆)例えが相変わらず物騒すぎるが、概念としては完璧に正しい。デッドレターキューと最大受信試行回数の組み合わせ、これこそがDOP試験で問われる鉄則のアーキテクチャパターンだ。心に刻んでおくがいい。

(日乃竜胆)Your metaphors are menacing as always, but conceptually you are completely correct. The combination of a dead letter queue and the maximum receive count—this is the ironclad architectural pattern tested in the DOP exam. Engrave it upon your hearts.

(月凪惟緒)はーい、ひのりん。なんだか頭がクラクラしてきたから、ちょっと永久凍土でクールダウンしてくるね……。

(月凪惟緒)Okay-y, Hinorin. My head's starting to spin a bit, so I think I'll go cool down in the permafrost for a second...

(日乃竜胆)勝手に溶けるな、イオち。講義はまだ終わっていないぞ。

(日乃竜胆)Don't melt away on your own, Io-chi. The lecture isn't over yet.
@15
(日乃竜胆)それでは、本日のAWS講義を始めよう。今日の主題は、CloudTechの演習問題「DOP-1001」だ。プロフェッショナルとしての知見を授けるゆえ、心して聞くがいい。

(Hinode Rindo) Let us commence today's AWS lecture. Our subject is the CloudTech practice problem "DOP-1001." Listen well, as I shall impart the insights of a professional.

(月凪惟緒)ひのりん、お疲れー。なんか今日も画面の文字が細かすぎて、見ているだけで脳が永久凍土に閉じ込められそうなんですけど。とりあえず、今日の問題って何をする人なの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Good work, Hinori. The text on the screen is so tiny today that just looking at it makes my brain feel trapped in permafrost. Anyway, what is this problem even about?

(月凪惟緒)
(Tsukinagi Io)

(蒞星怜空)ふっ、相変わらず溶けないアイスキャンデーのような気だるさだな、イオちは。この問題はな、いわば「治安の悪いインターネットの荒野から、脆弱なWebアプリケーションという名のガラス細工の御殿をどう守り抜くか」という、血なまさい要塞防衛の物語なのだよ。

(Rize Rea) Heh, you maintain that sluggishness of an unmelting popsicle as usual, Io. This problem is, so to speak, a bloody tale of fortress defense: how to protect a fragile palace of web applications from the lawless badlands of the internet.

(日乃竜胆)怜空さん、物騒な比喩はやめろ。だが、大筋は間違っていない。問題の背景を整理しよう。アプリケーションはAmazon EC2インスタンス上で稼働しており、その前段にはApplication Load Balancer、いわゆるALBが配置されている。この環境に対して、悪意ある攻撃や不正なトラフィックからいかにして堅牢に保護するか、その手法を問うているのだ。

(Hinode Rindo) Rea-san, cease the ominous metaphors. However, the general outline is correct. Let us organize the background of the problem. The application runs on Amazon EC2 instances, preceded by an Application Load Balancer, commonly known as an ALB. The question asks how to robustly protect this environment from malicious attacks and unauthorized traffic.

(Hinode Rindo)
(Hinode Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)えーっと、ALBってあれでしょ、道路の料金所みたいなところで、車をいい感じに振り分けるやつ。そこにやってくる変な車を片っ端から検問するってこと？

(Tsukinagi Io) Um, an ALB is like a toll booth on a highway that distributes cars nicely, right? Does it mean inspecting all the weird cars rolling up there one by one?

(蒞星怜空)おや、イオちにしては冴えた洞察だな。だが、料金所で待ち構えているのは微笑ましいお巡りさんではなく、泥酔した重戦車のようなSQLインジェクションやクロスサイトスクリプティングという名の破壊神なのだよ。奴らは容赦なくアプリケーションの内臓を踏みにじっていく。

(Rize Rea) Oh, a rather sharp insight for you, Io. However, what awaits at that toll booth is not a friendly police officer, but destructive deities named SQL injection and cross-site scripting, akin to a heavily intoxicated main battle tank. They mercilessly trample upon the internal organs of the application.

(日乃竜胆)不穏な表現をするな、怜空さん。だが本質はそこだ。Webアプリケーションに対するレイヤー7の攻撃、つまりHTTP/HTTPS通信の中身を検査し、悪質なリクエストをブロックするために最適なAWSサービスが問われている。ここで登場するのが「AWS WAF」だ。

(Hinode Rindo) Do not use unsettling expressions, Rea-san. But that is the essence. The question asks for the optimal AWS service to inspect Layer 7 attacks against web applications—meaning the contents of HTTP/HTTPS traffic—and block malicious requests. This is where "AWS WAF" enters the stage.

(月凪惟緒)だふっ、ダブリュ、エー、エフ？ なんか名前が呪文っぽくて強そう。これって何をしてくれるの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Dafu, W, A, F? The name sounds like a spell and seems strong. What does this thing actually do?

(Hinode Rindo)AWS WAFとは、Webアプリケーションファイアウォールの略称だ。ウェブアプリケーションへのリクエストを監視し、SQLインジェクションやクロスサイトスクリプティングなどの一般的な脆弱性を悪用した攻撃から保護する。ALBやAmazon CloudFrontなどのリバースプロキシの前段に組み込み、カスタムルールに基づいてトラフィックを許可またはブロックできるのだ。

(Hinode Rindo) AWS WAF stands for Web Application Firewall. It monitors requests to web applications and protects them from attacks exploiting common vulnerabilities such as SQL injection and cross-site scripting. It can be integrated in front of reverse proxies like ALB or Amazon CloudFront, allowing you to allow or block traffic based on custom rules.

(Hinode Rindo)
(Hinode Rindo)

(蒞星怜空)ほう、WAFか。それはまるで、絢爛豪華な舞踏会の入口で、招待状の裏に隠し持った毒ナイフや呪詛の羊皮紙を一枚一枚丁寧に見つけ出し、容赦なく放り捨てる冷徹な門番のようなものだな。美しき秩序の裏で、血の雨が降るのだよ。

(Rize Rea) Ho, WAF. That is akin to a cold-blooded gatekeeper at the entrance of a lavish ball who meticulously inspects every single hidden poisoned knife or parchment of curse concealed behind the invitation cards, ruthlessly tossing them out. Beneath the facade of beautiful order, a rain of blood falls.

(月凪惟緒)こわ……。でも、そういう悪いやつを弾く仕組みなんだね。じゃあ、今回の選択肢のなかで、どれが間違いで、どれが正解なのか、ヒノりん詳しく教えてよ。いつも通り、まずは間違いの選択肢からね。

(Tsukinagi Io) Scary... But it's a mechanism to weed out those bad actors, right? So, Hinorin, please explain in detail which options are wrong and which one is correct. As always, let's start with the incorrect options, shall we?

(Hinode Rindo)承知した。では、不正解の選択肢から順に紐解いていこう。まずは「AWS Shield」に関する選択肢だ。これがなぜ不正解なのかを解説する。

(Hinode Rindo) Understood. Let us unravel the incorrect options in order. First is the option concerning "AWS Shield." I shall explain why this is incorrect.

(Hinode Rindo)
(Hinode Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)シールド？ なんかガンダムのバリアみたいな名前だけど、これもダメなの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Shield? It sounds like a Gundam barrier, but is this no good either?

(日乃竜胆)AWS Shieldは、DDoS（分散型サービス拒否）攻撃からアプリケーションを保護するためのマネージドサービスだ。レイヤー3やレイヤー4といったネットワーク層、あるいはレイヤー7のインフラストラクチャレベルでの大量のトラフィック洪水を防ぐことに特化している。今回の設問が求めるのは、HTTPリクエストの構文や悪意ある文字列（SQLインジェクション等）の詳細な検査とフィルタリングだ。そのため、Shield単体では目的を達成できない。

(Hinode Rindo) AWS Shield is a managed service designed to protect applications from DDoS (Distributed Denial of Service) attacks. It specializes in preventing massive floods of traffic at network layers like Layer 3 and Layer 4, or infrastructure-level Layer 7. What this question demands is detailed inspection and filtering of HTTP request syntax and malicious strings (such as SQL injections). Therefore, Shield alone cannot achieve the objective.

(蒞星怜空)なるほどな。AWS Shieldとは、いわば国境の防壁に押し寄せる数百万のゾンビの大群を機関銃で薙ぎ払う無慈悲な対軍用兵器にすぎない。だが、パスポートを偽造して上品な笑みを浮かべながらスパイとして潜入してくる単体の暗殺者を見抜くことはできないのだよ。適材適所という残酷な現実がそこにはある。

(Rize Rea) I see. AWS Shield is, so to speak, a merciless anti-personnel weapon mowing down millions of swarming zombie hordes surging against national border walls with machine guns. However, it cannot spot a lone assassin infiltrating as a spy with a forged passport and a polite smile. The cruel reality of putting the right tool in the right place exists there.

(月凪惟緒)うわ、ゾンビと暗殺者の例えが生々しすぎて、お腹いっぱいになってきた……。じゃあ、他の不正解の選択肢はどうなの？ 例えば「Amazon GuardDuty」とか。

(Tsukinagi Io) Ugh, the zombie and assassin analogies are too vivid, I'm getting full... So what about the other incorrect options? For instance, "Amazon GuardDuty."

(Hinode Rindo)Amazon GuardDutyは、AWS環境内の悪意ある挙動や不審なアクティビティを検出するためのインテリジェントな脅威検出サービスだ。VPCフローログやDNSログ、CloudTrailログなどを分析し、仮想通貨マイニングや不正なAPI呼び出しなどの兆候を見つけ出す。しかし、リアルタイムでHTTPリクエストのペイロードを検査し、Webアプリケーションへの侵入そのものをインラインでブロックする機能はない。検出はできても防御のタイミングが事後になるため、不適格だ。

(Hinode Rindo) Amazon GuardDuty is an intelligent threat detection service designed to detect malicious behavior and suspicious activity within AWS environments. It analyzes VPC flow logs, DNS logs, and CloudTrail logs to find signs of cryptocurrency mining or unauthorized API calls. However, it lacks the capability to inspect HTTP request payloads in real-time and block intrusions into web applications inline. Since detection occurs after the fact rather than real-time prevention, it is unqualified.

(Hinode Rindo)
(Hinode Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)ふむふむ、ガードダューティさんは、後から「あ、泥棒が入りましたよ」って教えてくれる防犯カメラみたいなものかぁ。その場ではボコボコにされて終わりってことね。

(Tsukinagi Io) Hmm, GuardDuty is like a security camera that tells you afterwards, "Ah, a burglar has broken in." So you get beaten up on the spot and it's over, huh?

(蒞星怜空)その通りだ、イオち。事後に死体を検分して「見事な刺し傷ですね」と冷静に微笑む検視官のようなものだな。遺族にとっては全く救いにならない残酷なオブザーバーにすぎない。

(Rize Rea) Exactly, Io. It is like a coroner who inspects a corpse after the fact and calmly smiles, saying, "What a splendid stab wound." It is nothing more than a cruel observer offering no salvation to the grieving family.

(日乃竜胆)例えが相変わらず物騒すぎるが、事実その通りだ。検出と防御のメカニズムの違いを正確に理解しておかねばならない。

(Hinode Rindo) The analogy is as unsettling as ever, but indeed correct. One must accurately understand the difference between detection and defense mechanisms.

(月凪惟緒)じゃあ、残りの選択肢にある「AWS IAM」とか「Amazon Inspector」はどうなの？ これらもなんとなく名前が厳かだし、セキュリティっぽそうだけど。

(Tsukinagi Io) Then what about "AWS IAM" or "Amazon Inspector" in the remaining options? They also sound solemn and seem related to security.

(Hinode Rindo)AWS IAM（Identity and Access Management）は、AWSリソースへのアクセスを安全に管理するための認証・認可サービスだ。誰がどのリソースにアクセスできるかの権限を制御するものであり、外部からのWebリクエストに含まれる悪意あるSQL文などを検査する機能はない。また、Amazon Inspectorは、EC2インスタンスやコンテナイメージの脆弱性やネットワークの露出を自動評価するセキュリティ脆弱性評価サービスであり、これも同様に実行時のHTTPトラフィックをインラインで検査するものではない。どちらも今回の目的とは的外れだ。

(Hinode Rindo) AWS IAM (Identity and Access Management) is an authentication and authorization service for securely managing access to AWS resources. It controls permissions on who can access which resources, but lacks the ability to inspect malicious SQL statements contained in external web requests. Furthermore, Amazon Inspector is a security vulnerability assessment service that automatically evaluates vulnerabilities and network exposure in EC2 instances or container images, which likewise does not inspect runtime HTTP traffic inline. Both are wide of the mark for our current objective.

(Hinode Rindo)
(Hinode Rindo)

(月凪惟緒)なるほどねぇ。アイアムさんは身元確認の受付のお姉さんで、インスペクターさんは持ち物検査じゃなくて健康診断のお医者さんって感じか。どっちも今回の「暴徒を食い止める」っていう役割には使えないわけだ。

(Tsukinagi Io) I see. IAM is the receptionist lady checking identities, and Inspector is the doctor giving a health checkup rather than checking luggage. Neither can be used for the role of "stopping rioters" this time.

(蒞星怜空)見事なアナロジーだな、イオち。受付のお姉さんに「私は殺人鬼です」と書かれた身分証を見せて通る馬鹿はいないし、健康診断の医者に「私の胃酸にはSQLインジェクションが混ざっています」と訴えても笑われるだけだ。適切なツールを選ばなければ、システムは瞬く間に阿鼻叫叫の地獄絵図と化す。

(Rize Rea) A splendid analogy, Io. No fool presents an ID stating "I am a murderer" to a receptionist and gets let through, and complaining to a health checkup doctor that "my stomach acid is mixed with SQL injection" will only get you laughed at. If you do not choose the appropriate tool, the system instantly transforms into a pandemonium of wailing and shrieking.

(日乃竜胆)そこまで言う必要はないが、結論としてはその通りだ。そして、これらすべての不正解の選択肢を退けた上で、唯一無二の正解として君臨するのが「AWS WAF」をApplication Load Balancerに関連付けるという構成になる。

(Hinode Rindo) There is no need to go that far, but the conclusion is correct. And after dismissing all these incorrect options, the configuration that reigns as the one and only correct answer is associating "AWS WAF" with the Application Load Balancer.

(月凪惟緒)やっと正解にたどり着いたぁ……。ALBの前にAWS WAFを置いて、悪意あるリクエストをバシッと弾く。これが今回の正解ルートってわけね。ヒノりん、今日も完璧な解説ありがとう。なんだか脳みそが少しだけアップデートされた気がする。

(Tsukinagi Io) We finally reached the correct answer... Put AWS WAF in front of the ALB and brilliantly deflect malicious requests. This is the correct route for this time. Hinorin, thank you for the flawless explanation as always. I feel like my brain has been updated just a tiny bit.

(Hinode Rindo)当然の結果だ。基礎を疎かにする者には容赦ない洗礼が待っているが、このように一つひとつ紐解けば決して恐れるものではない。次回もこの調子で精進するぞ。

(Hinode Rindo) It is a natural result. A merciless baptism awaits those who neglect the basics, but if you unravel them one by one like this, there is nothing to fear. We shall continue to devote ourselves in this manner next time as well.

(Hinode Rindo)
(Hinode Rindo)
@16
(日乃竜胆) む、集まったか。それでは本日は、AWSの認定試験対策において頻出かつ極めて重要なアーキテクチャ設計に関する設問を題材とし、前提知識から徹底的に紐解いていく。初心者であるイオちにとっても、そして我々の師匠である怜空さんにとっても、有意義な時間とする所存だ。覚悟して聞くがいい。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Well, you have all gathered. Today, we shall thoroughly examine a question regarding cloud architecture design, which frequently appears and is critically important in AWS certification preparation, starting from the very fundamentals. I intend to make this a meaningful session for both Io-chi, who is a beginner, and Reia-san, our master. Prepare yourselves and listen well.

(月凪惟緒) ひのりん、お疲れ様ぁ。なんか今日のホワイトボード、文字がびっしり詰まってて見てるだけで頭が溶けそうなんだけど……。とりあえず、あったかいココアでも飲みながら聞いてるねぇ。

(Tsukinagi Io) Hinorin, hello there. Somehow, the whiteboard today is so packed with text that my brain feels like it's melting just looking at it... Anyway, I'll just listen while sipping some warm cocoa.

(蒞星怜空) ほう、今日の生贄はこれか。クラウドの闇鍋に放り込まれた子羊の断末魔が今から聞こえてくるようだな。まあ、せいぜい盛大に焼き払われるがいい。見物させてもらうさ。

(Rize Reia) Ho, is this today's sacrificial lamb? I can already hear the death rattles of a little lamb thrown into the dark pot of the cloud. Well, you might as well get thoroughly incinerated. I'll enjoy watching the spectacle.

(日乃竜胆) 怜空さん、最初から不穏な予言を垂れ流すのはやめるんだな。さて、まずは問題の全体像を把握するぞ。画面の設問を確認する。
「ある企業がAmazon API Gateway、AWS Lambda、およびAmazon S3を使用したサーバレスアプリケーションを構築しています。Lambda関数は、API Gateway経由でクライアントからのリクエストを受け付け、S3バケットにデータを保存し、外部のS3互換APIへデータを送信します。この構成において、Lambda関数が外部のS3互換APIへ安全に認証情報を渡すための最もセキュアな設計として、適切である選択肢を選ぶことだ」
……という内容だな。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Reia-san, stop spewing ominous prophecies right from the start. Now, let us first grasp the overall picture of the problem. Let us check the question on the screen.
"A company is building a serverless application using Amazon API Gateway, AWS Lambda, and Amazon S3. The Lambda function receives requests from clients via API Gateway, stores data in an S3 bucket, and transmits data to an external S3-compatible API. In this configuration, choose the appropriate option as the most secure design for the Lambda function to securely pass credentials to the external S3-compatible API."
...Such is the content.

(月凪惟緒) え〜っと、いきなり呪文みたいなカタカナが押し寄せてきたんだけどさ。API Gateway？ Lambda？ エススリー？ 何それ、美味しいの？

(Tsukinagi Io) Um, a bunch of spell-like katakana words just rushed in all at once. API Gateway? Lambda? S3? What are those, are they edible?

(日乃竜胆) 食べ物ではない。AWSの主要なサービス名だ。まずは前提知識として、これらの基本概念を叩き込んでおく必要がある。
まず**Amazon API Gateway**とは、開発者がAPIを作成、配布、保守、監視するためのフルマネージドサービスだ。要するにかつての受付係や門番のようなものだな。外部からのリクエストを受け取り、適切なバックエンドに橋渡しをする。
次に**AWS Lambda**とは、サーバーの管理をすることなくコードを実行できるコンピューティングサービスだ。イベント駆動型であり、何かリクエストが来たその瞬間だけ魔法のように立ち上がり、処理が終われば消える。
そして**Amazon S3**（Simple Storage Service）は、インターネット用のストレージ、つまり無限の容量を持つデジタル物置だと思えばいい。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) They are not food. They are major AWS service names. First, as foundational knowledge, we must hammer these basic concepts into your head.
First, **Amazon API Gateway** is a fully managed service that enables developers to create, publish, maintain, monitor, and secure APIs. In short, it is like a traditional receptionist or gatekeeper. It receives requests from the outside and bridges them to the appropriate backend.
Next, **AWS Lambda** is a compute service that lets you run code without provisioning or managing servers. It is event-driven, springing up like magic the exact moment a request arrives, and vanishing once processing is complete.
And **Amazon S3** (Simple Storage Service) can be thought of as storage for the internet, meaning a digital warehouse with infinite capacity.

(月凪惟緒) へぇ〜、API Gatewayが受付で、Lambdaがその場でパッと動いて消える働き者で、S3がなんでも放り込める物置ねぇ。なんとなく、ブラック企業のバックヤードみたいな慌ただしさを感じるけど……。

(Tsukinagi Io) Huh, so API Gateway is the receptionist, Lambda is a hardworking person who springs into action on the spot and disappears, and S3 is a storage room where you can throw anything. I somehow sense the frantic hustle and bustle of a black company's back office...

(蒞星怜空) ほう、ブラック企業のバックヤードか。いい着眼点だなイオち。そこでは過労死したサーバーの霊体が夜な夜なさまよい、誰も見ていないところでデータが勝手に暗号化されて闇に葬られるという都市伝説があるとかないとか。

(Rize Reia) Ho, the back office of a black company. Good perspective, Io-chi. There is an urban legend that the spirits of overworked servers wander about there night after night, and data is automatically encrypted and buried in darkness where no one is looking.

(日乃竜胆) 怜空さん、怖い話を捏造して初心者を混乱させるのはやめるんだ。
さて、本題に戻る。今回の課題は、「Lambda関数から外部のS3互換APIへ安全に認証情報を渡すための最もセキュアな設計」を見つけ出すことだ。
これを理解するためには、不正解の選択肢から順に検討していくのが最も確実だ。まずは最初の不正解の選択肢を見ていくぞ。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Reia-san, stop fabricating scary stories to confuse a beginner.
Now, let us return to the main subject. The task this time is to find "the most secure design for securely passing credentials from a Lambda function to an external S3-compatible API."
To understand this, it is most reliable to examine the incorrect options in order. First, let us look at the first incorrect option.

---

### 不正解の選択肢の検討 / Examination of Incorrect Options

(日乃竜胆) 不正解の選択肢の一つ目として、しばしば見られるのが「認証情報をLambda関数のソースコードに直接ハードコードする」という方法だ。あるいは環境変数に平文で保存する方法だな。
これはセキュリティ上の観点から論外であり、致命的な脆弱性を生む。コードがバージョン管理システム（GitHubなど）に誤ってプッシュされた場合、世界中に認証情報がばら撒かれることになるからだ。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) As one of the incorrect options, a method frequently seen is "hardcoding credentials directly into the Lambda function's source code." Or storing them in plaintext within environment variables.
This is out of the question from a security standpoint and creates a fatal vulnerability. If the code is accidentally pushed to a version management system (such as GitHub), the credentials will be scattered all over the world.

(月凪惟緒) うわ、それって自分の家の合鍵を玄関のドアにデカデカとマジックで書き残しておくようなものじゃん。泥棒に「どうぞお入りください」って言ってるようなもんねぇ……怖すぎ。

(Tsukinagi Io) Whoa, that's like writing a spare key for your house in big marker on the front door. It's like telling a burglar "please come right in"... way too terrifying.

(蒞星怜空) 素晴らしい比喩だなイオち。まさに、開け放たれた門の前に札束の山を積み上げ、通りすがりの野良犬に「全財産を自由にお持ち帰りください」と首輪をつけてお辞儀をしているようなものだ。セキュリティ意識の欠如というよりは、もはや精神の崩壊と言えよう。

(Rize Reia) A splendid metaphor, Io-chi. It is precisely like piling up mountains of cash in front of an open gate and bowing to stray dogs passing by with a collar saying, "Please freely take all my worldly goods home." Rather than a lack of security awareness, it can no longer be described as anything other than a mental collapse.

(日乃竜胆) 怜空さんの表現はいちいち物騒だな。だが、指摘の通りだ。ソースコードや通常の環境変数への機密情報の直書きは絶対にしてはならない。
他にも、暗号化されていない状態でプレーンテキストのままパラメーターストアに保存し、それを毎回平文で呼び出すような設計も同様に不適切だ。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Reia-san's expressions are unsettling every single time. However, as pointed out, direct writing of sensitive information into source code or regular environment variables must never be done.
In addition, designs that store secrets as plaintext without encryption in a parameter store and call them in plaintext every time are similarly inappropriate.

---

### 正解の選択肢の解説 / Explanation of the Correct Option

(日乃竜胆) では、間違いの選択肢群を排除した上で、残った最もセキュアな正解の選択肢について解説する。
正解となる設計は、**AWS Secrets Manager** または **AWS Systems Manager Parameter Store (SecureString)** を利用し、機密情報を安全に暗号化・管理した上で、Lambda関数から動的に取得する仕組みを採用することだ。さらに、アクセス権限は最小権限の原則に基づき、IAMロールを適切に設定して制御する。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Now, having eliminated the incorrect option groups, I shall explain the remaining, most secure correct option.
The correct design is to utilize **AWS Secrets Manager** or **AWS Systems Manager Parameter Store (SecureString)** to securely encrypt and manage sensitive information, and adopt a mechanism where the Lambda function retrieves it dynamically. Furthermore, access permissions are controlled by properly configuring IAM roles based on the principle of least privilege.

(月凪惟緒) むむ……？ シークレットなんちゃらとか、パラメーターなんちゃら、あとアイアムロール？ なんか急に専門用語のバーゲンセールが始まったんだけど……。ひのりん、もう少し噛み砕いて教えてよぉ。

(Tsukinagi Io) Hmm...? Secret-something, parameter-something, and also IAM role? It feels like a bargain sale of technical terms suddenly started... Hinorin, please break it down a bit more for me.

(日乃竜胆) ほう、慧眼だなイオち。当然、そこを解説せずに次に進むわけにはいかない。
まず**AWS Secrets Manager**とは、データベースの認証情報やAPIキー、パスワードなどの機密情報を安全に保管、管理、および取得するためのサービスだ。自動ローテーション機能なども備えており、機密情報の管理においては最高峰の安全性を誇る。
次に**AWS Systems Manager Parameter Store**の**SecureString**とは、設定データや機密情報を階層型ストレージで管理する機能であり、KMS（Key Management Service）を用いて機密情報を暗号化して保存できる優れものだ。
そして**IAM（AWS Identity and Access Management）ロール**とは、AWSリソースに対して「何をしてよいか」という権限を一時的に付与するための仕組みだ。Lambda関数にIAMロールを割り当てることで、コード内にパスワードを書かなくても、安全にSecrets Managerへアクセスして認証情報を取得できるようになる。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Ho, insightful, Io-chi. Naturally, I cannot move on without explaining those points.
First, **AWS Secrets Manager** is a service for securely storing, managing, and retrieving sensitive information such as database credentials, API keys, and passwords. It also features automatic rotation and boasts the highest level of security in managing sensitive information.
Next, **SecureString** in **AWS Systems Manager Parameter Store** is a feature that manages configuration data and sensitive information in hierarchical storage, and is an excellent tool that allows confidential information to be encrypted and stored using KMS (Key Management Service).
And an **IAM (AWS Identity and Access Management) role** is a mechanism for temporarily granting permissions such as "what is allowed to be done" to AWS resources. By assigning an IAM role to a Lambda function, it becomes able to securely access Secrets Manager and retrieve credentials without writing passwords in the code.

(月凪惟緒) なーるほどねぇ。自分で合鍵を持ち歩く代わりに、銀行の金庫の鍵付き貸金庫に預けておいて、ちゃんとした身分証明書（IAMロール）を持っている人だけが取り出せるようにする、みたいなシステムってことかぁ。それなら安心だねぇ。

(Tsukinagi Io) I seeee. So it's like a system where instead of carrying your own spare key around, you leave it in a locked safe deposit box at a bank, and only people with proper identification (IAM role) are allowed to retrieve it. That way, it's secure.

(蒞星怜空) ほう、イオちにしては冴えた理解だな。だが、その貸金庫の鍵を管理している銀行員が実は二重スパイで、夜な夜な顧客の預金を元手に裏カジノでスッテンテンになっているとしたらどうだ？ セキュリティの要塞も、人間の愚かさの前には砂上の楼閣にすぎないというわけだな。

(Rize Reia) Ho, a sharp understanding for Io-chi. But what if the bank clerk managing the key to that safe deposit box is actually a double agent, going flat broke at an underground casino night after night using customers' deposits? Even a fortress of security is nothing more than a castle made of sand in front of human stupidity.

(日乃竜胆) 怜空さん、例え話がいちいち退廃的でダークすぎるんだよ。だが、セキュリティ設計において「誰が権限を握っているか」「どうやってアクセスを監査するか」が極めて重要であるという点は、至極真っ当な教訓だな。
まとめると、今回の設問における正解の選択肢は、**機密情報をコードや環境変数から排除し、AWS Secrets Managerなどの専用サービスで暗号化して管理した上で、適切なIAMロールを用いた安全な権限委譲によってLambda関数に取得させる設計**となる。これによって、外部のS3互換APIへも安全に認証情報を渡し、セキュアな通信を実現できるのだ。

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Reia-san, your analogies are decadently dark every single time. However, the point that "who holds the privileges" and "how access is audited" are extremely important in security design is an exceptionally valid lesson.
To summarize, the correct option in this question is **a design that eliminates sensitive information from code and environment variables, encrypts and manages it using a dedicated service such as AWS Secrets Manager, and has the Lambda function retrieve it through secure delegation of authority using an appropriate IAM role.** By doing this, credentials can be securely passed to external S3-compatible APIs, achieving secure communication.

(月凪惟緒) ひのりんの解説、相変わらずキレッキレですごいねぇ。なんだか私までクラウドのマスターになった気分だよ。そろそろココアも飲み終わったし、ちょっとお昼寝してもいいかなぁ……。

(Tsukinagi Io) Hinorin's explanation is sharp as ever and amazing. I kind of feel like I've become a cloud master myself. I'm almost done drinking my cocoa, so can I take a little nap now...

(日乃竜胆) 授業中に寝るなど言語道断だ、イオち。さあ、次の問題に進むぞ。気を引き締めるんだな！

(Hinotsuki Rindou) Sleeping during class is out of the question, Io-chi. Now, we are moving on to the next question. Brace yourself!
@17
日乃竜胆
「AWSの学習を進めるにあたり、まずは今回の設問の核心を紐解くこととする。準備はいいか、イオち、怜空さん？」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"As we proceed with our AWS studies, we shall first untangle the core of today's question. Are you both ready, Io-chi, Rea-san?"

月凪惟緒
「ひのりん、お疲れ様。なんかね、画面に映ってる変な四角い図形とか、雲のマークがこっちをジトッと見てる気がして、すでに眠気と永久凍土の冷たさが全身を支配してるんだけど……」

(Tsukina Io)
"Hinori, good work. You know, that weird square diagram and the cloud icon on the screen are staring at me blankly, and my whole body is already conquered by sleepiness and permafrost chill..."

月凪惟緒
英語
Tsukina Io
English

(Tsukina Io)
"My brain is currently functioning at a temperature lower than a dead battery in an abandoned refrigerator."

月凪惟緒
日本語
月凪惟緒
「でも、ここで寝たら全知全能の神に怒られそうだから、一応目だけは開けておくよ。ねえ、この『AWS Service Catalog』とかいう名前、なんか通販カタログみたいでおしゃれだけど、中身は全然優しくなさそうだね」

(Tsukina Io)
"But if I sleep here, the omnipotent god might get mad at me, so I'll keep my eyes open at least. Hey, this thing called 'AWS Service Catalog' sounds like a mail-order catalog and looks trendy, but the contents don't seem friendly at all."

(Tsukina Io)
English

蒞星怜空
「ふっ、通販カタログとは言い得て妙だな。あれは例えるなら、高級ホテルのルームサービスで頼んだはずの極上キャビアが、届いてみたら中身が全部『自己責任で調理しろ』と書かれた冷凍のイナゴの佃煮だったときの絶望感に似ている。クラウドの海原では、誰もが孤独な航海者であり、サービスカタログはその海で遭難するための精巧な羅針盤にすぎない」

(Rize Rea)
"Hph, comparing it to a mail-order catalog is quite apt. It's like the despair when you order prime caviar from room service at a luxury hotel, only to find it filled entirely with frozen grasshopper tsukudani labeled 'cook at your own risk.' On the ocean of clouds, everyone is a lonely navigator, and a service catalog is merely an exquisite compass designed to help you shipwreck."

(Rize Rea)
English

蒞星怜空
「Service catalog is nothing more than a meticulously crafted compass to ensure your swift and elegant shipwreck upon the desolate shores of corporate compliance.」

日乃竜胆
「怜空さん、相変わらず不穏で壮麗な比喩を好むものだな。だが、本質を突いている。今回の設問は、開発者が社内で承認されたAWSリソースのテンプレートのみを使って迅速に環境を構築しつつ、ガバナンスやセキュリティを統制する方法についてのものだ。まずは設問文をしっかりと読もう」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Rea-san, you always favor ominous yet magnificent metaphors. But you hit the core. Today's question concerns how developers can rapidly build environments using only pre-approved AWS resource templates within a company, while maintaining governance and security. Let us carefully read the question text first."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

日乃竜胆
「設問はこうだ。『企業は、開発者がAWS Service Catalogを使用して、社内のコンプライアンスポリシーに準拠した事前承認済みの製品のみをデプロイできるようにしたいと考えている。開発者は特定のリージョンでのみ製品を起動できるように制限し、コンプライアンスに違反する製品のデプロイを組織全体で予防的に朗らかに……いや、厳格に阻止したい。最も運用上のオーバーヘッドが低い要件を満げるアプローチはどれか？』」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"The question reads: 'A company wants to ensure that developers use AWS Service Catalog to deploy only pre-approved products that comply with internal compliance policies. The developers should be restricted to launching products only in specific regions, and the deployment of non-compliant products must be strictly prevented organization-wide. Which approach meets these requirements with the lowest operational overhead?'"

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「ひのりん、待って。『AWS Service Catalog』ってそもそも何？ 私の頭の中では、おしゃれなセレクトショップの店員さんが『これ、今季のトレンドの仮想サーバーですよ』って笑顔で勧めてくる絵面しか浮かばないんだけど」

(Tsukina Io)
"Hinori, wait. What on earth is 'AWS Service Catalog'? In my head, I can only picture a trendy select shop clerk smiling and recommending, 'This is this season's trending virtual server.'"

(Tsukina Io)
English

月凪惟緒
「My brain visualizes a chic boutique clerk pushing a high-availability EC2 instance like it's a limited-edition designer handbag coated in the tears of exhausted sysadmins.」

日乃竜胆
「慧眼だな、イオち。だが、あながち遠くはない。AWS Service Catalogとは、企業内で使用が許可されたITサービスやクラウドの構成テンプレート（CloudFormationテンプレートなど）を、カタログ形式で一元管理・提供する仕組みのことだ。開発者は一から面倒な設定をせずとも、管理者が用意した安全な『製品』を選んでポチるだけで、コンプライアンスに違反しない環境を安全に構築できる。いわば、社内専用の安全なクラウド通販サイトだな」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Keen insight, Io-chi. But it is not far off. AWS Service Catalog is a mechanism to centrally manage and provide IT services and cloud configuration templates (such as CloudFormation templates) permitted for use within a company in a catalog format. Developers can safely build compliant environments just by selecting and clicking safe 'products' prepared by administrators, without troublesome setup from scratch. It is, so to speak, an in-house secure cloud e-commerce site."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「なるほどねぇ。社内のえらい人たちが『これ以外使っちゃダメだからね！』って用意した安全なおもちゃ箱みたいなものか。じゃあ、今回の問題はその安全なおもちゃ箱を、勝手に変な遠くの国（リージョン）で広げたり、ヤバい構成を作ったりしないようにどうやって縛るかってこと？」

(Tsukina Io)
"I see. Like a safe toy box prepared by the big bosses where they say, 'You mustn't use anything else!' So this problem is about how to tie down that safe toy box so people don't carelessly open it in strange distant countries (regions) or build dangerous configurations?"

(Tsukina Io)
English

日乃竜胆
「その通りだ、イオち。よく理解した。開発者が勝手に東京以外のリージョンでリソースを作ったり、ガバナンスに反するテンプレートを使ったりするのを防ぎたい。しかも、運用上のオーバーヘッド――つまり、管理者が手動でチェックしたり面倒なスクリプトを維持したりする手間を最も低く抑える方法が求められている」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Precisely, Io-chi. You understood well. We want to prevent developers from arbitrarily creating resources in regions other than Tokyo, or using templates that violate governance. Furthermore, we need the method with the lowest operational overhead—meaning the least manual checking or troublesome script maintenance for administrators."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

蒞星怜空
「ふふ、管理者の手動チェックか。それはまるで、無限に湧き出るゾンビの群れを一本の爪楊枝で迎撃するようなものだ。自動化された統制がなければ、組織は一晩で暗黒の混沌へと沈み、朝にはAWS利用料の請求書を見た経営者が静かに首を吊る美しい阿鼻叫喚の地獄絵図が完成する。実に素晴らしいスリルだな」

(Rize Rea)
"Huhu, manual checks by administrators. That is like intercepting an endlessly spawning horde of zombies with a single toothpick. Without automated controls, an organization sinks into dark chaos overnight, and by morning, a magnificent, screaming hellscape is complete where executives view the AWS usage bill and quietly contemplate hanging themselves. Truly a wonderful thrill."

(Rize Rea)
English

蒞星怜空
「Without automated governance, your cloud architecture is merely a ticking time bomb wrapped in corporate compliance, waiting for an intern to accidentally delete production while trying to deploy a Minecraft server.」

日乃竜胆
「怜空さん、相変わらず表現が過激で寒気がするな。だが、その通りだ。手動での運用は破滅を招く。だからこそ、AWSが提供するネイティブな統制機能を使う必要がある。それでは、選択肢の検討に入ろう。ルール通り、まずは**間違った選択肢**から順に徹底的に解剖していくぞ」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Rea-san, your expressions remain radical and chilling. But indeed, manual operation invites ruin. That is why we must use native governance features provided by AWS. Now, let us move to examining the choices. True to the rules, we shall thoroughly dissect the **incorrect choices** first."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「えー、いきなり不正解の処刑台に連れていかれるのね。なんだか敗者の匂いがして、すごくチルで香ばしい気分になるよ。じゃあ、最初の間違いの選択肢から、ひのりんはどんな残酷なメスを入れてくれるわけ？」

(Tsukina Io)
"Eh, dragged straight to the execution scaffold of incorrect answers. Somehow it smells like losers, and it makes me feel super chill and fragrant. So, Hinori, what kind of cruel scalpel are you going to use on the first wrong choice?"

(Tsukina Io)
English

日乃竜胆
「ふっ、容赦はしない。まずは不正解の選択肢の一つ目、『AWS Configのカスタムルールを使用して、Service CatalogのポートフォリオにアクセスできるIAMポリシーを制限し、かつ特定リージョンでの起動を拒否するLambda関数を毎分実行する』というアプローチについてだ」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Hph, I shall show no mercy. First is the incorrect choice: **'Using AWS Config custom rules to restrict IAM policies that can access Service Catalog portfolios, and running a Lambda function every minute to deny launches in specific regions.'**"

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「うわ、なんか文字を見ただけで頭がフリーズしそう。『AWS Config』とか『IAMポリシー』とか『Lambda関数を毎分実行』とか、呪文の詠唱長すぎて詠唱破棄したくなるんだけど。これのどこがダメなの？」

(Tsukina Io)
"Uwa, just looking at the words makes my brain freeze. 'AWS Config', 'IAM policies', 'running a Lambda function every minute'... the spell chanting is so long I want to cancel it. What's wrong with this?"

(Tsukina Io)
English

日乃竜胆
「根本的な問題は『運用上のオーバーヘッドが非常に高い』ことだ。AWS Configのカスタムルールを書くにはPythonやNode.jsでコードを自分で実装し保守しなければならない。さらに、『毎分Lambdaを実行する』などという力技は、ポーリング（定期確認）ベースの非効率な監視であり、リソースの無駄遣いであるばかりか、リアルタイムなブロックができず、コンプライアンス違反のリソースが作成されてから検知・削除されるまでのタイムラグが生じる。クラウドの設計において、後から直す『事後検知型』は最悪のアンチパターンのひとつだ」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"The fundamental problem is that **'the operational overhead is extremely high.'** To write AWS Config custom rules, you must implement and maintain code yourself in Python or Node.js. Furthermore, brute-force methods like 'running Lambda every minute' are polling-based, inefficient monitoring that wastes resources and fails to provide real-time blocking, creating a time lag between the creation of a non-compliant resource and its detection and deletion. In cloud design, 'post-detection' fixing after the fact is one of the worst anti-patterns."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「なるほどねぇ。自分でコード書いて、毎分お伺いを立てるようにロボットを走らせるなんて、真冬の廊下で雑巾掛けを一生させられてるみたいで、聞いてるだけで肩が凝るよ。自動でビシッとやってくれないと意味ないもんね」

(Tsukina Io)
"I see. Writing your own code and running a robot to check every minute sounds like being forced to wipe down freezing hallways with a rag forever, just hearing about it makes my shoulders stiff. If it doesn't handle things automatically and sharply, it's useless."

(Tsukina Io)
English

蒞星怜空
「その通りだ、イオち。毎分Lambdaを走らせるなど、まるで乾いた砂漠でスプーン一杯の水を求めて這いずり回る亡者のような、哀れで非効率な足掻きにすぎない。そんなシステムを構築した開発者は、ある日突然、社内の監査部門という名の冷徹な死神に首を刎ねられ、コードの海に沈められる運命にある。運用オーバーヘッドの化け物が、企業の予算を内側から食い潰す美しいホラーショーだな」

(Rize Rea)
"Precisely, Io-chi. Running Lambda every minute is nothing more than a pitiful, inefficient struggle, like a ghost crawling through a dry desert seeking a spoonful of water. Developers who build such systems are destined to be decapitated one day by the cold grim reaper called the internal audit department and sunk into a sea of code. A beautiful horror story where the monster of operational overhead devours corporate budgets from within."

(Rize Rea)
English

蒞星怜空
「Polling architectures are the architectural equivalent of repeatedly checking your fridge hoping that pizza has magically appeared, only to find existential dread and expired milk.」

日乃竜胆
「怜空さんの比喩は相変わらず胃が痛くなるな。だが、指摘の通りだ。では、次の不正解の選択肢に移行する。二つ目は、『Amazon EC2のセキュリティグループとVPCエンドポイントを駆使して、サービスカタログ自体の通信を物理的にルーティングし、不正なリージョンからのアクセスをルーティングテーブルの書き換えで制御する』というアプローチだ」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Rea-san's metaphor gives me a stomachache as usual. But her point is correct. Now, moving to the next incorrect choice. The second is: **'Using Amazon EC2 security groups and VPC endpoints to physically route communications of the service catalog itself, controlling access from unauthorized regions by rewriting routing tables.'**"

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「うーん、セキュリティグループとかVPCエンドポイントとか、名前はかっこいいけど、サービスカタログってグローバルなAWSのマネージドサービスだから、VPCの中のサーバーみたいにルーティングテーブルをいじってどうにかなるものなの？」

(Tsukina Io)
"Hmm, security groups and VPC endpoints sound cool, but Service Catalog is a global AWS managed service, so can it really be controlled by tweaking routing tables like a server inside a VPC?"

(Tsukina Io)
English

月凪惟緒
英語
Tsukina Io
English

(Tsukina Io)
"Trying to restrict AWS Service Catalog with local VPC routing tables is like trying to stop a hurricane by taping a "No Entry" sign to your front door."

日乃竜胆
「慧眼だな、イオち！ 今の英語の比喩は実に素晴らしい。まさにその通りだ。AWS Service CatalogはVPC内のEC2インスタンスのようにプライベートIPで閉じたものではなく、AWSのグローバルなエンドポイントを通じて提供されるマネージドサービスだ。したがって、VPCのルーティングテーブルやセキュリティグループでリージョン単位のデプロイ制限をかけることは仕組み上不可能である。間違ったレイヤーで無駄な足掻きをすることは、クラウド設計における致命傷となる」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Keen insight, Io-chi! That English metaphor was truly wonderful. Exactly. AWS Service Catalog is not closed with private IPs like EC2 instances inside a VPC; it is a managed service provided via global AWS endpoints. Therefore, restricting deployment by region using VPC routing tables or security groups is structurally impossible. Making futile struggles at the wrong layer is a fatal wound in cloud design."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

蒞星怜空
「ふっ、レイヤーの勘違いとは滑稽だな。それはまるで、電車の線路の敷地内で土下座をすれば、地球の自転を止められると本気で信じている狂人を眺めているようなものだ。誤ったツールを誤った場所に叩き込むとき、システムは静かに、しかし確実に崩壊のメロディを奏で始める。素晴らしい破滅への招待状だな」

(Rize Rea)
"Hph, mistaking layers is comical. It's like watching a madman who genuinely believes he can stop the earth's rotation by kneeling on a railroad track. When you smash the wrong tool into the wrong place, the system quietly yet surely begins to play the melody of collapse. A wonderful invitation to ruin."

(Rize Rea)
English

蒞星怜空
「Applying network-level controls to a global API-driven governance service is like trying to cure a broken leg by aggressively repainting your living room ceiling.」

日乃竜胆
「二人とも、解説のキレが鋭すぎて私が話すことがなくなってきたが、まだ核心が残っている。不正解の選択肢をすべて洗い出したところで、いよいよ**正解の選択肢**、そしてなぜそれが選ばれるべきなのかを詳細に解き明かそう」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Both of you have such sharp explanations that I am running out of things to say, but the core remains. Having cleared out all the incorrect choices, we shall finally unravel the **correct choice** and why it must be chosen in full detail."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「待ってました、本命の登場だね。間違った選択肢たちの断末魔を聞いた後だから、正解がすごく聖者のように輝いて見えるよ。で、結局どの方法が一番エレガントでオーバーヘッドが低いの？」

(Tsukina Io)
"Waiting for this, the main event. After hearing the death rattles of the wrong choices, the right answer shines like a saint. So, which method is ultimately the most elegant and has the lowest overhead?"

(Tsukina Io)
English

日乃竜胆
「正解の選択肢は、『AWS Organizationsのサービスコントロールポリシー（SCP）を使用して特定リージョンでのアクションをブロックし、AWS ConfigまたはAWS Service Catalogのコンストレインツ（制約）やポートフォリオ共有を活用して、組織全体で一元的にガバナンスを効かせる』というアプローチ、あるいはAWS Control TowerやOrganizationsをベースにした一元管理の仕組みだ」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"The correct choice is the approach that **'uses AWS Service Control Policies (SCPs) in AWS Organizations to block actions in specific regions, and leverages AWS Config or AWS Service Catalog constraints and portfolio sharing to centrally enforce governance organization-wide,'** or a centralized management mechanism based on AWS Control Tower and Organizations."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「た、たしかに文字情報が多すぎて頭がオーバーヒートしかけてるけど、要するに『AWS Organizations』っていう親玉の仕組みを使って、組織全体を一網打尽に縛り上げるってこと？」

(Tsukina Io)
"T-the text information is so dense my brain is about to overheat, but in short, it means using the big boss mechanism called 'AWS Organizations' to bind the entire organization at once?"

(Tsukina Io)
English

日乃竜胆
「そうだ、イオち。AWS Organizationsのサービスコントロールポリシー（SCP: Service Control Policy）こそが、組織全体のセキュリティとコンプライアンスを担保するための最強の剣だ。SCPを使えば、組織内の特定のAWSアカウントやOU（組織単位）に対して、『このリージョン以外でのリソース作成アクションは一切許可しない』というガードレールを強力にかけられる。個別のLambdaや面倒なスクリプトを書く必要は一切なく、AWSがマネージドで提供する基盤レベルの機能だから運用オーバーヘッドが圧倒的に低いのだ」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Exactly, Io-chi. AWS Organizations' **Service Control Policy (SCP)** is the ultimate sword to guarantee security and compliance across the entire organization. With SCP, you can powerfully apply guardrails to specific AWS accounts or OUs within the organization, stating 'actions to create resources outside this region are strictly prohibited.' There is no need to write individual Lambdas or troublesome scripts; because it is a foundation-level feature managed by AWS, the operational overhead is overwhelmingly low."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「なるほどねぇ。各部隊に個別でお達しを出すんじゃなくて、大本営から『この外には一歩も出ちゃダメです』って絶対的な結界を張っちゃうわけだ。それなら誰もサボれないし、管理者の負担もゼロに等しいもんね」

(Tsukina Io)
"I see. Instead of giving individual orders to each unit, the headquarters casts an absolute barrier saying 'not a single step outside this.' That way no one can slack off, and the burden on administrators is practically zero."

(Tsukina Io)
English

蒞星怜空
「ふふ、大本営からの絶対防壁か。それはまるで、絶対君主が王国全土に『我が領土以外で息をすることを禁ず』と布告し、息をした瞬間に国民が全員消滅するような、美しくも冷徹な統制美だ。SCPという名の神の御手を前にしては、いかに狡猾な開発者といえども、ただ平伏してひたすら従うよりほかに道はない。これこそが、クラウドガバナンスの極致といえよう」

(Rize Rea)
"Hph, an absolute defensive wall from headquarters. It is a beautiful yet cold control aesthetic, like an absolute monarch decreeing across the entire kingdom 'breathing outside my territory is forbidden,' causing all citizens to vanish the moment they inhale. Before the hand of God named SCP, no matter how cunning the developer, they have no choice but to prostrate themselves and obey blindly. This can be said to be the pinnacle of cloud governance."

(Rize Rea)
English

蒞星怜空
「SCPs are the architectural equivalent of putting an electric collar on your entire cloud estate and throwing away the remote, ensuring perfect, unyielding compliance through sheer organizational terror.」

日乃竜胆
「怜空さんの相変わらずの恐怖政治的な比喩には閉口するが、アーキテクチャの正確性においては完璧な説明だ。AWS Service Catalogにおける製品の共有と、OrganizationsのSCPを組み合わせることで、開発者は用意された安全なカタログからのみリソースをデプロイでき、かつ許可されていないリージョンへのデプロイは組織レベルで完全に遮断される。これこそが、最小の運用オーバーヘッドで最大のセキュリティとガバナンスを達成する唯一の正解である」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"I am speechless at Rea-san's usual tyrannically terrifying metaphor, but in terms of architectural accuracy, it is a perfect explanation. By combining product sharing in AWS Service Catalog with SCPs in Organizations, developers can deploy resources only from the prepared safe catalog, and deployment to unauthorized regions is completely blocked at the organization level. This is the only correct answer that achieves maximum security and governance with minimum operational overhead."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

月凪惟緒
「ひのりんの解説を聞いていたら、なんだか雲の上で完璧に管理された巨大な鳥かごの中にいるような、安心感と絶望感が入り混じった不思議なチルさを感じてきたよ。AWSって、突き詰めるとすごく冷たくて、でも美しいシステムなんだね」

(Tsukina Io)
"Listening to Hinori's explanation, I feel a strange chill mixed with a sense of security and despair, like being inside a giant, perfectly managed birdcage above the clouds. AWS, when you drill down, is terribly cold yet a beautiful system."

(Tsukina Io)
English

日乃竜胆
「ふっ、クラウドとは冷徹な論理の積み重ねだ。だが、その論理を正しく理解し、使いこなすことこそがエンジニアの品格である。本日のレクチャーはここまでとしよう。イオち、怜空さん、よくぞついてきたな」

(Hinowa Rindo)
"Hph, the cloud is a stack of cold logic. But correctly understanding and mastering that logic is the dignity of an engineer. Let us conclude today's lecture here. Io-chi, Rea-san, you followed along splendidly."

(Hinowa Rindo)
English

蒞星怜空
「ふっ、たまにはこうした知的な遊戯も悪くない。さて、次はどのシステムの崩壊を見物しに行こうか？」

(Rize Rea)
"Hph, such intellectual play is not bad once in a while. Now, whose system collapse shall we go watch next?"

(Rize Rea)
English
@18
(月凪惟緒)ヒノりん、なんか今日のホワイトボード、小難しそうな文字がいっぱい並んでて、見ているだけで脳みそが永久凍土に還っていきそうなんだけど。この画面に映ってるAWSの問題って、一体全体なにを私たちに問おうとしているわけ？

(Tsukina Io) Hinorin, the white board looks like a graveyard of alphabets today. Just looking at it makes my brain freeze back into permafrost. What on earth is this AWS question trying to extract from us?

(月凪惟緒) 脳が凍るなら丁度いい、夏の冷房代が浮くだろう。だが、この問題はAWSの資格試験、いわゆるDOP（AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional）の領域だ。手を抜くことは許されない。しっかりと前提知識から解きほぐしていく。

(Tsukina Io) If your brain freezes, that's even better—we'll save on summer AC bills. But this question belongs to the AWS certification exam, specifically the DOP (AWS Certified DevOps Engineer - Professional) tier. No shortcuts are permitted here. We shall unravel it thoroughly, starting from the absolute prerequisites.

(日乃竜胆) ほほう、DevOpsのプロフェッショナルか。なんだか、地獄の釜の蓋が開く音が聞こえてくるようだな。まるで、終電間際の満員電車で隣のやつのリュックが顔面に食い込み続ける絶望的なルーティンを思い出す。

(Hino Rindo) Ho, a DevOps professional tier. I can practically hear the lid of hell's cauldron opening. It reminds me of that soul-crushing routine on the last packed train where the passenger's backpack keeps embedding itself into your facial features.

(蒞星怜空) 怜空さん、相変わらず例えが不穏で陰惨ですね。……さて、今回の設問は「AWS CloudFormationを用いたスタック更新時のエラーハンドリングとリソースの保護」に関するものだ。前提として、AWS CloudFormationとは何か、イオちわかるか？

(Rize Rea) Risa-san, your analogies are as ominous and gruesome as ever. Now, this question revolves around error handling and resource protection during stack updates using AWS CloudFormation. As a prerequisite, Io-chi, do you even know what AWS CloudFormation is?

(月凪惟緒) かぶ、しき……？ なんか、ブロック玩具を説明書通りに組み立てて、一網打尽にぶっ壊すシステムのこと？

(Tsukina Io) Cab-shiki...? Is that some system where you assemble plastic building blocks following a manual, only to annihilate them all at once?

(日乃竜胆) 概ね間違ってはいないが、表現が致命的に物騒だな。CloudFormationとは、インフラストラクチャー・ツー・コード、すなわちAWS上のサーバーやネットワークなどの構成をコード（YAMLやJSON形式のテンプレート）として記述し、自動で構築・管理するサービスのことだ。

(Hino Rindo) You aren't fundamentally wrong, but the phrasing is fatally menacing. CloudFormation is Infrastructure as Code—meaning it's a service where you write the configurations of servers and networks on AWS as code in templates like YAML or JSON, automatically building and managing them.

(月凪惟緒) へぇ〜、文字を書くだけでサーバーが建つんだ。人間が汗水垂らして働く必要がなくなって、世の中の社畜が泣いて喜ぶね。

(Tsukina Io) Heh, you just write characters and servers pop up. Humans don't need to sweat anymore, and corporate slaves nationwide are weeping tears of joy.

(日乃竜胆) 泣いて喜ぶどころか、コードの一文字のミスで本番環境が文字通り灰燼に帰すスリルが味わえるぞ。さて、今回の設問の核心に入る。CloudFormationでスタックを更新した際、リソースの更新に失敗した場合の挙動についてだ。問題文をよく読むのだ。

(Hino Rindo) Far from weeping with joy, you get to experience the thrill of your production environment literally turning to ashes due to a single typo in the code. Now, let us enter the core of this question: what happens when a resource update fails during a CloudFormation stack update? Read the prompt carefully.

(月凪惟緒) ええと、選択肢がたくさんあってどれが正解か分からないよ。まずは、一番ダメな間違いの選択肢からヒノりん教えてよ。

(Tsukina Io) Urm, there are so many choices and I have no idea which is right. Hinorin, start by telling me the most fundamentally wrong option first.

(日乃竜胆) 承知した。では、間違いの選択肢から順に斬り捨てていこう。まずは「UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED状態のスタックに対して、障害の原因となったリソースを手動で修正し、スタックの継続ロールバック（ContinueUpdateRollback）を実行する」というアプローチについてだ。

(Hino Rindo) Understood. Let us cut down the incorrect options in order. First, let us examine the approach of addressing a stack in the `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED` state by manually fixing the offending resource and executing a `ContinueUpdateRollback`.

(月凪竜胆) おっと、それは間違いの選択肢の一つだな。そもそも `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED` に陥るというのは、自動ロールバックの最中にもエラーが発生し、システムが「もうどうしていいか分かりません、助けてください」と白旗を上げてフリーズしている絶望的な状態だ。

(Hino Rindo) Whoops, that is indeed one of the incorrect choices. Falling into the `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED` state means that errors occurred even during the automated rollback, leaving the system in a desperate state where it waves a white flag and freezes, crying out for help because it has no idea what to do.

(月凪惟緒) 白旗を上げてフリーズって、まるで月曜日の朝の私の脳内じゃない。で、なんでその選択肢はダメなの？

(Tsukina Io) Waving a white flag and freezing sounds exactly like my brain on a Monday morning. So why is that option no good?

(日乃竜胆) 単純に、その操作では解決しないどころか、リソースの整合性が完全に破壊されるからだ。ContinueUpdateRollbackAPIは、失敗したリソースを明示的にスキップ（SkipResourceNestingなど）してロールバックを続行させるためのものであり、手動修正だけを頼りに魔法のように直るものではない。

(Hino Rindo) Simply put, that operation not only fails to resolve the issue, but it completely shatters resource consistency. The ContinueUpdateRollback API is meant to explicitly skip failed resources to force the rollback to proceed, rather than magically fixing itself based solely on manual fixes.

(蒞星怜空) ほう、まるで、泥沼の離婚調停で互いに譲らず、裁判官すら失踪した後に、突然「やっぱりよりを戻しました」と笑顔で婚姻届を出し直すようなものだな。システムはそんなご都合主義には付き合ってくれない。

(Rize Rea) Oh, it's like two parties refusing to budge in a messy divorce mediation, after which even the judge goes missing, and then they suddenly show up with a smile submitting a marriage registration all over again. The system won't entertain such convenience.

(月凪惟緒) 怜空さんの例え、相変わらず生々しくて胃が痛くなるんだけど……。じゃあ、ほかの間違いの選択肢はどうなの？

(Tsukina Io) Risa-san's analogy is as vivid as ever and gives me a stomachache... So what about the other incorrect choices?

(日乃竜胆) 次に、「スタックの更新が失敗してロールバックしている最中に、さらに別のテンプレート変更を適用して修正しようとする」という選択肢だ。これは論外だ。火事の最中にガソリンをぶっかけるような愚行に等しい。

(Hino Rindo) Next is the option suggesting that while a stack update has failed and is currently rolling back, you apply yet another template change to fix it. This is out of the question. It is equivalent to pouring gasoline onto an ongoing fire.

(月凪惟緒) ガソリンをぶっかかる……。それはもう消火活動じゃなくて、完全に火遊びを通り越した大惨事だね。

(Tsukina Io) Pouring gasoline... That's no longer firefighting; that's a full-scale catastrophe far beyond playing with fire.

(日乃竜胆) そうだ。CloudFormationはスタックのロールバック中（`UPDATE_ROLLBACK_IN_PROGRESS` 状態）、新規の更新処理を受け付けない。システムが必死に過去の状態へ巻き戻そうとしている最中に、別の命令を叩き込んでも、APIは容赦なくリクエストを拒絶する。

(Hino Rindo) Precisely. CloudFormation does not accept new update operations while a stack is in the middle of rolling back (`UPDATE_ROLLBACK_IN_PROGRESS` state). If you hurl another command while the system is desperately trying to rewind to its previous state, the API will mercilessly reject the request.

(蒞星怜空) まさに、手術台の上で患者が絶命しかけているというのに、医者が「よし、ここで新しい美容整形オプションを追加だ！」とメスを振り回すようなものだな。冷酷なまでのエラーコードが返ってくるだけだ。

(Rize Rea) Indeed, it's like a patient nearing death on the operating table, and the surgeon brandishing a scalpel while shouting, "Right, let's add a new plastic surgery option here!" Only a merciless error code will be returned.

(月凪惟緒) お医者さん、怖すぎでしょ……。じゃあ、残りの間違いの選択肢についても教えて、ヒノりん。

(Tsukina Io) That doctor is way too terrifying... So Hinorin, tell me about the remaining incorrect choices as well.

(日乃竜胆) 他の間違いの選択肢としては、「失敗したリソースを強引にAWSマネジメントコンソールから直接削除して、スタックの状態を無理やり正常化させる」というものがある。これも大罪だ。

(Hino Rindo) Another incorrect option is forcibly deleting the failed resource directly from the AWS Management Console to artificially normalize the stack state. This is also a capital sin.

(月凪惟緒) え、コンソールから直接消しちゃダメなの？ ゴミ箱にポイッと捨てるみたいで一番手っ取り早そうだけど。

(Tsukina Io) Eh, you can't delete it directly from the console? It looks like the quickest way, just tossing it into the trash bin.

(日乃竜胆) それをやってしまうと、CloudFormationが把握している「スタックの管理下にあるリソースのメタデータ（状態）」と「実際のAWS上のリソースの有無」に乖離が生じる。結果として、次回のスタック操作で完全に身動きが取れなくなる。

(Hino Rindo) If you do that, a discrepancy arises between the metadata (state) of the resources under CloudFormation's management and the actual presence of resources on AWS. As a result, you will find yourself completely immobilized in the next stack operation.

(蒞星怜空) 傀儡人形の糸を勝手にハサミで切り落とした挙句、人形が動かなくなったと泣き叫ぶようなものだな。自業自得の極み、まさに地獄のミサワの世界観だ。

(Rize Rea) It is like cutting the strings of a marionette with scissors on your own whim, and then crying out that the puppet won't move anymore. The pinnacle of self-inflicted misery, straight out of a tragicomedy.

(月凪惟緒) なるほどねぇ……。勝手に裏でコソコソ手を加えると、システムという名の巨大なモンスターが怒り出すってわけだね。じゃあ、いよいよ正解の選択肢はどれなの？

(Tsukina Io) I see... If you secretly meddle behind the scenes, the giant monster named "system" gets angry. So, which one is finally the correct choice?

(日乃竜胆) 正解の選択肢は、「`UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED` 状態のスタックに対して、障害の原因となったリソースの状態を修正するか、またはリソースのスキップを指定した上で `ContinueUpdateRollback` APIを実行し、スタックを正常な `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_COMPLETE` 状態に復旧させる」という手順を踏むものだ。

(Hino Rindo) The correct option is the procedure where, for a stack in the `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED` state, you either fix the state of the resource causing the issue or specify resource skipping, execute the `ContinueUpdateRollback` API, and restore the stack to a normal `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_COMPLETE` state.

(月凪惟緒) おお、ついに正解にたどり着いた！ でもさ、その `ContinueUpdateRollback` って具体的にどういう動きをするの？ 初心者の私にも分かるように教えてよ、ヒノりん。

(Tsukina Io) Oh, we finally reached the correct answer! But wait, how exactly does that `ContinueUpdateRollback` behave? Explain it so even a beginner like me can understand, Hinorin.

(日乃竜胆) よかろう。CloudFormationのロールバックが途中で失敗して `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED` になった場合、システムは「どのリソースの復旧に失敗したか」を正確に記憶している。そこで管理者が、なぜ失敗したのか（例えば、すでに手動で作られていたリソースと名前が衝突した等）の原因を取り除くか、あるいはその特定のリソースのロールバックを「スキップ（無視）」するよう指定して `ContinueUpdateRollback` を呼び出すのだ。

(Hino Rindo) Very well. When a CloudFormation rollback fails midway and results in `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_FAILED`, the system accurately remembers which resource recovery failed. The administrator then either removes the cause of the failure (e.g., a name collision with a resource already created manually) or specifies that the rollback for that specific resource should be skipped (ignored), and invokes `ContinueUpdateRollback`.

(月凪惟緒) スキップするってことは、「お前、もういいよ、面倒だから無かったことにする！」ってシステムが放り投げる感じ？

(Tsukina Io) Skipping means the system just tosses it aside going, "You know what, forget about you, it's too much trouble, let's pretend it never happened!"?

(日乃竜胆) 俗な言い方だが、本質を突いている。ロールバック中に障害となっている特定のリソースの処理をバイパスすることで、スタック全体の状態を安全な `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_COMPLETE` まで引き戻すことができるのだ。この状態にさえ戻せば、再び正常なテンプレートでスタックの更新をかけられるようになる。

(Hino Rindo) A vulgar way to put it, but it hits the core. By bypassing the processing of the specific resource causing the issue during rollback, you can drag the state of the entire stack back to a safe `UPDATE_ROLLBACK_COMPLETE`. Once restored to this state, you can update the stack again using a normal template.

(蒞星怜空) 崩壊しかけたタワーマンションの最上階で、爆発寸前のガスボンベを抱えて途方に暮れていたところ、専門家が「そこだけ切り離して爆破の連鎖を止めろ」と叫び、辛うじて全壊を免れるようなものだな。生還のドラマだ。

(Rize Rea) It is like being at your wits' end holding a gas cylinder about to explode on the top floor of a collapsing high-rise apartment, when an expert screams, "Detach that part and stop the chain explosion!" barely escaping total destruction. A drama of survival.

(月凪惟緒) へぇ〜、AWSの世界もなかなかスリリングで生き残るのが大変なんだね。インフラのコード化って便利だけど、一歩間違えるとサバイバルゲームみたい。

(Tsukina Io) Huh, the world of AWS is pretty thrilling and hard to survive in. Making infrastructure into code is convenient, but one wrong step and it's like a survival game.

(日乃竜胆) その通りだ。だからこそ、我々はこうして基礎から論理を積み上げ、予期せぬエラーにも冷静に対処できるよう研鑽を積まねばならん。今回の学びを胸に刻み、次の難問へ進むとしよう。

(Hino Rindo) Exactly. That is why we must build up our logic from the fundamentals and train ourselves to calmly handle unexpected errors. Engrave today's lessons in your heart, and let us advance to the next difficult problem.
@19
(月凪惟緒) ねぇヒノりん、なんかこの画面、文字がいっぱいで頭が溶けそうなんだけど。AWSの資格試験って、こんなに文字を読む修行なわけ？

(Tsukina Io) Hey Hinorin, this screen has so many words my brain is melting. Is an AWS certification exam just a training exercise in reading comprehension?

(月凪惟緒) 永久凍土に眠りたくなる寒さを感じるよ、私。

(Tsukina Io) I feel a coldness that makes me want to sleep in permafrost.

(日乃竜胆) 逃げるなイオち。知恵を磨く場において、頭が溶けるなどと言っている場合ではない。この設問は、AWS上でのコスト最適化とシステムの信頼性を両立させるための極めて重要なアーキテクチャを問うている。まずは基本の前提知識から叩き込む。心して聞くが良い。

(Hino Rindo) Do not run, Io-chi. In a place where wisdom is polished, this is no time to complain about melting brains. This question asks about an extremely important architecture for balancing cost optimization and system reliability on AWS. I will pound the basic background knowledge into you first. Listen well.

(日乃竜胆) 今回の設問は、Amazon EC2インスタンスの購入オプションの一つである「Spot Instance（スポットインスタンス）」と、それを利用したシステム構築における可用性の担保、そして「Auto Scalingグループ」の挙動に関するものだ。

(Hino Rindo) This question is about "Spot Instances," which are one of the purchase options for Amazon EC2 instances, ensuring availability in system construction using them, and the behavior of "Auto Scaling groups."

(蒞星怜空) スポットインスタンスか。市場の気まぐれで強制的に取り上げられる、まるで冬のボーナス直前に会社が倒産するようなスリル満点のガチャ要素だな。安さの代わりに精神の安定を代償にする、極めて狂気とロマンに満ちた仕組みだといえよう。

(Rize Rea) A Spot Instance. It's a gacha element forcibly taken away by the whims of the market, full of the thrill of a company going bankrupt right before the winter bonus. It is a mechanism full of extreme madness and romance, trading mental stability for cheapness.

(月凪惟緒) 聞くだけで胃に穴が開きそうなんですけど……。で、そのスポットインスタンスって、要するに何なの？お安いスーパーの特売肉みたいなもの？

(Tsukina Io) Just hearing about it makes me feel like my stomach's getting a hole... So, what actually is a Spot Instance? Is it like cheap bargain meat at the supermarket?

(日乃竜胆) 悪くない比喩だ。AWSの余剰コンピューティング能力を市場価格で競り落とす仕組みだ。通常の「オンデマンドインスタンス」に比べて最大90%も安く利用できる。だが、AWS側で容量が必要になった場合、わずか2分の通知で強制的に中断・終了させられるという致命的なリスクを孕んでいる。

(Hino Rindo) Not a bad analogy. It's a mechanism to bid on AWS's surplus computing power at market prices. It can be used up to 90% cheaper than regular "On-Demand Instances." However, when AWS needs that capacity, it carries the fatal risk of being forcibly interrupted and terminated with just a 2-minute notice.

(月凪惟緒) 2分って……カップラーメンにお湯を注いで、ちょっとぼーっとしてたら終わるじゃん。そんな不安定なものをどうやって実務で使うわけ？

(Tsukina Io) Two minutes... that's about how long it takes to pour hot water into cup ramen and zone out for a second. How on earth do you use something that unstable in actual work?

(日乃竜胆) 慧眼だなイオち。その不安定さを補うために、複数の異なるインスタンスタイプを組み合わせたり、Auto Scalingグループと連携させたりして、一部が中断されてもシステム全体の可用性を維持する設計が求められるのだ。

(Hino Rindo) Astute observation, Io-chi. To compensate for that instability, designs are required to combine multiple different instance types or coordinate with Auto Scaling groups to maintain the availability of the entire system even if a part is interrupted.

(蒞星怜空) そう、いつ自分の足元が崩落して底なし沼に落ちるかわからない。人生の縮図のような美しさがそこにはある。中断耐性のあるバッチ処理や、ステートレスなWebサーバーの横展開には最適だがな。

(Rize Rea) Yes, you never know when the ground beneath your feet will collapse and you'll fall into a bottomless swamp. There is a beauty like a microcosm of life in that. It's optimal for fault-tolerant batch processing or horizontal scaling of stateless web servers.

(日乃竜胆) 設問の内容を詳しく見ていこう。アプリケーションはAuto Scalingグループで管理された複数のEC2インスタンスで実行されており、コストを削減するためにスポットインスタンスを活用したいと考えている。しかし、可用性も損なわれんことを求めている。このとき、どのような構成にするのが最適か、という問いだ。

(Hino Rindo) Let's look at the details of the question. The application runs on multiple EC2 instances managed by an Auto Scaling group, and you want to use Spot Instances to reduce costs. However, you also want to ensure availability is not compromised. The question asks what kind of configuration is optimal for this.

(月凪惟緒) ここで間違った選択肢を先にしっかり見ていかないと、ヒノりんのスパルタ講義が長引きそうだから、まずは不正解の選択肢から教えてよ。

(Tsukina Io) If we don't thoroughly look at the incorrect choices first, Hinorin's Spartan lecture is going to drag on, so please tell me the incorrect choices first.

(日乃竜胆) 至極真っ当だ。では、誤った選択肢から順に紐解こう。まず、「単一のインスタンスタイプのみを指定し、その全てをスポットインスタンスにする」という構成はどうだ？

(Hino Rindo) Perfectly reasonable. Then let's untangle the incorrect choices in order. First, what about a configuration that "specifies only a single instance type and makes all of them Spot Instances"?

(月凪惟緒) えーっと、全部が一番安いお肉ってこと？お財布には優しそうだけど……。

(Tsukina Io) Um, does that mean all of them are the cheapest meat? It sounds gentle on the wallet, but...

(日乃竜胆) 愚劣極まりない。単一のインスタンスタイプのみを指定した場合、その可用性ゾーンやリージョンでAWSの需要が高まり、スポットの空き容量が枯渇すれば、Auto Scalingグループ内のインスタンスが一斉に強制終了させられる。結果としてシステム全体がダウンし、可用性は完全に崩壊するのだ。コスト削減のついでに会社の信頼まで削ぎ落とす自殺行為だな。

(Hino Rindo) Utterly foolish. If only a single instance type is specified, if demand for AWS increases in that Availability Zone or region and spot capacity is exhausted, the instances in the Auto Scaling group will be forcibly terminated all at once. As a result, the entire system goes down, and availability completely collapses. It is a suicidal act that scrapes away the company's trust along with cost reduction.

(蒞星怜空) 全員まとめて同じ断崖絶壁からダイビングするレクリエーションだな。美しき心中志願者の群れとでも言おうか。全滅の美学としては一見の価値があるが、ビジネスとしては最悪の選択だ。

(Rize Rea) A recreation where everyone dives off the same cliff together. Shall we call it a flock of beautiful suicide volunteers? It's worth seeing as an aesthetic of total annihilation, but it's the worst choice for business.

(月凪惟緒) 怖すぎるでしょ……。全員一緒に消えるとかホラー映画のモブじゃん。じゃあさ、「オンデマンドインスタンスとスポットインスタンスを固定で50%ずつ手動で割り当てる」みたいなのはどうなの？

(Tsukina Io) That's way too scary... Disappearing together like mobs in a horror movie. So what about something like "manually allocating a fixed 50% of On-Demand and Spot Instances"?

(日乃竜胆) それも不適切だ。Auto Scalingの最新機能や適切な配分戦略を用いず、固定的な手動割り当てに固執することは、ワークロードの変動に対して柔軟に対応するクラウドの利点を自ら捨てるに等しい。さらに、スポットインスタンスの価格変動や容量不足に対して動的にリバランスを行う仕組みがなければ、結局は安定稼働を維持できない。

(Hino Rindo) That is also inappropriate. Persisting in fixed manual allocation without using the latest Auto Scaling features or proper allocation strategies is tantamount to discarding the advantages of the cloud, which responds flexibly to workload fluctuations. Furthermore, without a mechanism to dynamically rebalance against spot price fluctuations and capacity shortages, stable operation ultimately cannot be maintained.

(月凪惟緒) なるほどねぇ、融通が利かない頑固ジジイみたいな構成ってことね。

(Tsukina Io) I see, so it's a configuration like a stubborn old man who lacks flexibility.

(日乃竜胆) 表現は下品だが、本質を突いている。柔軟性こそがクラウドの神髄なのだからな。他にも、「Auto Scalingグループを使わずに、手動でEC2を立ち上げてスポットを配置する」といった選択肢も論外だ。トラフィックの増減に対応できず、障害時の自動復旧も失われる。

(Hino Rindo) The phrasing is vulgar, but it hits the essence. Flexibility is the very essence of the cloud, after all. Furthermore, choices like "manually launching EC2 and placing spots without using an Auto Scaling group" are out of the question. It cannot handle traffic fluctuations, and automatic recovery upon failure is also lost.

(月凪惟緒) 手動で夜中にサーバーの監視とか絶対やだ。寝てたいもん。

(Tsukina Io) Manually monitoring servers in the middle of the night is an absolute no. I want to sleep.

(日乃竜胆) 同意だな。では、いよいよ正解の選択肢について解説する。正解は、「複数のインスタンスタイプを指定し、Auto Scalingのスポット配分戦略（Allocation Strategy）を活用して、オンデマンドインスタンスとスポットインスタンスを適切にミックスさせる構成」だ。

(Hino Rindo) Agreed. Then, I will finally explain the correct choice. The correct choice is **"a configuration that specifies multiple instance types, utilizes Auto Scaling's Spot Allocation Strategy, and appropriately mixes On-Demand and Spot Instances."**

(月凪惟緒) ほうほう、複数の種類を混ぜるってこと？それってどういうことなのさ？

(Tsukina Io) Oh-ho, mixing multiple types? What does that mean?

(日乃竜胆) Spot Instance Advisorなどの機能を活用し、中断率が低く、かつ異なるインスタンスファミリーやサイズの複数のタイプをAuto Scalingグループに登録するのだ。これにより、ある特定のインスタンスタイプで容量が枯渇しても、別のタイプのスポットインスタンスを自動的に調達して補うことができる。さらに、ベースとなる最低限の容量はオンデマンドで確保し、余剰分をスポットで埋めることで、コストと可用性のバランスを高度に最適化できるのだ。

(Hino Rindo) By utilizing features like Spot Instance Advisor, you register multiple types with low interruption rates and different instance families and sizes into the Auto Scaling group. This allows you to automatically procure and compensate for spot instances of another type even if capacity is exhausted for a specific instance type. Furthermore, by securing the minimum required capacity as On-Demand and filling the surplus with Spot, you can highly optimize the balance between cost and availability.

(蒞星怜空) ポートフォリオを分散投資する賢いファンドマネージャーのようだな。一つの銘柄が暴落しても、別の銘柄が支える。リスクヘッジの極致であり、AWSが用意した最高級の安全装置付きジェットコースターといえよう。

(Rize Rea) Like a smart fund manager diversifying their portfolio. Even if one stock crashes, another supports it. It is the height of risk hedging, and could be said to be a top-class roller coaster with safety devices prepared by AWS.

(月凪惟緒) なるほどねぇ……。ただ安い肉を買い叩くんじゃなくて、色んなお肉をバランスよく仕入れて、どれかが品切れになっても別の肉で鍋を続けられるようにするみたいな？

(Tsukina Io) I see... Instead of just beating down prices for cheap meat, it's like buying various meats in a well-balanced manner so that even if one goes out of stock, you can keep the hot pot going with another meat?

(日乃竜胆) ……比喩のセンスは相変わらず怪しいが、言っていることは間違っていない。流石はイオち、核心を捉える嗅覚だけは妙に鋭いな。

(Hino Rindo) ...Your sense of metaphor is suspicious as ever, but what you're saying is not wrong. As expected of Io-chi, only your sense for catching the core is strangely sharp.

(月凪惟緒) えへへ、褒めても何も出ないよ。でも、複数のインスタンスタイプを混ぜるって、具体的にどう設定するんだっけ？アプリケーション側で何か特別なコードを書かないといけないわけ？

(Tsukina Io) Ehehe, nothing comes out of praising me. But mixing multiple instance types, how do you actually configure that? Do you have to write some special code on the application side?

(日乃竜胆) 良い着眼点だ。コードの変更は不要だ。Auto Scalingの起動テンプレート（Launch Template）において、単一のインスタンスタイプを指定するのではなく、複数のインスタンスタイプをリスト形式で定義する。そして、配分戦略として「capacity-optimized」や「lowest-price」などを設定するだけで、AWSが自動的に最適なプロビジョニングを行ってくれる。

(Hino Rindo) Good focus. No code changes are required. In the Auto Scaling Launch Template, instead of specifying a single instance type, you define multiple instance types in a list format. Then, by simply setting allocation strategies like "capacity-optimized" or "lowest-price," AWS automatically performs the optimal provisioning.

(蒞星怜空) 自動操縦モードだな。人間が眠っている間も、クラウドの神々が勝手に最適解を選んで財布を守ってくれる。まさに現代の錬金術だ。

(Rize Rea) Auto-pilot mode. Even while humans are sleeping, the gods of the cloud automatically choose the optimal solution and protect your wallet. Truly modern alchemy.

(日乃竜胆) 錬金術ではない、精緻なエンジニアリングの成果だ。この仕組みを理解していれば、コスト削減を求められる大規模システム設計においても、可用性を犠牲にすることなく堂々とアーキテクチャを提案できる。

(Hino Rindo) It is not alchemy, but the result of precise engineering. If you understand this mechanism, even in large-scale system designs where cost reduction is required, you can proudly propose architectures without sacrificing availability.

(月凪惟緒) ふむふむ……。要するに、安さの誘惑に負けて全部スポットにして全滅するバカな真似はやめて、ちゃんとリスクヘッジを効かせたマルチタイプ構成にしなさいってことね。完璧に理解したわ。眠くなってきたからお昼寝していい？

(Tsukina Io) Hmm-hmm... In short, stop doing stupid things like giving in to the temptation of cheapness and making everything spot only to be annihilated, and make sure to use a multi-type configuration with effective risk hedging. I understand perfectly. I'm getting sleepy, can I take a nap?

(日乃竜胆) 講義はまだ終わっていない。寝言は布団の中で言え、イオち。

(Hino Rindo) The lecture is not over yet. Save your sleep-talk for inside your futon, Io-chi.
@20
(日乃竜胆)
よく聞くがよい。本日取り上げる問題は、AWSの運用管理や自動化において極めて重要な「AWS Systems Manager」に関するものだ。前提知識ゼロのイオちにも、そして私の師匠である怜空さんにも、この冷徹で美しいクラウドの理を徹底的に叩き込んでやろう。

(Hino Rindo)
Listen carefully. The problem we are tackling today concerns AWS Systems Manager, which is of paramount importance in AWS operations management and automation. I shall thoroughly drill this cold, beautiful logic of the cloud into both Io, who has zero prior knowledge, and Reia-san, my mentor.

(月凪惟緒)
え〜、ヒノりん、なんか今日の空気感めちゃくちゃピリピリしてない？ 私、あったかいココア飲みながらまったりクラウドの雲でも眺めてたいんだけど……。そもそも「システムマネージャー」って何だか会社のめんどくさい総務部の人みたいな名前だし。

(Tsukinagi Io)
Geez, Hino-rin, isn't the vibe today super tense? I'd rather sip some warm cocoa and lazily gaze at the clouds. Besides, "Systems Manager" sounds like some annoying general affairs manager at a company.

(蒞星怜空)
総務部か。言い得て妙だな。あれは全社的カオスの温床であり、定時に帰ろうとする社畜の魂を物理的に粉砕する冷酷なモロクの祭壇だ。AWS Systems Managerもまた、数千台のEC2インスタンスという名の狂った暴れ馬どもを一網打尽に調教し、意のままに酷使するための絶対的な首輪にほかならん。

(Rize Reia)
General affairs. Aptly put. That is a hotbed of company-wide chaos, a cold altar of Moloch that physically crushes the souls of corporate slaves trying to leave on time. AWS Systems Manager is likewise nothing less than an absolute collar to round up, break, and mercilessly exploit thousands of wildly rampaging horses called EC2 instances.

(日乃竜胆)
怜空さん、物騒な比喩で初学者を怯えさせるな。だが、本質を突いているのは事実だ。では、問題文を読むぞ。
「問題: 企業が複数のAmazon EC2インスタンスで稼働するアプリケーションの運用管理を効率化したいと考えている。OSのパッチ適用や、ソフトウェアのインストール、設定変更などを一元管理し、安全かつ自動的に実行したい。この要件を満ั้นするAWSサービスとして最も適切なものはどれか。」
選択肢は以下の4つだ。

1. Amazon Inspector
2. AWS CloudTrail
3. AWS Systems Manager
4. AWS Config

(Hino Rindo)
Reia-san, do not frighten a beginner with such ominous metaphors. However, it is true that you hit the core. Now, I shall read the question.
"Question: A company wants to streamline operations management for applications running on multiple Amazon EC2 instances. They want to centrally manage OS patch application, software installation, and configuration changes to execute them safely and automatically. Which of the following AWS services is most appropriate to satisfy this requirement?"
The four choices are:

1. Amazon Inspector
2. AWS CloudTrail
3. AWS Systems Manager
4. AWS Config

(月凪惟緒)
むにゃむにゃ……EC2インスタンスっていうのは、要するにクラウド上の仮想サーバーのことだよね？ それが何千台もあるお家を想像すると、窓の鍵を全部閉めて回るだけで絶望しそうになるんだけど。それを一発でやってくれる便利グッズを探してるってこと？

(Tsukinagi Io)
Mumble mumble... An EC2 instance is basically a virtual server in the cloud, right? Imagining a house with thousands of those, I'd despair just trying to lock all the windows. So we're looking for a handy gadget that does it all in one go?

(日乃竜胆)
慧眼だな、イオち。その通りだ。複数のサーバーに対して、パッチ適用やコマンド実行を安全に行うための仕組みが必要なのだ。では、解説の作法に従い、まずは間違いの選択肢から一つずつ灰燼に帰してやろう。まずは選択肢1の「Amazon Inspector」だ。

(Hino Rindo)
Insightful, Io. Exactly. We need a mechanism to safely apply patches and execute commands across multiple servers. Now, following the etiquette of explanation, let us reduce the incorrect choices to ashes one by one. First is choice 1, "Amazon Inspector."

(月凪惟緒)
インスペクター……名前からして、なんかこう、トレンチコートを着て虫眼鏡を持った厳めしいオジサンが、「おや、このサーバー、セキュリティの隙がありますねぇ」ってネチネチ粗探ししてきそうな響きがするんだけど。どうなの、ヒノりん？

(Tsukinagi Io)
Inspector... Just from the name, it sounds like some stern old man in a trench coat holding a magnifying glass, naggingly picking flaws like, "My, this server has a security loophole." What about it, Hino-rin?

(日乃竜胆)
あながち間違ってはいない。Amazon Inspectorは、自動化されたセキュリティ脆弱性評価サービスだ。EC2インスタンスやコンテナイメージをスキャンし、既知の脆弱性やネットワークの露出がないかを暴き出す。だが、今回の問題は「パッチ適用の実行やソフトウェアのインストールといった運用管理の自動化」である。Inspectorは「見つけて警告する」だけであり、自ら修復や変更を加えるわけではない。したがって、不正解だ。

(Hino Rindo)
You are not far off. Amazon Inspector is an automated security vulnerability assessment service. It scans EC2 instances and container images, exposing known vulnerabilities and network exposures. However, this question asks for "automation of operations management such as executing patch applications and installing software." Inspector merely "finds and warns," it does not perform repairs or changes itself. Therefore, it is incorrect.

(蒞星怜空)
インスペクターね。あれは真夜中の薄暗いオフィスで、誰もいないはずのフロアに響く足音のようなものだ。ただただ恐怖と不備の現実を突きつけ、精神をじわじわと摩耗させるだけの冷酷な監査官にすぎん。救済の手を差し伸べることはなく、ただ「お前はもう詰んでいる」と告げるだけの死の使者だといえよう。

(Rize Reia)
Inspector, huh. That is like footsteps echoing on an empty floor in a dim office at midnight. It is nothing more than a ruthless auditor that relentlessly thrusts the reality of fear and deficiencies, slowly wearing down your sanity. It offers no saving hand, but is rather an angel of death simply declaring, "You are already finished."

(月凪惟緒)
うわぁ、怖……。夜勤の時にそれ想像したら絶対トイレ行けなくなるやつじゃん。じゃあ次は選択肢2の「AWS CloudTrail」いってみよーか。これまた名前はカッコいいけど、トレイルってことは足跡とかログを追うやつ？

(Tsukinagi Io)
Eww, scary... If I imagine that during a night shift, I'd never be able to go to the restroom. So next up, let's look at choice 2, "AWS CloudTrail." It has a cool name too, but "Trail" means tracking footprints or logs, right?

(日乃竜胆)
その通りだ、イオち。AWS CloudTrailは、AWSアカウント内のAPIアクティビティを記録・追跡するサービスだ。「誰が、いつ、どこから、どのような操作を行ったのか」という履歴をすべて残す。監査やセキュリティの追跡には不可欠だが、これもまた「サーバーのOSパッチを当てたりソフトウェアを入れたりする」といった能動的な運用管理や自動化を行うものではない。記録係にすぎん。よって、不正解だ。

(Hino Rindo)
Precisely, Io. AWS CloudTrail is a service that records and tracks API activity within an AWS account. It preserves a complete history of "who, when, from where, and what kind of operation was performed." While indispensable for auditing and security tracking, this also does not perform active operations management or automation like "applying OS patches or installing software on servers." It is merely a record-keeper. Thus, it is incorrect.

(蒞星怜空)
クラウドトレイル。それは人間の醜い足跡を一切の慈悲なく永遠に刻み込むデジタルなギロチンの台座だ。誰がどの権限を乱用してインフラを崩壊させたか、そのすべての罪科を血塗られたログとして残し続ける。逃げ場など存在しない。過去の過ちという名の亡霊が、お前の背後で冷たく微笑みながらすべてを記録しているのだよ。

(Rize Reia)
CloudTrail. That is a digital guillotine pedestal that eternally carves the ugly footprints of humans without a shred of mercy. It preserves every single crime and guilt as a blood-stained log of who abused what privileges to collapse the infrastructure. There is no escape. The ghost of past mistakes stands coldly smiling behind you, recording everything.

(日乃竜胆)
怜空さん、表現がいちいちホラーじみている。イオちが完全に凍りついているではないか。だが、解説を続ける。次は選択肢4の「AWS Config」だ。

(Hino Rindo)
Reia-san, your expressions are horror-like every single time. Look, Io is completely frozen. However, I shall continue the explanation. Next is choice 4, "AWS Config."

(月凪惟緒)
コンフィグかぁ……ゲームのオプション設定画面みたいなもの？ 音量を下げたり、画面の明るさを変えたりする的な？ それとも、サーバーの「こうありたい姿」を監視するやつ？

(Tsukinagi Io)
Config, huh... Like an option settings screen in a game? Lowering the volume or changing screen brightness? Or is it something that monitors the "desired state" of servers?

(日乃竜胆)
ゲームの例えはともかく、後半の直感は非常に優れている、流石はイオちだな。AWS Configは、AWSリソースの構成変更を評価、監査、および検査するサービスだ。リソースの設定がポリシーに違反していないかを継続的に監視し、「コンプライアンス違反だ」と検知することはできる。だが、これもまた「パッチを適用する」「ソフトウェアをインストールする」という能動的な作業を自動実行するツールではない。監視と評価にとどまるため、不正解となる。

(Hino Rindo)
Setting aside the game analogy, your intuition in the latter half is exceptionally good, as expected of Io. AWS Config is a service that evaluates, audits, and examines configuration changes of AWS resources. It continuously monitors whether resource settings violate policies and can detect "compliance violations." However, this is also not a tool that automatically executes active tasks like "applying patches" or "installing software." Since it remains at monitoring and evaluation, it is incorrect.

(蒞星怜空)
コンフィグ。それは理想と現実の乖離を冷徹に暴き出す、終わりのない査問会だ。「お前の構成は規約に違反している」と淡々と告げ続け、修正されるまで精神的プレッシャーをかけ続ける。美しく築き上げたはずのアーキテクチャが、たった一つの設定ミスによって不適合の烙印を押され、社会的な死へと追いやられる様を特等席で見物するための悪趣味な装置といえよう。

(Rize Reia)
Config. That is an endless inquisitorial tribunal that coldly exposes the divergence between ideal and reality. It continuously whispers, "Your configuration violates the rules," applying psychological pressure until corrected. It is a bad-tasting device to sit in a prime seat and watch an architecture that was supposed to be beautifully constructed branded as non-compliant due to a single configuration error, driving it to social death.

(日乃竜胆)
さて、不正解の3つをすべて論理の断頭台に送った。残るは選択肢3の「AWS Systems Manager」だ。これこそが今回の正解である。

(Hino Rindo)
Now, we have sent all three incorrect choices to the guillotine of logic. What remains is choice 3, "AWS Systems Manager." This is precisely the correct answer.

(月凪惟緒)
なるほどねぇ……。インスペクターは怖がりなオジサン、トレイルは逃げられない監視カメラ、コンフィグはネチネチ文句を言うお局様……。で、このシステムのマネージャーさんだけが、実際にサーバーの面倒を見てくれるお世話係ってこと？

(Tsukinagi Io)
I see... The Inspector is a scary old man, the Trail is an inescapable surveillance camera, the Config is a nagging boss... And only this Systems Manager is a caretaker who actually looks after the servers?

(日乃竜胆)
お世話係とは表現がフランクすぎるが、本質を的確に捉えている。AWS Systems Managerは、AWS上のリソース（EC2やオンプレミスのサーバーなど）に対して、運用データの収集、設定の変更、自動化されたルールの実行などを一元的に行うための統合運用管理サービスだ。例えば「Systems Manager Patch Manager」を使えば、複数のEC2インスタンスに対して一括でOSのパッチ適用を自動化できるし、「Run Command」を使えば安全にリモートでコマンドを実行できる。まさに今回の要件に完璧に合致する。

(Hino Rindo)
"Caretaker" is a bit too casual as an expression, but it accurately captures the essence. AWS Systems Manager is an integrated operations management service for collectively gathering operational data, changing configurations, and executing automated rules across resources on AWS (such as EC2 and on-premises servers). For example, using "Systems Manager Patch Manager," you can automate OS patch application across multiple EC2 instances at once, and using "Run Command," you can safely execute remote commands. It perfectly matches today's requirements.

(蒞星怜空)
システムマネージャー。それは無数の従順な人形どもを一糸乱れぬ統率のもとで意のままに操る、絶対的な独裁者のマリオネット・コントロールパネルだ。個々のサーバーが持つ個性を力ずくで押し潰し、一括で同じ命令を叩き込み、一寸の狂いもなく管理の枠組みへと収容していく。そこに自由意志など存在しない。あるのはただ、完璧に管理された冷徹な効率の美学のみだ。

(Rize Reia)
Systems Manager. That is the marionette control panel of an absolute dictator, manipulating countless obedient puppets at will under flawless, uniform control. It forcefully crushes the individuality of each server, hammers the same commands in bulk, and confines them into a management framework without an inch of error. Free will does not exist there. There is only the cold, perfectly managed aesthetic of efficiency.

(日乃竜胆)
流石は怜空さん、例えが相変わらず極端だが、AWS Systems Managerの「一元管理・自動化」という強烈なパワーの本質を的確に突いている。イオち、今日の講義の要点、しっかりと脳裏に焼き付けたか？

(Hino Rindo)
As expected of Reia-san, the metaphors are as extreme as ever, but they accurately hit the essence of the intense power of "centralized management and automation" in AWS Systems Manager. Io, have you firmly seared the main points of today's lecture into your mind?

(月凪惟緒)
うん、なんとなくわかったよ。要するに、バラバラなサーバーたちをまとめてお世話して、面倒なパッチ適用とかを一瞬で終わらせてくれる超有能な便利ツールってことね。これなら私も、定時に帰って布団にくるまってアニメ見られそう……。

(Tsukinagi Io)
Yep, I kind of get it. In short, it's a super capable, handy tool that collectively takes care of scattered servers and finishes annoying patch applications in a flash. With this, I might actually be able to leave on time, wrap myself in a blanket, and watch anime...

(日乃竜胆)
ふっ、その姿勢こそ感心せんが、正解を導き出すプロセスを理解できたのなら上出来だ。これにて本日のAWS運用管理に関する講義を終了する。二人とも、よく聴講したな。

(Hino Rindo)
Hmph, that attitude is hardly admirable, but if you understand the process of deriving the correct answer, that is job well done. This concludes today's lecture on AWS operations management. Both of you attended well.
@21
@22
@23
@24
@25
@26
@27
@28
@29
@30
@31
@32
@33
@34
@35
@36
@37
